Table of Contents
1UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15 (d) OF THE
SECURITIES  EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(State of incorporation
or organization)001-14469
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
001-36110
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(Commission File No.)04-6268599
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
34-1755769
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
225 West Washington Street
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (ZIP Code)
(317) 636-1600
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class     Trading Symbols     Name of each exchange on which
registered
Simon Property Group, Inc. Common stock, $0.0001 par value SPG New York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, Inc.83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 par valueSPGJ New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ☒ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T
(§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit such files). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth
company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act (check one):
Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ◻ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
Simon Property Group, L.P.:
Large accelerated filer ◻ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ☒ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the Registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial
accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  
Simon Property Group, Inc.    ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over financial
reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in rule 12-b of the Act).
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ⌧ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
The aggregate market value of shares of common stock held by non-affiliates of Simon Property Group, Inc. was approximately $20,734 million based on the closing sale price
on the New York Stock Exchange for such stock on June 30, 2020.
As of January 31, 2021, Simon Property Group, Inc. had 328,493,416 and 8,000 shares of common stock and Class B common stock outstanding, respectively.
Simon Property Group, L.P. had no publicly-traded voting equity as of June 30, 2020.  Simon Property Group, L.P. has no common stock outstanding.
Documents Incorporated By Reference
Portions of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement in connection with its 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference in Part III.
Table of Contents
2EXPLANATORY NOTE
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the annual period ended December 31, 2020 of
Simon Property Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and Simon Property Group, L.P., a Delaware limited
partnership. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Simon” mean Simon Property
Group, Inc. and references to the “Operating Partnership” mean Simon Property Group, L.P. References to “we,”
“us” and “our” mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or
controlled by Simon and/or the Operating Partnership.
Simon is a real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or
the Internal Revenue Code. We are structured as an umbrella partnership REIT under which substantially all of our
business is conducted through the Operating Partnership, Simon’s majority-owned partnership subsidiary, for which
Simon is the general partner. As of December 31, 2020, Simon owned an approximate 87.4% ownership interest in
the Operating Partnership, with the remaining 12.6% ownership interest owned by limited partners. As the sole
general partner of the Operating Partnership, Simon has exclusive control of the Operating Partnership’s day-to-day
management.
We operate Simon and the Operating Partnership as one business. The management of Simon consists of
the same members as the management of the Operating Partnership. As general partner with control of the
Operating Partnership, Simon consolidates the Operating Partnership for financial reporting purposes, and Simon
has no material assets or liabilities other than its investment in the Operating Partnership. Therefore, the assets and
liabilities of Simon and the Operating Partnership are the same on their respective financial statements.
We believe that combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of Simon and the Operating Partnership into
this single report provides the following benefits:
●enhances investors’ understanding of Simon and the Operating Partnership by enabling investors to view
the business as a whole in the same manner as management views and operates the business;
●eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined presentation since substantially all of
the disclosure in this report applies to both Simon and the Operating Partnership; and
●creates time and cost efficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two
separate reports.
We believe it is important for investors to understand the few differences between Simon and the Operating
Partnership in the context of how we operate as a consolidated company. The primary difference is that Simon itself
does not conduct business, other than acting as the general partner of the Operating Partnership and issuing equity
or equity-related instruments from time to time. In addition, Simon itself does not incur any indebtedness, as all debt
is incurred by the Operating Partnership or entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by the Operating Partnership.
The Operating Partnership holds, directly or indirectly, substantially all of our assets, including our ownership
interests in our joint ventures. The Operating Partnership conducts substantially all of our business and is
structured as a partnership with no publicly traded equity. Except for the net proceeds from equity issuances by
Simon, which are contributed to the capital of the Operating Partnership in exchange for, in the case of common
stock issuances by Simon, common units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or units, or, in the
case of preferred stock issuances by Simon, preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or
preferred units, the Operating Partnership, directly or indirectly, generates the capital required by our business
through its operations, the incurrence of indebtedness, proceeds received from the disposition of certain properties
and joint ventures and the issuance of units or preferred units to third parties.
The presentation of stockholders’ equity, partners’ equity and noncontrolling interests are the main areas of
difference between the consolidated financial statements of Simon and those of the Operating Partnership. The
differences between stockholders’ equity and partners’ equity result from differences in the equity issued at the
Simon and Operating Partnership levels. The units held by limited partners in the Operating Partnership are
accounted for as partners’ equity in the Operating Partnership’s financial statements and as noncontrolling interests
in Simon’s financial statements. The noncontrolling interests in the Operating Partnership’s financial statements
include the interests of unaffiliated partners in various consolidated partnerships. The noncontrolling interests in
Simon’s financial statements include the same noncontrolling interests at the Operating Partnership level and, as
previously stated, the units held by limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Although classified differently, total
equity of Simon and the Operating Partnership is the same.
To help investors understand the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report
provides:
●separate consolidated financial statements for Simon and the Operating Partnership;
Table of Contents
3●a single set of notes to such consolidated financial statements that includes separate discussions of
noncontrolling interests and stockholders’ equity or partners’ equity, accumulated other comprehensive
income (loss) and per share and per unit data, as applicable;
●a combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
section that also includes discrete information related to each entity; and
●separate Part II, Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities sections related to each entity.
This report also includes separate Part II, Item 9A. Controls and Procedures sections and separate
Exhibits 31 and 32 certifications for each of Simon and the Operating Partnership in order to establish that the
requisite certifications have been made and that Simon and the Operating Partnership are each compliant with
Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and 18 U.S.C. §1350. The separate
discussions of Simon and the Operating Partnership in this report should be read in conjunction with each other to
understand our results on a consolidated basis and how management operates our business.
In order to highlight the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, the separate sections in
this report for Simon and the Operating Partnership specifically refer to Simon and the Operating Partnership. In the
sections that combine disclosure of Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report refers to actions or holdings of
Simon and the Operating Partnership as being “our” actions or holdings. Although the Operating Partnership is
generally the entity that directly or indirectly enters into contracts and joint ventures, holds assets and incurs debt,
we believe that references to “we,” “us” or “our” in this context is appropriate because the business is one
enterprise and we operate substantially all of our business through the Operating Partnership.
Table of Contents
4Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Annual Report on Form 10-K
December 31, 2020
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Item No.   Page No.
Part I
1. Business 5
1A.Risk Factors 11
1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 26
2. Properties 27
3. Legal Proceedings 53
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 53
Part II
5. Market for the Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer
Purchases of Equity Securities 54
6. Selected Financial Data 56
7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations 58
7A. Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosure About Market Risk 77
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 79
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure 136
9A. Controls and Procedures 136
9B. Other Information 138
Part III
10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 138
11. Executive Compensation 138
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 138
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 138
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 138
Part IV
15. Exhibits, and Financial Statement Schedules 140
16. Form 10-K Summary 140
Signatures 146
Table of Contents
5Part I
Item 1.Business
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-
managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the
Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they
distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned
Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. Unless stated
otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and
references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our"
mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon
and/or the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating
Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2020, we owned or held an
interest in 203 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 99 malls, 69 Premium Outlets,
14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 17 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80%
noncontrolling interest in The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-
regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2020, we had ownership
interests in 31 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe and Canada. As of
December 31, 2020, we also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-
based real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
For a description of our operational strategies and developments in our business during 2020, see Item 7,
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of this Form 10-K.
Other Policies
The following is a discussion of our investment policies, financing policies, conflict of interest policies and
policies with respect to certain other activities. One or more of these policies may be amended or rescinded from
time to time without a stockholder vote.
Investment Policies
While we emphasize equity real estate investments, we may also provide secured financing to or invest in
equity or debt securities of other entities engaged in real estate activities or securities of other issuers consistent
with Simon’s qualification as a REIT. However, any of these investments would be subject to the percentage
ownership limitations and gross income tests necessary for REIT qualification. These REIT limitations mean that
Simon cannot make an investment that would cause its real estate assets to be less than 75% of its total assets.
Simon must also derive at least 75% of its gross income directly or indirectly from investments relating to real
property or mortgages on real property, including “rents from real property,” dividends from other REITs and, in
certain circumstances, interest from certain types of temporary investments. In addition, Simon must also derive at
least 95% of its gross income from such real property investments, and from dividends, interest and gains from the
sale or dispositions of stock or securities or from other combinations of the foregoing.
Subject to Simon’s REIT limitations, we may invest in the securities of other issuers in connection with
acquisitions of indirect interests in real estate. Such an investment would normally be in the form of general or
limited partnership or membership interests in special purpose partnerships and limited liability companies that own
one or more properties. We may, in the future, acquire all or substantially all of the securities or assets of other
REITs, management companies or similar entities where such investments would be consistent with our investment
policies.  Additionally we have and may in the future make investments in entities engaged in non-real estate
activities, primarily through a taxable REIT subsidiary, similar to the investments we currently hold in certain retail
operations.
Financing Policies
Because Simon’s REIT qualification requires us to distribute at least 90% of its REIT taxable income, we
regularly access the debt markets to raise the funds necessary to finance acquisitions, develop and redevelop
properties, and refinance maturing debt. We must comply with the covenants contained in our financing
agreements that limit our ratio of
Table of Contents
6debt to total assets or market value, as defined. For example, the Operating Partnership’s lines of credit and the
indentures for the Operating Partnership’s debt securities contain covenants that restrict the total amount of debt of
the Operating Partnership to 65%, or 60% in relation to certain debt, of total assets, as defined under the related
agreements, and secured debt to 50% of total assets. In addition, these agreements contain other covenants
requiring compliance with financial ratios. Furthermore, the amount of debt that we may incur is limited as a
practical matter by our desire to maintain acceptable ratings for the debt securities of the Operating Partnership.
We strive to maintain investment grade ratings at all times for various business reasons, including their effect on our
ability to access attractive capital, but we cannot assure you that we will be able to do so in the future.
If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to seek additional capital, we may raise such capital by offering
equity or incurring debt, creating joint ventures with existing ownership interests in properties, entering into joint
venture arrangements for new development projects, retaining cash flows or a combination of these methods. If
Simon’s Board of Directors determines to raise equity capital, it may, without stockholder approval, issue additional
shares of common stock or other capital stock. Simon’s Board of Directors may issue a number of shares up to the
amount of our authorized capital or may issue units in any manner and on such terms and for such consideration as
it deems appropriate. We may also raise additional capital by issuing common units of partnership interest in the
Operating Partnership, or units. Such securities also may include additional classes of Simon’s preferred stock or
preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, which may be convertible into
common stock or units, as the case may be. Existing stockholders and unitholders have no preemptive right to
purchase shares or units in any subsequent issuances of securities by us. Any issuance of equity could dilute a
stockholder’s investment in Simon or a limited partner’s investment in the Operating Partnership.
We expect most future borrowings will be made through the Operating Partnership or its subsidiaries. We
might, however, incur borrowings through other entities that would be reloaned to the Operating Partnership.
Borrowings may be in the form of bank borrowings, publicly and privately placed debt instruments, or purchase
money obligations to the sellers of properties. Any such indebtedness may be secured or unsecured. Any such
indebtedness may also have full or limited recourse to the borrower or be cross-collateralized with other debt, or
may be fully or partially guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. We issue unsecured debt securities through the
Operating Partnership, but we may issue other debt securities which may be convertible into common or preferred
stock or be accompanied by warrants to purchase common or preferred stock. We also may sell or securitize our
lease receivables. Although we may borrow to fund the payment of dividends, we currently have no expectation that
we will regularly do so.
The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility, a $2.0
billion delayed-draw term loan facility, or Term Facility, and a $3.5 billion supplemental unsecured revolving credit
facility, or Supplemental Facility, or together, the Facilities. The Credit Facility and the Term Facility can be
increased in the form of either additional commitments under the Credit Facility or incremental term loans under the
Term Facility in an aggregate amount for all such increases not to exceed $1.0 billion, for a total aggregate size of
$7.0 billion, in each case, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments and satisfying certain customary
conditions precedent. The initial maturity date of the Term Facility and Credit Facility are June 30, 2022 and June
30, 2024, respectively. Each of the Term Facility and Credit Facility can be extended for two additional six-month
periods to June 30, 2023 and June 30, 2025, respectively, at our sole option, subject to satisfying certain customary
conditions precedent. The Term Facility was available via a single draw during the nine-month period following
March 16, 2020 and was drawn on in 2020 prior to expiring.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR
plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.65% and 1.40% or (ii)
the base rate (which rate is equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or
LIBOR plus 1.00%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit
rating of between 0.00% and 0.40%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by the Operating
Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.10% and 0.30% on the aggregate revolving commitments under
the Credit Facility. The Credit Facility contains a money market competitive bid option program that allows the
Operating Partnership to hold auctions to achieve lower pricing for short-term borrowings. Borrowings under the
Term Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR plus a margin determined
based on the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.725% and 1.60% or (ii) the base rate
(equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or LIBOR plus 1.00%) plus a
margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.00% and 0.60%.  The Term
Facility includes a ticking fee equal to 0.10% of the unused term loan commitment under the Term Facility, which
ticking fee commenced accruing on the date that is forty-five days after the closing of the Term Facility.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during
its term. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility is June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an
additional year to June 30,
Table of Contents
72023 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the
Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points. The Credit
Facility and Supplemental Facility, or together the Credit Facilities, provide for borrowings denominated in U.S.
dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.
The Operating Partnership also has available a global unsecured commercial paper note program, or
Commercial Paper program, of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership
may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes
issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are
guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. Notes are sold under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial
paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with
the Operating Partnership’s other unsecured senior indebtedness. The Commercial Paper program is supported by
the Credit Facilities and, if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under the Credit Facilities to
pay amounts outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program.
We may also finance our business through the following:
●issuance of shares of common stock or preferred stock or warrants to purchase the same;
●issuance of additional units;
●issuance of preferred units;
●issuance of other securities, including unsecured notes and mortgage debt;
●draws on our Credit Facilities;
●borrowings under the Commercial Paper program; or
●sale or exchange of ownership interests in properties.
The Operating Partnership may also issue units to contributors of properties or other partnership interests
which may permit the contributor to defer tax gain recognition under the Internal Revenue Code.
We do not have a policy limiting the number or amount of mortgages that may be placed on any particular
property.
Mortgage financing instruments, however, typically limit additional indebtedness on such properties.
Additionally, the Credit Facilities, our unsecured note indentures and other contracts may limit our ability to borrow
and contain limits on mortgage indebtedness we may incur as well as certain financial covenants we must maintain.
Typically, we invest in or form special purpose entities to assist us in obtaining secured permanent financing
at attractive terms. Permanent financing may be structured as a mortgage loan on a single property, or on a group
of properties, and generally requires us to provide a mortgage lien on the property or properties in favor of an
institutional third party, as a joint venture with a third party, or as a securitized financing. For securitized financings,
we create special purpose entities to own the properties. These special purpose entities, which are common in the
real estate industry, are structured so that they would not be consolidated in a bankruptcy proceeding involving a
parent company. We decide upon the structure of the financing based upon the best terms then available to us and
whether the proposed financing is consistent with our other business objectives. For accounting purposes, we
include the outstanding securitized debt of special purpose entities owning consolidated properties as part of our
consolidated indebtedness.
Conflict of Interest Policies
We maintain policies and have entered into agreements designed to reduce or eliminate potential conflicts of
interest. Simon has adopted governance principles governing the function, conduct, selection, orientation and
duties of its subsidiaries and Simon’s Board of Directors and the Company, as well as written charters for each of
the standing Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors. In addition, Simon’s Board of Directors has a Code of
Business Conduct and Ethics, which applies to all of its officers, directors, and employees and those of its
subsidiaries. At least a majority of the members of Simon’s Board of Directors must qualify, and do qualify, as
independent under the listing standards of the New York Stock Exchange, or NYSE, and cannot be affiliated with
the Simon family, who are significant stockholders in Simon and/or unitholders in the Operating Partnership. In
addition, the Audit and Compensation Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors are comprised entirely of
independent members who meet the additional independence and financial expert requirements of the NYSE as
required.
Table of Contents
8The sale by the Operating Partnership of any property that it owns may have an adverse tax impact on the
Simon family or other limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Any transaction between us and the Simon
family, including property acquisitions, service and property management agreements and retail space leases, must
be approved by the Company’s Audit Committee.
In order to avoid any conflict of interest, the Simon charter requires that at least three-fourths of Simon’s
independent directors must authorize and require the Operating Partnership to sell any property it owns. Any such
sale is subject to applicable agreements with third parties. A noncompetition agreement executed by Herbert
Simon, Simon’s Chairman Emeritus, and a noncompetition agreement executed by David Simon, Simon’s
Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President, which remains in effect notwithstanding the expiration of David
Simon’s employment agreement in 2019, contain covenants limiting their ability to participate in certain shopping
center activities.
Policies With Respect To Certain Other Activities
We intend to make investments which are consistent with Simon’s qualification as a REIT, unless Simon’s
Board of Directors determines that it is no longer in Simon’s best interests to so qualify as a REIT. Simon’s Board of
Directors may make such a determination because of changing circumstances or changes in the REIT
requirements. Simon has authority to issue shares of its capital stock or other securities in exchange for property.
We also have authority to repurchase or otherwise reacquire Simon’s shares, the Operating Partnership’s units, or
any other securities. On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the
previously authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan, or the Repurchase Program, through March 31,
2019 and on February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.
 Under the program, the Company could purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period
ending February 11, 2021.  Under the Repurchase Program, Simon may repurchase the shares in the open market,
or in privately negotiated transactions. At December 31, 2020, we had remaining authority to repurchase $1.5 billion
of common stock, which has subsequently expired. Simon may also issue shares of its common stock, or pay cash
at its option, to holders of units in future periods upon exercise of such holders’ rights under the partnership
agreement of the Operating Partnership. Our policy prohibits us from making any loans to the directors or executive
officers of Simon for any purpose. We may make loans to the joint ventures in which we participate. Additionally, we
may make or buy interests in loans secured by real estate properties owned by others or make investments in
companies that own real estate assets.
Competition
The retail real estate industry is dynamic and competitive. We compete with numerous merchandise
distribution channels, including malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and other shopping centers in the
United States and abroad. We also compete with internet retailing sites and catalogs, including our tenants, which
provide retailers with distribution options beyond existing brick and mortar retail properties. The existence of
competitive alternatives, accelerated by the impact of COVID-19, could have a material adverse effect on our ability
to lease space and on the level of rents we can obtain. This results in competition for both the tenants to occupy the
properties that we develop and manage as well as for the acquisition of prime sites (including land for development
and operating properties). We believe that there are numerous factors that make our properties highly desirable to
retailers, including:
●the quality, location and diversity of our properties;
●our management and operational expertise;
●our extensive experience and relationships with retailers, lenders and suppliers;
●our marketing initiatives and consumer focused strategic corporate alliances; and
●the sustainability of physical retail.
Certain Activities
During the past three years, we have:
●issued 409,936 shares of Simon common stock upon the exchange of units in the Operating Partnership;
●issued 605,625 restricted shares of Simon common stock and 36,252 long-term incentive performance
units, or LTIP units, net of forfeitures, under The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as
amended, or the 1998 Plan, and the Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan, or the 2019
Plan;
Table of Contents
9●purchased 5,767,922 shares of Simon common stock in the open market for $866.5 million pursuant to
our Repurchase Programs;
●issued 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering at a public offering price of $72.50 per
share, before underwriting discounts and commissions;
●issued 475,183 units in the Operating Partnership in exchange for the remaining interest in a former joint
venture property;
●issued 955,705 units in the Operating Partnership as part of the consideration for the acquisition of an
80% interest in TRG;
●redeemed 614,617 units in the Operating Partnership at an average price of $169.96 per unit in cash;
●amended and extended the Supplemental Facility in February 2018 to further increase our borrowing
capacity, extend its term and reduce its base interest rate;
●amended and replaced in its entirety the Operating Partnership’s existing Credit Facility in March 2020,
by entering into an unsecured credit facility compromised of (i) an amendment and extension of the Credit
Facility and (ii) a $2.0 billion delayed-draw term loan facility, or Term Facility;
●borrowed a maximum amount of $3.9 billion under the Credit Facilities; the outstanding amount of
borrowings under the Credit Facility as of December 31, 2020 was $125.0 million and no borrowings were
outstanding under the Supplemental Facility;
●borrowed a maximum amount of $2.0 billion under the Term Facility; the outstanding amount of
borrowings as of December 31, 2020 was $2.0 billion;
●increased the borrowing capacity of the Commercial Paper program from $1.0 billion to $2.0 billion in
November 2018; the outstanding amount of Commercial Paper notes as of December 31, 2020 was
$623.0 million; and
●provided annual reports containing financial statements audited by our independent registered public
accounting firm and quarterly reports containing unaudited financial statements to our security holders.
Human Capital
At December 31, 2020, we and our affiliates employed approximately 3,300 persons at various properties
and offices throughout the United States, of which approximately 900 were part-time. Approximately 1,000 of these
employees were located at our corporate headquarters in Indianapolis, Indiana.
We believe our employees are the driving force behind our success.  To ensure we continue to attract,
develop and retain the best talent across the organization, we invest in our employees and provide equal
opportunities. We offer a variety of ongoing talent programs that foster continual development, high performance
and overall organizational effectiveness, including a series of leadership development programs. We conduct an
annual talent-assessment process for selected business functions within our corporate and field organizations that
includes plans for individual employee career development and long-term leadership succession, and also conduct
an annual performance appraisal process for all regular employees.
We are committed to providing a work environment that is free from any form of discrimination or
harassment for any protected class and also embraces principles of inclusiveness. Our aim is to implement a
sustainable diversity and inclusion strategy in the coming years that is aligned with our values and guiding
operating principles, including an internal policy, targeted solutions for employees and an annual process of
assessment, action and evaluation led by our human resources department.
Our compensation program is designed to, among other things, attract, retain and motivate talented and
experienced individuals using a mix of competitive salaries and other benefits.
Corporate Headquarters
Our corporate headquarters are located at 225 West Washington Street, Indianapolis, Indiana 46204, and
our telephone number is (317) 636-1600.
Table of Contents
10Available Information
Simon is a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended, or the Exchange Act) and is required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain
information regarding our website and the availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the Securities
and Exchange Commission, or the SEC. Our Internet website address is www.simon.com. Our annual reports on
Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports filed or
furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act are available or may be accessed free of charge
through the “About Simon/Investor Relations” section of our Internet website as soon as reasonably practicable
after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our Internet website and the information
contained therein or connected thereto are not, and are not intended to be, incorporated into this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
The following corporate governance documents are also available through the “About Simon/Investor
Relations/ Governance” section of our Internet website or may be obtained in print form by request of our Investor
Relations Department: Governance Principles, Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, Audit Committee Charter,
Compensation Committee Charter, and Governance and Nominating Committee Charter.
In addition, we intend to disclose on our Internet website any amendments to, or waivers from, our Code of
Business Conduct and Ethics that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the SEC and the NYSE.
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth certain information with respect to Simon’s executive officers as of February
25, 2021.
Name Age Position
David Simon 59Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Of ficer and
President
John Rulli 64 Chief Administrative Of ficer
Steven E. Fivel 60 General Counsel and Secretary
Brian J. McDade 41Executive V ice President, Chief Financial Of ficer and
Treasurer
Alexander L. W . Snyder 51 Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary
Adam J. Reuille 46 Senior V ice President and Chief Accounting Of ficer
The executive officers of Simon serve at the pleasure of Simon’s Board of Directors.
Mr. Simon has served as the Chairman of Simon’s Board of Directors since 2007, Chief Executive Officer of
Simon or its predecessor since 1995 and assumed the position of President in 2019. Mr. Simon has also been a
director of Simon or its predecessor since its incorporation in 1993. Mr. Simon was the President of Simon’s
predecessor from 1993 to 1996. He is the nephew of Herbert Simon.
Mr. Rulli serves as Simon’s Chief Administrative Officer. Mr. Rulli joined Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or
MSA, in 1988 and held various positions with MSA and Simon thereafter. Mr. Rulli became Chief Administrative
Officer in 2007 and was promoted to Senior Executive Vice President in 2011.
Mr. Fivel serves as Simon’s General Counsel and Secretary. Prior to rejoining Simon in 2011 as Assistant
General Counsel and Assistant Secretary, Mr. Fivel served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and
Secretary of Brightpoint, Inc. Mr. Fivel was previously employed by MSA from 1988 until 1993 and then by Simon
from 1993 to 1996.  Mr. Fivel was promoted to General Counsel and Secretary in 2017.
Mr. McDade serves as Simon’s Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer. Mr. McDade
joined Simon in 2007 as the Director of Capital Markets and was promoted to Senior Vice President of Capital
Markets in 2013. Mr. McDade became Treasurer in 2014 and was promoted to Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer in 2018.
Mr. Snyder serves as Simon’s Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary. Mr. Snyder joined Simon
in 2016 as Senior Deputy General Counsel. Immediately prior to joining Simon, Mr. Snyder was Managing Partner
of the Crimson Fulcrum Strategic Institute. Mr. Snyder previously served as Executive Vice President, General
Counsel and Corporate Secretary for Beechcraft Corporation as well as Chief Counsel Mergers & Acquisitions for
Koch Industries, Inc.  Mr. Snyder was promoted to Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary in 2017.
Mr. Reuille serves as Simon’s Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer and prior to that as Simon’s Vice
President and Corporate Controller. Mr. Reuille joined Simon in 2009 and was promoted to Senior Vice President 
and Chief Accounting Officer in 2018.  
Table of Contents
11Item 1A.  Risk Factors
The following factors, among others, could cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed
or implied in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and presented elsewhere by our
management from time to time. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial
condition, liquidity, results of operations, funds from operations, or FFO, and prospects, which we refer to herein as
a material adverse effect on us or as materially and adversely affecting us, and you should carefully consider them.
Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or which are currently not believed to be material may
also affect our actual results. We may update these factors in our future periodic reports.
Summary of Risk Factors
The following summarizes our material risk factors.  However, this summary is not intended to be a
comprehensive and complete list of all risk factors identified by the Company.  Refer to the following pages of this
section for additional details regarding these summarized risk factors and other additional risk factors identified by
the Company.
●The ongoing novel coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent
its spread, as well as other future epidemics, pandemics or public health crises, could have a significant
negative impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flow and liquidity and our
ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to our
shareholders.
●Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and adversely affect us.
●Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized tenants to attract
shoppers and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss of one or more of these anchors
or tenants.
●We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
●We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably, including e-
commerce.
●Vacant space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
●We may not be able to lease newly developed properties to or renew leases and relet space at existing
properties with an appropriate mix of tenants, if at all.
●Our international activities may subject us to risks that are different from or greater than those associated
with our domestic operations.
●We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion of properties.
●We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
●The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose restrictions on us
that might affect our ability to operate freely.
●Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access external financings
for our growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
●Adverse changes in our credit ratings could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing terms.
●Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs in the
United States. The failure to maintain Simon’s or the Subsidiary REITs’ qualifications as REITs or changes
in applicable tax laws or regulations could result in adverse tax consequences.
●If the Operating Partnership fails to qualify as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, we would
cease to qualify as a REIT and suffer other adverse consequences.
●Our ownership of TRSs is subject to certain restrictions, and we will be required to pay a 100% penalty
tax on certain income or deductions if our transactions with our TRSs are not conducted on arm’s-length
terms.
●We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or managed by third
parties, which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
●The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of joint venture
properties.
Table of Contents
12●Some of our properties are subject to potential natural or other disasters.
Risks Relating to Retail Operations
The ongoing novel coronavirus (COVID-19) pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to
prevent its spread, as well as other future epidemics, pandemics or public health crises, could have a
significant negative impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flow and
liquidity and our ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make
distributions to our shareholders.
The COVID-19 pandemic has already had a significant negative impact on economic and market conditions
around the world in 2020, and, notwithstanding the fact that vaccines have started to be administered in the United
States and elsewhere, the pandemic continues to adversely impact economic activity in retail real estate. The
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve and governments and other authorities, including where we
own or hold interests in properties, have imposed measures intended to control its spread, including restrictions on
freedom of movement, group gatherings and business operations such as travel bans, border closings, business
closures, quarantines, stay-at-home, shelter-in-place orders, density limitations and social distancing measures.
Governments and other authorities are in varying stages of lifting or modifying some of these measures. However,
governments and other authorities have already been forced to, and others may in the future, reinstitute these
measures or impose new, more restrictive measures, if the risks, or the tenants’ and consumers' perception of the
risks, related to the COVID-19 pandemic worsen at any time. Although tenants and consumers have been adapting
to the COVID-19 pandemic, with tenants adding services like curbside pickup, and while consumer risk-tolerance is
evolving, such adaptations and evolution may take time, and there is no guarantee that retail will return to pre-
pandemic levels even once the pandemic subsides.
As of December 31, 2020, we owned or held an interest in 203 income-producing properties in the United
States located in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80% noncontrolling interest in TRG, which has an
interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31,
2020, we had ownership interests in 31 properties primarily located in Asia, Europe and Canada and have one
international outlet property under development. We have an interest in a European investee that has interests in
ten Designer Outlet properties, as more fully described elsewhere in this Annual Report. As of December 31, 2020,
we also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate
company, which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
Demand for retail space and the profitability of our properties depends, in part, on the ability and willingness
of tenants to enter into and perform obligations under leases. On March 18, 2020, after extensive discussions with
federal, state and local officials and in recognition of the need to address the spread of COVID-19, we closed all of
our retail properties in the United States. We gradually reopened retail properties beginning May 1st in markets
where local and state closure mandates had been lifted and retail restrictions had been eased. As of October 7th all
of our domestic retail properties had reopened but we do not have certainty that additional closures in the future will
not be required.  In addition, a number of tenants have not re-opened at our properties and we do not have
certainty that all of them will re-open.  As of December 31, all of our domestic retail properties remained open.  In
addition, even after certain restrictions intended to prevent the spread of COVID-19 are lifted or reduced, the
willingness of customers to visit our properties is likely to be reduced and our tenants' businesses are likely to be
adversely affected, based upon many factors, including whether the number of COVID-19 transmissions is
materially reduced, how quickly vaccinations which prevent or reduce the severity of COVID-19 become readily
available, or a cure or treatment is identified and becomes readily available. Further, demand could remain reduced
due to heightened sensitivity to risks associated with the transmission of COVID-19 or other associated diseases. In
addition, some of our properties are located at or within a close proximity to tourist destinations and these
properties and our tenants' businesses are therefore heavily and adversely impacted by reductions in travel and
tourism resulting from travel bans or restrictions and general public concern regarding the risk of travel.
During the period of closure of all of our retail properties, we have experienced a significant reduction in
cash rent collections, which may continue for an indeterminate period. With respect to those tenants from whom we
have not received payment, we have been engaged in discussions with substantially all of them. We have agreed
to deferral or abatement arrangements with a number of our tenants, resulting in rent deferrals with tenants (the
vast majority of which we expect to receive over the course of 2021) and rent abatement with tenants representing,
in the aggregate, less than 16.0% of our U.S. portfolio gross contractual rents for the second, third and fourth
quarters of 2020. Discussions with our tenants are
Table of Contents
13ongoing and may result in further rent deferrals, lease restructures, abatements and/or lease terminations, as we
deem appropriate on a case-by-case basis based on each tenant's unique financial and operating situation.
In connection with rent deferrals (or other accruals of unpaid rent), although we will not receive cash rent
payments as scheduled, if we determine that rent payments are probable of collection, we will continue to recognize
lease income on a straight-line basis over the lease term and associated tenant receivables, until the time of
payment. However, if we determine that such deferred rent payments (or other accrued but unpaid rent payments)
are not probable of collection, lease income will be recorded as the lesser of the amount that would be recognized
on a straight-line basis or cash that has been received from the tenant, with any tenant receivable and deferred rent
receivable balances charged as a direct write-off against rental income in the period of the change in our
collectability determination. As a result, we may experience material impacts, including, but not limited to, changes
in the ability to recognize revenue due to changes in the probability of collection and reductions in rental income
associated with write-offs of tenant receivable and deferred rent receivable balances. In addition, any rent
abatements we have granted, and may potentially grant in the future, will be accounted for as negative variable
lease consideration in the period granted or agreed thereby reducing lease income.
The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash
flows, liquidity and ability to satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to our shareholders could
depend on additional factors, including:
●the financial condition and viability of our tenants, and their ability or willingness to pay rent in full;
●state, local, federal and industry-initiated tenant relief efforts that may adversely affect landlords, including
us, and their ability to collect rent and/or enforce remedies for the failure to pay rent;
●the increased popularity and utilization of e-commerce;
●our ability to renew leases or re-lease available space in our properties on favorable terms or at all,
including as a result of a deterioration in the economic and market conditions in the markets in which we
own properties or due to restrictions intended to prevent the spread of COVID-19, including any additional
government mandated closures of businesses that frustrate our leasing activities;
●a severe and prolonged disruption and instability in the global financial markets, including the debt and
equity capital markets, all of which have already been experienced and which may continue to affect our
or our tenants' ability to access capital necessary to fund our or their respective business operations or
repay, refinance or renew maturing liabilities on a timely basis, on attractive terms, or at all and may
adversely affect the valuation of financial assets and liabilities, any of which could affect our and our
tenants' ability to meet liquidity and capital expenditure requirements;
●a refusal or failure of one or more lenders under our credit facility to fund their respective financing
commitment to us may affect our ability to access capital necessary to fund our business operations and
to meet our liquidity and capital expenditure requirements;
●a reduction in the cash flows generated by our properties and the values of our properties that could
result in impairments or limit our ability to dispose of them at attractive prices or obtain debt financing
secured by our properties;
●the complete or partial closure of one or more of our tenants' manufacturing facilities or distribution
centers, temporary or long-term disruption in our tenants' supply chains from local and international
suppliers and/or delays in the delivery of our tenants' inventory, any of which could reduce or eliminate
our tenants' sales, cause the temporary closure of our tenants' businesses, and/or result in their
bankruptcy or insolvency;
●a negative impact on consumer discretionary spending caused by high unemployment levels, reduced
economic activity or a severe or prolonged recession;
●our and our tenants' ability to manage our respective businesses to the extent our and their management
or personnel (including on-site employees) are impacted in significant numbers by the COVID-19
pandemic or are otherwise not willing, available or allowed to conduct work, including any impact on our
tenants' ability to deliver timely information to us that is necessary for us to make effective decisions; and
●our and our tenants' ability to ensure business continuity in the event our or our tenants' continuity of
operations plan is (i) not effective or improperly implemented or deployed or (ii) compromised due to
increased cyber and remote access activity during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Table of Contents
14To the extent any of these risks and uncertainties adversely impact us in the ways described above or
otherwise, they may also have the effect of heightening many of the other risks described herein.
Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and adversely affect
us.
Our concentration in the retail real estate market – our primary source of revenue is retail tenants – means
that we could be materially and adversely affected by conditions that materially and adversely affect the retail
environment generally, including, without limitation:
●levels of consumer spending, changes in consumer confidence, income levels, and fluctuations in
seasonal spending in the United States and internationally;
●consumers avoiding traveling for shopping due to a heightened level of concern for safety in public places
in light of the COVID-19 pandemic as well as the recent increase in civil unrest, including random acts of
violence and riots;
●significant reductions in international travel and tourism, resulting in fewer international retail consumers;
●consumer perceptions of the convenience and attractiveness of our properties;
●the impact on our retail tenants and demand for retail space at our properties from the increasing use of
the Internet by retailers and consumers, which has accelerated during the COVID-19 pandemic;
●the creditworthiness of our retail tenants and the availability of new creditworthy tenants and the related
impact on our occupancy levels and lease income;
●local real estate conditions, such as an oversupply of, or reduction in demand for, retail space or retail
goods, decreases in rental rates and declines in real estate values;
●the willingness of retailers to lease space in our properties at attractive rents, or at all;
●actual or perceived changes in national and international economic conditions, which can result from
global events such as international trade disputes, a foreign debt crisis, foreign currency volatility, natural
disasters, war, epidemics and pandemics, the fear of spread of contagious diseases, civil unrest and
terrorism, as well as from domestic issues, such as government policies and regulations, tariffs, energy
prices, market dynamics, rising interest rates, inflation and limited growth in consumer income;
●changes in regional and local economies, which may be affected by increased rates of unemployment,
increased foreclosures, higher taxes, decreased tourism, industry slowdowns, adverse weather
conditions, and other factors;
●increased operating costs and capital expenditures, whether from redevelopments, replacing tenants or
otherwise;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations, including tax, environmental, safety and zoning; and
●the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, and restrictions intended to prevent its spread, which were
implemented through a combination of state, local and federal orders and regulations that were put in
place with unprecedented speed and with no opportunity for citizens to challenge their legality.
Additionally, a portion of our lease income is derived from overage rents based on sales over a stated base
amount that directly depend on the sales volume of our retail tenants. Accordingly, declines in our tenants’ sales
performance could reduce the income produced by our properties.
Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized tenants to
attract shoppers and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss of one or more of
these anchors or tenants.
Our properties are typically anchored by department stores and other large nationally recognized tenants.
Certain of our anchors and other tenants have ceased their operations, downsized their brick-and-mortar presence
or failed to comply with their contractual obligations to us and others, and such actions have become more
prevalent during the COVID-19 pandemic.
Table of Contents
15Sustained adverse pressure on the results of department stores and other national retailers may have a
similarly sustained adverse impact upon our own results. Certain department stores and other national retailers
have experienced, and may continue to experience for the foreseeable future (given uncertainty with respect to
current and future macroeconomic conditions and consumer confidence levels), considerable decreases in
customer traffic in their retail stores, increased competition from alternative retail options such as those accessible
via the Internet and other forms of pressure on their business models. As pressure on these department stores and
other national retailers increases, especially due to the COVID-19 pandemic, their ability to maintain their stores,
meet their obligations both to us and to their external lenders and suppliers, withstand takeover attempts or avoid
bankruptcy and/or liquidation may be impaired and result in closures of their stores or their seeking of a lease
modification with us. Any lease modification could be unfavorable to us as the lessor and could decrease current or
future effective rents or expense recovery charges. Certain other tenants are entitled to modify the economic or
other terms of, or terminate, their existing leases with us in the event of such closures.  Additionally, corporate
merger or consolidation activity among department stores and other national retailers typically results in the closure
of duplicate or geographically overlapping store locations.
If a department store or large nationally recognized tenant were to close its stores at our properties, we may
experience difficulty and delay and incur significant expense in re-tenanting the space, as well as in leasing spaces
in areas adjacent to the vacant store, at attractive rates, or at all. Additionally, department store or tenant closures
may result in decreased customer traffic, which could lead to decreased sales at our properties. If the sales of
stores operating in our properties were to decline significantly due to the closing of anchor stores or other national
retailers, adverse economic conditions or other reasons, tenants may be unable to pay their minimum rents or
expense recovery charges. In the event of any default by a tenant, we may not be able to fully recover, and/or may
experience delays and costs in enforcing our rights as landlord to recover, amounts due to us under the terms of
our leases with such parties.
We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
Bankruptcy filings by retailers can occur regularly in the course of our operations.  In recent years, a number
of companies in the retail industry, including certain of our tenants, have declared bankruptcy, and these numbers
have increased in 2020 due to the COVID-19 pandemic. If a tenant files for bankruptcy, the tenant may have the
right to reject and terminate one or more of its leases with us, and we cannot be sure that it will affirm one or more
of its leases and continue to make rental payments to us in a timely manner. A bankruptcy filing by, or relating to,
one of our tenants would generally prohibit us from evicting this tenant, and bar all efforts by us to collect pre-
bankruptcy debts from that tenant, or from their property, unless we receive an order permitting us to do so from the
bankruptcy court. In addition, we cannot evict a tenant solely because of its bankruptcy. If a lease is assumed by
the tenant in bankruptcy, all pre-bankruptcy balances due under the lease must be paid to us in full. If a lease is
rejected, the unsecured claim we hold against a bankrupt tenant might be paid only to the extent that funds are
available and only in the same percentage as is paid to all other holders of unsecured claims, and there are
restrictions under bankruptcy laws that limit the amount of the claim we can make if a lease is rejected. As a result,
it is likely that we would recover substantially less than the full value of any unsecured claims we hold. In addition,
we may make lease modifications either pre- or post-bankruptcy for certain tenants undergoing significant financial
distress in order for them to continue as a going concern. Furthermore, we may be required to incur significant
expense in re-tenanting the space formerly leased to the bankrupt tenant. We continually seek to re-lease vacant
spaces resulting from tenant terminations. The bankruptcy of a tenant, particularly an anchor tenant or a national
tenant with multiple locations, may require a substantial redevelopment of its space, the success of which cannot
be assured, and may make the re-tenanting of its space difficult and costly. Any such bankruptcies also make it
more difficult to lease the remainder of the space at the affected property or properties. Future tenant bankruptcies
may strain our resources and impact our ability to successfully execute our re-leasing strategy and could materially
and adversely affect us.
We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably, including e-
commerce.
Our properties compete with other forms of retailing such as pure online retail websites as well as other retail
properties such as single user freestanding discounters (Costco, Walmart and Target). In addition, many of our
tenants are omni-channel retailers who also distribute their products through online sales. Our business currently is
predominantly reliant on consumer demand for shopping at physical stores, and we could be materially and
adversely affected if we are unsuccessful in adapting our business to evolving consumer purchasing habits. The
increased popularity of digital and mobile technologies has accelerated the transition of a percentage of market
share from shopping at physical stores to web-based shopping, and the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic and
restrictions intended to prevent its spread have significantly increased the utilization of e-commerce and may,
particularly in certain market segments, accelerate the long-
Table of Contents
16term penetration of pure online retail which has been able to sell non-essential goods during the COVID-19
pandemic. Not only has the temporary closure of our retail properties and the restrictions put in place by state, local
and federal officials caused consumers who otherwise would have purchased from retailers at our properties to
increase their utilization of pure online retail websites, but consumers whose previous use of online retail was low or
non-existent have recently turned to pure online retail as a necessity due to the inability to access our properties
and the ability to purchase non-essential goods from these pure online retailers. Although a brick-and-mortar
presence may have a positive impact on retailers’ online sales, the increased utilization of pure online shopping
may lead to the closure of underperforming stores by retailers, which could impact our occupancy levels and the
rates that tenants are willing to pay to lease our space.
Vacant space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
Certain of our properties have had vacant space available for prospective tenants, and those properties may
continue to experience, and other properties may commence experiencing, such oversupply in the future. Among
other causes, (1) there has been an increased number of bankruptcies of anchor stores and other national retailers,
as well as store closures, and (2) there has been lower demand from retail tenants for space, due to certain
retailers increasing their use of e-commerce websites to distribute their merchandise, with each of (1) and (2)
accelerating in 2020 as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic. As a result of the increased bargaining power of
creditworthy retail tenants, there is downward pressure on our rental rates and occupancy levels, and this increased
bargaining power may also result in us having to increase our spend on tenant improvements and potentially make
other lease modifications in order to attract or retain tenants, any of which, in the aggregate, could materially and
adversely affect us.
We may not be able to lease newly developed properties to or renew leases and relet space at
existing properties with an appropriate mix of tenants, if at all.
We may not be able to lease new properties to an appropriate mix of tenants that generates optimal
customer traffic. Also, when leases for our existing properties expire, the premises may not be relet or the terms of
reletting, including the cost of allowances and concessions to tenants may be less favorable than the current lease
terms. If we fail to identify and secure the right blend of tenants at our newly developed and existing properties, our
properties may not appeal to the communities they serve. If we elect to pursue a “mixed use” redevelopment we
expose ourselves to risks associated with each non-retail use (e.g. office, residential, hotel and entertainment), and
the performance of our retail tenants in such properties may be negatively impacted by delays in opening and/or the
performance of such non-retail uses. To the extent that our leasing goals are not achieved, we could be materially
and adversely affected.
Risks Relating to Real Estate Investments and Operations
Our international activities may subject us to risks that are different from or greater than those
associated with our domestic operations.
As of December 31, 2020, we held interests in consolidated and joint venture properties that operate in
Austria, Canada, France, Italy, Germany, Japan, Malaysia, Mexico, the Netherlands, South Korea, Spain, Thailand,
and the United Kingdom. We also have an equity stake in Klépierre, a publicly traded European real estate
company, which operates in 15 countries in Europe. Accordingly, our operating results and the value of our
international operations may be impacted by any unhedged movements in the foreign currencies in which those
operations transact and in which our net investment in those international operations is held. While we occasionally
enter into hedging agreements to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates, these agreements
may not eliminate foreign currency risk entirely.
We may pursue additional investment, ownership, development and redevelopment/expansion opportunities
outside the United States. Such international activities carry risks that are different from those we face with our
domestic properties and operations. These risks include, but are not limited to:
●adverse effects of changes in exchange rates for foreign currencies;
●changes in foreign political and economic environments, regionally, nationally, and locally;
●impact from international trade disputes and the associated impact on our tenants’ supply chain and
consumer spending levels;
●challenges of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws, including corporate governance, operations,
taxes and litigation;
Table of Contents
17●the risk that we, our employees and/or agents could violate anti-bribery, anti-corruption and international
trade laws in the U.S., such as the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and certain foreign countries, such
as the U.K. Bribery Act, which could result in criminal or civil sanctions and/or fines, negatively impact our
reputation, or require us to incur significant expenses to investigate;
●differing lending practices;
●differences in cultures and consumer retail behavior;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in the United States that affect international operations;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in these foreign jurisdictions;
●difficulties in managing international operations;
●obstacles to the repatriation of earnings and cash; and
●labor discord, political or civil unrest, acts of terrorism, epidemics and pandemics, the fear of spread of
contagious diseases, or the threat of international boycotts.
Our international activities represented approximately 1.9% of consolidated net income and 9.1% of our net
operating income, or NOI, for the year ended December 31, 2020. To the extent that we expand our international
activities, the above risks could increase in significance, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on us.
We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion of
properties.
We regularly acquire and develop new properties and redevelop and expand existing properties, and these
activities are subject to various risks. We may not be successful in pursuing acquisition, development or
redevelopment/expansion opportunities. In addition, newly acquired, developed or redeveloped/expanded
properties may not perform as well as expected, impacting our anticipated return on investment. We are subject to
other risks in connection with any acquisition, development and redevelopment/expansion activities, including the
following:
●acquisition or construction costs of a project may be higher than projected, potentially making the project
unfeasible or unprofitable;
●development, redevelopment or expansions may take considerably longer than expected, delaying the
commencement and amount of income from the property;
●we may not be able to obtain financing or to refinance loans on favorable terms, or at all;
●we may be unable to obtain zoning, occupancy or other governmental approvals;
●occupancy rates and rents may not meet our projections and the project may not be accretive; and
●we may need the consent of third parties such as department stores, anchor tenants, mortgage lenders
and joint venture partners, and those consents may be withheld.
If a development or redevelopment/expansion project is unsuccessful, either because it is not meeting our
expectations when operational or was not completed according to the project planning, we could lose our
investment in the project. Further, if we guarantee the property’s financing, our loss could exceed our investment in
the project.
In the event that these risks were realized at the same time at multiple properties, we could be materially
and adversely affected.
Real estate investments are relatively illiquid.
Our properties represent a substantial portion of our total consolidated assets. These investments are
relatively illiquid. As a result, our ability to sell one or more of our properties or investments in real estate in
response to any changes in economic, industry, or other conditions may be limited. The real estate market is
affected by many factors, such as general economic conditions, availability and terms of financing, interest rates
and other factors, including supply and demand for space, that are beyond our control. If we want to sell a property,
we cannot assure you that we will be able to dispose of it in the desired time period, or at all, or that the sales price
of a property will be attractive at the relevant time or exceed the carrying value of our investment. Moreover, if a
property is mortgaged, we may not be able to obtain a release of the lien on that property without the payment of
the associated debt and/or a substantial prepayment penalty, which
Table of Contents
18could restrict our ability to dispose of the property, even though the sale might otherwise be desirable.
Risks Relating to Debt and the Financial Markets
We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
As of December 31, 2020, our consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding related
premium, discount and debt issuance costs, totaled $26.8 billion. As a result of this indebtedness, we are required
to use a substantial portion of our cash flows for debt service, including selected repayment at scheduled
maturities, which limits our ability to use those cash flows to fund the growth of our business. We are also subject to
the risks normally associated with debt financing, including the risk that our cash flows from operations will be
insufficient to meet required debt service or that we will be able to refinance such indebtedness on acceptable
terms, or at all. Our debt service costs generally will not be reduced if developments at the applicable property,
such as the entry of new competitors or the loss of major tenants, cause a reduction in the income from the
property. Our indebtedness could also have other adverse consequences on us, including reducing our access to
capital or increasing our vulnerability to general adverse economic, industry and market conditions. In addition, if a
property is mortgaged to secure payment of indebtedness and income from such property is insufficient to pay that
indebtedness, the property could be foreclosed upon by the mortgagee resulting in a loss of income and a decline
in our total asset value. If any of the foregoing occurs, we could be materially and adversely affected.
The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose restrictions on
us that might affect our ability to operate freely.
We have a variety of unsecured debt, including the Credit Facilities, senior unsecured notes and commercial
paper, and secured property level debt. Certain of the agreements that govern our indebtedness contain covenants,
including, among other things, limitations on our ability to incur secured and unsecured indebtedness, sell all or
substantially all of our assets and engage in mergers and certain acquisitions. In addition, certain of the agreements
that govern our indebtedness contain financial covenants that require us to maintain certain financial ratios,
including certain coverage ratios. These covenants may restrict our ability to pursue certain business initiatives or
certain transactions that might otherwise be advantageous to us. In addition, our ability to comply with these
provisions might be affected by events beyond our control. Failure to comply with any of our financing covenants
could result in an event of default, which, if not cured or waived, could accelerate the related indebtedness as well
as other of our indebtedness, which could have a material adverse effect on us.
Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access external
financings for our growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
We depend on external financings, principally debt financings, to fund the growth of our business and to
ensure that we can meet ongoing maturities of our outstanding debt. Our access to financing depends on our credit
ratings, the willingness of lending institutions and other debt investors to grant credit to us and conditions in the
capital markets in general. An economic recession may cause extreme volatility and disruption in the capital and
credit markets. We rely upon the Credit Facilities as sources of funding for numerous transactions. Our access to
these funds is dependent upon the ability of each of the participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding
commitments to us. When markets are volatile, access to capital and credit markets could be disrupted over an
extended period of time and one or more financial institutions may not have the available capital to meet their
previous commitments to us. The failure of one or more participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding
commitments to us could have a material adverse effect on us, including as a result of making it difficult to obtain
the financing we may need for future growth and/or meeting our debt service requirements. We cannot assure you
that we will be able to obtain the financing we need for the future growth of our business or to meet our debt service
requirements, or that a sufficient amount of financing will be available to us on favorable terms, or at all.
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing terms.
The Operating Partnership’s outstanding senior unsecured notes, the Credit Facilities, the Commercial
Paper program, and Simon’s preferred stock are periodically rated by nationally recognized credit rating agencies.
The credit ratings are based on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios, financial condition and
prospects, and other factors viewed by the credit rating agencies as relevant to us and our industry and the
economic outlook in general. Our credit ratings can affect the amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms
of any financing we obtain. Since we depend primarily on debt financing to fund the growth of our business, an
adverse change in our credit ratings, including actual changes and changes in outlook, or even the initiation of a
review of our credit ratings that could result in an adverse change, could have a material adverse effect on us.
Table of Contents
19An increase in interest rates would increase our interest costs on variable rate debt and could
adversely impact our ability to refinance existing debt on attractive terms, or at all; our hedging
interest rate protection arrangements may not effectively limit our interest rate risk.
As of December 31, 2020, we had approximately $3.3 billion of outstanding consolidated indebtedness that
bears interest at variable rates, and we may incur more variable rate indebtedness in the future. If interest rates
increase, then so would the interest costs on our unhedged variable rate debt, which could adversely affect our
cash flows and our ability to pay principal and interest on our debt and our ability to make distributions to our
stockholders. Further, rising interest rates could limit our ability to refinance existing debt when it matures or
significantly increase our future interest expense.
We selectively manage our exposure to interest rate risk by a combination of interest rate protection
agreements to effectively fix or cap all or a portion of our variable rate debt. In addition, we refinance fixed rate debt
at times when we believe rates and other terms are appropriate. Our efforts to manage these exposures may not be
successful.
Our use of interest rate hedging arrangements to manage risk associated with interest rate volatility may
expose us to additional risks, including a risk that a counterparty to a hedging arrangement may fail to honor its
obligations or that we could be required to fund our contractual payment obligations under such arrangements in
relatively large amounts or on short notice. Developing an effective interest rate risk strategy is complex and no
strategy can completely insulate us from risks associated with interest rate fluctuations. There can be no assurance
that our hedging activities will have the desired beneficial impact on our results of operations, liquidity and financial
condition. Termination of these hedging agreements typically involves costs, such as transaction fees or breakage
costs.
We may be adversely affected by developments in the London Inter-bank Offered Rate (LIBOR)
market, changes in the methods by which LIBOR is determined or the use of alternative reference
rates.
As of December 31, 2020, approximately 11.0% or $2.9 billion of our debt outstanding was indexed to
LIBOR. In July 2017, the U.K. Financial Conduct Authority (the “FCA”), which regulates LIBOR, announced its
intention to stop compelling banks to submit rates for the calculation of LIBOR after 2021. Accordingly, there is
considerable uncertainty regarding the publication of LIBOR beyond 2021. The Federal Reserve Board convened
the Alternative Reference Rates Committee (“ARRC”) to identify a set of alternative reference rates for possible use
as market benchmarks. Based on the ARRC’s recommendation, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York began
publishing the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) and two other alternative rates beginning in April 2018.
Since then, certain derivative products and debt securities tied to SOFR have been introduced, and a number of
industry groups are developing transition plans to SOFR as the new market benchmark.  
We are not able to predict whether LIBOR will actually cease to be available after 2021 or whether SOFR
will become the market benchmark in its place. Any changes announced or adopted by the FCA or other authorities
or institutions in the methods used for determining LIBOR or the transition from LIBOR to a successor benchmark
may result in, among other things, a sudden or prolonged increase in LIBOR, a delay in the publication of LIBOR,
higher interest obligations arising from such successor benchmark and changes in the rules or methodologies for
determining LIBOR in the overall debt capital markets, which may discourage market participants from continuing to
administer or to participate in variable rate debt tied to LIBOR or such successor benchmark. If LIBOR as
determined in accordance with the terms of our particular debt is no longer available, whether during or after 2021,
the interest rates on such debt would be determined using various alternative methods, any of which may result in
interest obligations which are more than or do not otherwise correlate over time with the payments that would have
been made on such debt if LIBOR was available in its current form. As a result, there can be no assurance that any
of the aforementioned developments or changes will not result in financial market disruptions, significant increases
in benchmark interest rates, substantially higher financing costs or a shortage of available debt financing, any of
which could have an adverse effect on us, which currently would be limited by our relatively low exposure to
variable rate LIBOR-based debt.
Risks Relating to Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs in the
United States. The failure to maintain Simon’s or the Subsidiary REITs’ qualifications as REITs or
changes in applicable tax laws or regulations could result in adverse tax consequences.
In the United States, Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed
as REITs under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code. We believe that Simon and these
subsidiaries, or the Subsidiary REITs, have been organized and have operated in a manner which allows them to
qualify for taxation as REITs under the Internal Revenue Code. We intend to continue to operate in this manner.
However, qualification and taxation as
Table of Contents
20REITs depend upon the ability of Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to satisfy several requirements (some of which
are outside our control), including tests related to our annual operating results, asset diversification, distribution
levels and diversity of stock ownership. The various REIT qualification tests required by the Internal Revenue Code
are highly technical and complex. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that Simon or any of the Subsidiary
REITs has operated in accordance with these requirements or will continue to operate in a manner so as to qualify
or remain qualified as a REIT.
If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fail to comply with those provisions, Simon or any such Subsidiary
REIT may be subject to monetary penalties or ultimately to possible disqualification as REITs. If such events occur,
and if available relief provisions do not apply:
●Simon or any such subsidiary will not be allowed a deduction for distributions to stockholders in
computing taxable income;
●Simon or any such subsidiary will be subject to corporate-level income tax on taxable income at the
corporate rate;
●Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT could be subject to the federal alternative minimum tax for taxable
years prior to 2018; and
●unless entitled to relief under relevant statutory provisions, Simon or any such subsidiary will also be
disqualified from treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the year during which
qualification was lost.  
Any such corporate tax liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for,
among other things, our operations and distributions to stockholders. In addition, if Simon fails to qualify as a REIT,
it will not be required to make distributions to our stockholders. Moreover, a failure by any subsidiary of the
Operating Partnership that has elected to be taxed as a REIT to qualify as a REIT would also cause Simon to fail to
qualify as a REIT, and the same adverse consequences would apply to it and its stockholders. Failure by Simon or
any of the Subsidiary REITs to qualify as a REIT also could impair our ability to expand our business and raise
capital, which could materially and adversely affect us.
Additionally, we are subject to certain income-based taxes, both domestically and internationally, and other
taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our
international investments. We currently follow local tax laws and regulations in various domestic and international
jurisdictions. Should these laws or regulations change, the amount of taxes we pay may increase accordingly.
If the Operating Partnership fails to qualify as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, we
would cease to qualify as a REIT and suffer other adverse consequences.
We believe that the Operating Partnership is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. As a
partnership, the Operating Partnership is not subject to federal income tax on its income. Instead, each of its
partners, including us, is allocated, and may be required to pay tax with respect to, such partner’s share of its
income. We cannot assure you that the Internal Revenue Service, or the IRS, will not challenge the status of the
Operating Partnership or any other subsidiary partnership or limited liability company in which we own an interest
as a disregarded entity or partnership for federal income tax purposes, or that a court would not sustain such a
challenge. If the IRS were successful in treating the Operating Partnership or any such other subsidiary as an entity
taxable as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, we would fail to meet the gross income tests and certain
of the asset tests applicable to REITs and, accordingly, we would likely cease to qualify as a REIT. Also, the failure
of the Operating Partnership or any subsidiary partnerships or limited liability company to qualify as a disregarded
entity or partnership for applicable income tax purposes could cause it to become subject to federal and state
corporate income tax, which would reduce significantly the amount of cash available for debt service and for
distribution to its partners or members, including us.
Our ownership of TRSs is subject to certain restrictions, and we will be required to pay a 100%
penalty tax on certain income or deductions if our transactions with our TRSs are not conducted on
arm’s-length terms.
We own securities in taxable REIT subsidiaries, or TRSs, and may acquire securities in additional TRSs in
the future. A TRS is a corporation other than a REIT in which a REIT directly or indirectly holds stock, and that has
made a joint election with such REIT to be treated as a taxable REIT subsidiary. If a TRS owns more than 35% of
the total voting power or value of the outstanding securities of another corporation, such other corporation will also
be treated as a TRS. Other than some activities relating to lodging and health care facilities, a TRS may generally
engage in any business, including the provision of customary or non-customary services to tenants of its parent
REIT. A TRS is subject to federal income tax as a regular C corporation. In addition, a 100% excise tax will be
imposed on certain transactions between a TRS and its parent REIT that are not conducted on an arm’s length
basis.
Table of Contents
21A REIT’s ownership of securities of a TRS is not subject to the 5% or 10% asset tests applicable to REITs.
Not more than 25% of the value of Simon’s or any Subsidiary REIT’s total assets may be represented by securities
(including securities of TRSs), other than those securities includable in the 75% asset test, and not more than 20%
of the value of our total assets or the assets of any Subsidiary REIT may be represented by securities of TRSs. We
anticipate that the aggregate value of the stock and securities of any TRS and other nonqualifying assets that
Simon or each such Subsidiary REIT owns will be less than 25% (or 20%, as applicable) of the value of Simon’s or
such subsidiary’s total assets, and we will monitor the value of these investments to ensure compliance with
applicable ownership limitations. In addition, we intend to structure transactions with any TRSs that we own to
ensure that they are entered into on arm’s length terms to avoid incurring the 100% excise tax described above.
There can be no assurance, however, that we will be able to comply with the above limitations or to avoid
application of the 100% excise tax discussed above.
Dividends payable by REITs generally do not qualify for the reduced tax rates available for some
dividends, which may negatively affect the value of our shares.
Income from “qualified dividends” payable to U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates are
generally subject to tax at preferential rates, currently at a maximum federal rate of 20%. Dividends payable by
REITs, however, generally are not eligible for the preferential tax rates applicable to qualified dividend income.
Under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or the TCJA, however, U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates
generally may deduct up to 20% of the ordinary dividends (e.g., dividends not designated as capital gain dividends
or qualified dividend income) received from a REIT for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017 and before
January 1, 2026. Although this deduction reduces the effective tax rate applicable to certain dividends paid by
REITs (generally to 29.6% assuming the shareholder is subject to the 37% maximum rate), such tax rate is still
higher than the tax rate applicable to corporate dividends that constitute qualified dividend income. Accordingly,
investors who are individuals, trusts and estates may perceive investments in REITs to be relatively less attractive
than investments in the stocks of non-REIT corporations that pay dividends, which could materially and adversely
affect the value of the shares of REITs, including the per share trading price of our common stock.
The tax imposed on REITs engaging in “prohibited transactions” may limit our ability to engage in
transactions which would be treated as sales for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
A REIT’s net income from prohibited transactions is subject to a 100% penalty tax. In general, prohibited
transactions are sales or other dispositions of property, other than foreclosure property, held primarily for sale to
customers in the ordinary course of business. Although we do not intend to hold any properties that would be
characterized as held for sale to customers in the ordinary course of our business, unless a sale or disposition
qualifies under certain statutory safe harbors, such characterization is a factual determination and no guarantee can
be given that the IRS, would agree with our characterization of our properties or that we will always be able to make
use of the available safe harbors.
REIT distribution requirements could adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to execute our
business plan.
In order for Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to qualify to be taxed as REITs, and assuming that certain other
requirements are also satisfied, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT generally must distribute at least 90% of
their respective REIT taxable income, determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding any
net capital gains, to their respective equity holders each year. To this point, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT
have historically distributed at least 100% of its taxable income and thereby avoided income tax altogether. To the
extent that Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT satisfies this distribution requirement and qualifies for taxation as a
REIT, but distributes less than 100% of its REIT taxable income, Simon or such subsidiary will be subject to U.S.
federal corporate income tax on its undistributed net taxable income and could be subject to a 4% nondeductible
excise tax if the actual amount that is distributed to equity holders in a calendar year is less than the minimum
required distribution amount. We intend to make distributions to the equity holders of Simon and the Subsidiary
REITs to comply with the REIT requirements of the Internal Revenue Code.
From time to time, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs might generate taxable income greater than their
respective cash flow as a result of differences in timing between the recognition of taxable income and the actual
receipt of cash or the effect of nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves, or required debt or
amortization payments. If Simon or the Subsidiary REITs do not have other funds available in these situations,
Simon or such subsidiaries could be required to access capital on unfavorable terms (the receipt of which cannot
be assured), sell assets at disadvantageous prices, distribute amounts that would otherwise be invested in future
acquisitions, capital expenditures or repayment of debt, or make taxable distributions of capital stock or debt
securities to make distributions sufficient to enable them to pay out enough of their respective REIT taxable income
to satisfy the REIT distribution requirement and avoid corporate income tax and the 4% excise tax in a particular
year. These alternatives could increase costs or reduce our equity. Further,
Table of Contents
22amounts distributed will not be available to fund the growth of our business. Thus, compliance with the REIT
requirements may adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to execute our business plan.
Complying with REIT requirements might cause us to forgo otherwise attractive acquisition
opportunities or liquidate otherwise attractive investments.
To qualify to be taxed as REITs for U.S. federal income tax purposes, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs must
ensure that, at the end of each calendar quarter, at least 75% of the value of their respective assets consist of cash,
cash items, government securities and “real estate assets” (as defined in the Internal Revenue Code), including
certain mortgage loans and securities. The remainder of their respective investments (other than government
securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS) generally cannot include more than 10% of
the outstanding voting securities of any one issuer or more than 10% of the total value of the outstanding securities
of any one issuer.
Additionally, in general, no more than 5% of the value of Simon’s and the Subsidiary REITs’ total assets
(other than government securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS) can consist of the
securities of any one issuer, and no more than 20% of the value of their respective total assets can be represented
by securities of one or more TRSs. If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fails to comply with these requirements
at the end of any calendar quarter, Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT must correct the failure within 30 days after
the end of the calendar quarter or qualify for certain statutory relief provisions to avoid losing its REIT qualification
and suffering adverse tax consequences. As a result, we might be required to liquidate or forgo otherwise attractive
investments. These actions could have the effect of reducing our income and amounts available for distribution to
equity holders. Moreover, if Simon or the Subsidiary REITs are compelled to liquidate their investments to meet any
of the asset, income or distribution tests, or to repay obligations to lenders, Simon or such subsidiaries may be
unable to comply with one or more of the requirements applicable to REITs or may be subject to a 100% tax on any
resulting gain if such sales constitute prohibited transactions.
In addition to the asset tests set forth above, to qualify to be taxed as REITs, Simon and the Subsidiary
REITs must continually satisfy tests concerning, among other things, the sources of their respective income, the
amounts they distribute to equity holders and the ownership of their respective shares. We might be unable to
pursue investments that would be otherwise advantageous to us in order to satisfy the source-of-income or asset-
diversification requirements for qualifying as REITs. Thus, compliance with the REIT requirements may hinder our
ability to make certain attractive investments.
Partnership tax audit rules could have a material adverse effect on us.
The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 changed the rules applicable to U.S. federal income tax audits of
partnerships. Under the rules, among other changes and subject to certain exceptions, any audit adjustment to
items of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a partnership (and any partner’s distributive share thereof) is
determined, and taxes, interest, or penalties attributable thereto could be assessed and collected, at the partnership
level. Absent available elections, it is possible that a partnership in which we directly or indirectly invest, could be
required to pay additional taxes, interest and penalties as a result of an audit adjustment, and we, as a direct or
indirect partner of these partnerships, could be required to bear the economic burden of those taxes, interest, and
penalties even though Simon and the Subsidiary REITs, as REITs, may not otherwise have been required to pay
additional corporate-level taxes had they owned the assets of the partnership directly. The partnership tax audit
rules apply to the Operating Partnership and its subsidiaries that are classified as partnerships for U.S. federal
income tax purposes. The changes created by these rules are sweeping and, accordingly, there can be no
assurance that these rules will not have a material adverse effect on us.
Legislative, administrative, regulatory or other actions affecting REITs, including positions taken by
the IRS, could have a material adverse effect on us and our investors.
The rules dealing with U.S. federal income taxation are constantly under review by persons involved in the
legislative process, and by the IRS and the U.S. Department of the Treasury, or the Treasury. Changes to the tax
laws or interpretations thereof by the IRS and the Treasury, with or without retroactive application, could materially
and adversely affect us and our investors. New legislation (including the TCJA, and any technical corrections
legislation), Treasury regulations, administrative interpretations or court decisions could significantly and negatively
affect the ability of Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership to qualify to be taxed as REITs
and/or the U.S. federal income tax consequences to us and our investors of such qualification.
The TCJA has significantly changed the U.S. federal income taxation of U.S. businesses and their owners,
including REITs and their stockholders. A change made by the TCJA that could affect us and our stockholders is
that it generally limits the deduction for net business interest expense in excess of 30% of a business’s adjusted
taxable income except for taxpayers that engage in certain real estate businesses and elect out of this rule
(provided that such electing taxpayers must use an alternative depreciation system for certain property).
Table of Contents
23Risks Relating to Joint Ventures
We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or managed by third
parties, which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
As of December 31, 2020, we owned interests in 101 income-producing properties with other parties. Of
those, 17 properties are included in our consolidated financial statements. We account for the other 84 properties,
or the joint venture properties, as well as our investments in HBS Global Properties, or HBS, Klépierre (a publicly
traded, Paris-based real estate company), and The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, as well as our retailer
investments in Authentic Brands Group, LLC, or ABG, Forever 21, J.C. Penney, Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, and
SPARC Group, using the equity method of accounting. We serve as general partner or property manager for 57 of
these 84 joint venture properties; however, certain major decisions, such as approving the operating budget and
selling, refinancing, and redeveloping the properties, require the consent of the other owners. Of the joint venture
properties for which we do not serve as general partner or property manager, 23 are in our international joint
ventures. These international properties are managed locally by joint ventures in which we share control of the
properties with our partner. The other owners have participating rights that we consider substantive for purposes of
determining control over the joint venture properties’ assets. The remaining joint venture properties, HBS, Klépierre,
TRG, and our joint ventures with ABG, Forever 21, J.C. Penney, RGG, and SPARC Group are managed by third
parties.
These investments, and other future similar investments, could involve risks that would not be present were
a third party not involved, including the possibility that partners or other owners might become bankrupt, suffer a
deterioration in their creditworthiness, or fail to fund their share of required capital contributions. If one of our
partners or other owners in these investments were to become bankrupt, we may be precluded from taking certain
actions regarding our investments without prior court approval, which at a minimum may delay the actions we would
or might want to take. Additionally, partners or other owners could have economic or other business interests or
goals that are inconsistent with our own business interests or goals, and could be in a position to take actions
contrary to our policies or objectives.
These investments, and other future similar investments, also have the potential risk of creating impasses on
decisions, such as a sale, financing or development, because neither we nor our partner or other owner has full
control over the partnership or joint venture. Disputes between us and partners or other owners might result in
litigation or arbitration that could increase our expenses and prevent Simon’s officers and/or directors from focusing
their time and efforts on our business. Consequently, actions by, or disputes with, partners or other owners might
result in subjecting properties owned by the partnership or joint venture to additional risk. In addition, we risk the
possibility of being liable for the actions of our partners or other owners.  
The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of joint
venture properties.
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by a mortgage on the joint
venture property, which is non-recourse to us. Nevertheless, the joint venture’s failure to satisfy its debt obligations
could result in the loss of our investment therein. As of December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership guaranteed
joint venture-related mortgage indebtedness of $219.2 million. A default by a joint venture under its debt obligations
would expose us to liability under a guaranty. We may elect to fund cash needs of a joint venture through equity
contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although
such fundings are not typically required contractually or otherwise.  
Risks Relating to Environmental Matters
As owners of real estate, we can face liabilities for environmental contamination, and our efforts to
identify environmental liabilities may not be successful.
Many of our properties contain, or at one time contained, asbestos containing materials or underground
storage tanks (primarily related to auto service center establishments or emergency electrical generation
equipment), and as a result we may be subject to regulatory action in connection with U.S. federal, state and local
laws and regulations relating to hazardous or toxic substances. We may also be held liable to third parties for
personal injury or property damage incurred by the parties in connection with any such substances. The costs of
investigation, removal or remediation of hazardous or toxic substances, and related liabilities, may be substantial
and could materially and adversely affect us. The presence of
Table of Contents
24hazardous or toxic substances, or the failure to remediate the related contamination, may also adversely affect our
ability to sell, lease or redevelop a property or to borrow money using a property as collateral.
Although we believe that our portfolio is in substantial compliance with U.S. federal, state and local
environmental laws and regulations regarding hazardous or toxic substances, this belief is based on limited testing.
Nearly all of our properties have been subjected to Phase I or similar environmental audits. These environmental
audits have not revealed, nor are we aware of, any environmental liability that we believe is reasonably likely to
have a material adverse effect on us. However, we cannot assure you that:
●previous environmental studies with respect to the portfolio reveal all potential environmental liabilities;
●any previous owner, occupant or tenant of a property did not create any material environmental condition
not known to us;
●the current environmental condition of the portfolio will not be affected by tenants and occupants, by the
condition of nearby properties, or by other unrelated third parties; or
●future uses or conditions (including, without limitation, changes in applicable environmental laws and
regulations or the interpretation thereof) will not result in environmental liabilities.
We face risks associated with climate change.
Due to changes in weather patterns caused by climate change, our properties in certain markets could
experience increases in storm intensity and rising sea levels. Over time, climate change could result in volatile or
decreased demand for retail space at certain of our properties or, in extreme cases, our inability to operate the
properties at all. Climate change may also have indirect effects on our business by increasing the cost of (or
making unavailable) insurance on favorable terms, or at all, increasing the cost of energy at our properties or
requiring us to spend funds to repair and protect our properties against such risks. Moreover, compliance with new
laws or regulations related to climate change, including compliance with “green” building codes, may require us to
make improvements to our existing properties or increase taxes and fees assessed on us or our properties.
Some of our properties are subject to potential natural or other disasters.
A number of our properties are located in areas subject to a higher risk of natural disasters such as
earthquakes, fires, hurricanes, floods, tornados, hail or tsunamis. The occurrence of natural disasters, which could
become more intense and more volatile in light of climate change, can adversely impact operations and
development/redevelopment projects at our properties, increase investment costs to repair or replace damaged
properties, increase future property insurance costs and negatively impact the tenant demand for lease space. If
insurance is unavailable to us or is unavailable on acceptable terms, or our insurance is not adequate to cover
losses from these events, we could be materially and adversely affected.
Other Factors Affecting Our Business
Some of our potential losses may not be covered by insurance.
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific
layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss
insurance on all of our properties in the United States. The initial portion of coverage not provided by third-party
carriers is either insured through our wholly-owned captive insurance company or other financial arrangements
controlled by us. A third party carrier has, in turn, agreed to provide, if required, evidence of coverage for this layer
of losses under the terms and conditions of the carrier’s policy. A similar policy either written through our captive
insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us also provides initial coverage for property
insurance and certain windstorm risks at the properties located in coastal windstorm locations.
There are some types of losses, including lease and other contract claims, which generally are not insured
or are subject to large deductibles. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs, we could lose all
or a portion of the capital we have invested in a property, as well as the anticipated future revenue it could generate
but may remain obligated for any mortgage debt or other financial obligation related to the property.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United
States on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any
threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could materially and adversely affect us.
Table of Contents
25We face risks associated with security breaches through cyber ‑attacks, cyber intrusions or
otherwise, as well as other significant disruptions of our information technology (IT) networks and
related systems.
Our IT networks and related systems are essential to the operation of our business and our ability to perform
day-to-day operations and, in some cases, may be critical to the operations of certain of our tenants. We face risks
associated with security breaches, whether through cyber-attacks or cyber intrusions over the Internet, malware,
computer viruses, hardware or software corruption or failure or poor product or vendor/developer selection
(including a failure of security controls incorporated into or applied to such hardware or software), service provider
error or failure, intentional or unintentional actions by employees (including the failure to follow our security
protocols) and other significant disruptions of our IT networks and related systems. Although we make efforts to
maintain the security and integrity of these types of IT networks and related systems, and we have implemented
various measures to manage the risk of a security breach or disruption, there can be no assurance that our security
efforts and measures will be effective or that attempted security breaches or disruptions would not be successful or
damaging. Even the most well protected information, networks, systems and facilities remain potentially vulnerable
because the techniques used in such attempted security breaches evolve and generally are not recognized until
launched against a target, and in some cases are designed not to be detected and, in fact, may not be detected.
Accordingly, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate security barriers or other
preventative measures, and thus it is impossible for us to entirely mitigate this risk.
The risk of a security breach or significant disruption has generally increased due to our increased reliance
on technology, a rise in the number, intensity, and sophistication of attempted attacks globally, and the remote
working environment throughout the COVID-19 pandemic. A breach or significant and extended disruption in the
functioning of our systems, including our primary website, could damage our reputation and cause us to lose
customers, tenants and revenues, generate third party claims, cause operational disruption, result in the unintended
and/or unauthorized public disclosure or the misappropriation of proprietary, personal identifying and confidential
information, and require us to incur significant expenses to address and remediate or otherwise resolve these kinds
of issues. We may not be able to recover these expenses in whole or in any part from our service providers or
responsible parties, or their or our insurers. Additionally, cyber-attacks perpetrated against our tenants, including
unauthorized access to customers’ credit card data and other confidential information, could diminish consumer
confidence and spending and materially and adversely affect us.
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to attract and retain talented employees, and the loss of
any one of our key personnel could adversely impact our business.
The success of our business depends, in part, on the leadership and performance of our executive
management team and key employees, including our CEO, who operate without the existence of employment
agreements.  Many of our senior executives have extensive experience and strong reputations in the real estate
industry, which aid us in identifying opportunities and negotiating with tenants. Our ability to attract, retain and
motivate talented employees could significantly impact our future performance. Competition for these individuals is
intense, and we cannot assure you that we will retain our executive management team and other key employees or
that we will be able to attract and retain other highly qualified individuals for these positions in the future. Losing any
one or more of these persons could adversely affect our business, diminish our opportunities and weaken our
relationships with lenders, business partners, existing and prospective tenants and others, which could have a
material adverse effect on us.
Table of Contents
26Provisions in Simon’s charter and by ‑laws and in the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement
could prevent a change of control.
Simon’s charter contains a general restriction on the accumulation of shares in excess of 8% of its capital
stock. The charter permits the members of the Simon family and related persons to own up to 18% of Simon’s
capital stock. Ownership is determined by the lower of the number of outstanding shares, voting power or value
controlled. Simon’s Board of Directors may, by majority vote, permit exceptions to those levels in circumstances
where Simon’s Board of Directors determines that Simon’s ability to qualify as a REIT will not be jeopardized.
These restrictions on ownership may have the effect of delaying, deferring or preventing a transaction or a change
in control that might otherwise be in the best interest of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s
unitholders or preferred unitholders. Other provisions of Simon’s charter and by-laws could have the effect of
delaying or preventing a change of control even if some of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s
unitholders or preferred unitholders deem such a change to be in their best interests. These include provisions
preventing holders of Simon’s common stock from acting by written consent and requiring that up to four directors
in the aggregate may be elected by holders of Class B common stock. In addition, certain provisions of the
Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement could have the effect of delaying or preventing a change of control.
These include a provision requiring the consent of a majority in interest of units in order for Simon, as general
partner of the Operating Partnership, to, among other matters, engage in a merger transaction or sell all or
substantially all of its assets.    
Item 1B.  Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Table of Contents
27Item 2.  Properties
United States Properties
Our U.S. properties primarily consist of malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail
properties. These properties contain an aggregate of approximately 179.9 million square feet of gross leasable
area, or GLA.
Malls typically contain at least one department store anchor or a combination of anchors and big box
retailers with a wide variety of smaller stores connecting the anchors. Additional stores are usually located along the
perimeter of the parking area. Our 99 malls are generally enclosed centers and range in size from approximately
260,000 to 2.7 million square feet of GLA.
Premium Outlets generally contain a wide variety of designer and manufacturer stores located in open-air
centers. Our 69 Premium Outlets range in size from approximately 150,000 to 900,000 square feet of GLA. The
Premium Outlets are generally located within a close proximity to major metropolitan areas and/or tourist
destinations.
The 14 properties in The Mills generally range in size from 1.2 million to 2.3 million square feet of GLA and
are located in major metropolitan areas. They have a combination of traditional mall, outlet center, big box retailers
and entertainment uses.
We also have interests in four lifestyle centers and 17 other retail properties. The lifestyle centers range in
size from 170,000 to 930,000 square feet of GLA. The other retail properties range in size from approximately
160,000 to 1.7 million square feet of GLA and are considered non-core to our business model.
As of December 31, 2020, approximately 91.3% of the owned GLA in malls and Premium Outlets was
leased and approximately 95.3% of the owned GLA for The Mills was leased.
We wholly own 133 of our properties, effectively control 11 properties in which we have a joint venture
interest, and hold the remaining 59 properties through unconsolidated joint venture interests. We are the managing
or co-managing general partner or member of 199 properties in the United States. Certain of our joint venture
properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and call rights, or other sale or
marketing rights for partners which are customary in real estate partnership agreements and the industry. We and
our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar
restrictions) which may result in either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or borrowings, or the use
of Operating Partnership units, to acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
We own an 80% noncontrolling interest in TRG, which has an interest in 20 regional, super-regional, and
outlet malls in the U.S. Our effective ownership in these properties, through our investment in TRG, ranges from
38.8% to 80%. These properties are excluded from the following table.
  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
28The following property table summarizes certain data for our malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail
properties located in the United States, including Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2020.
Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
Malls
1.Apple Blossom Mall  VA Winchester  Fee   49.1 % (4) Acquired
1999  78.2 %  473,874  Belk, JCPenney , AMC Cinemas
2.Auburn Mall  MA  Auburn  Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  87.5 %  499,481  Macy's, Reliant Medical (15)
3.Aventura Mall (1)  FL Miami Beach
(Miami) Fee   33.3 % (4) Built 1983   91.9 %  2,126,428  Bloomingdale's, Macy's (8), JCPenney ,
Nordstrom, Equinox Fitness Clubs, AMC
Theatres
4.Barton Creek Square  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 1981   95.0 %  1,452,291  Nordstrom, Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney ,
AMC Theatres
5.Battlefield Mall  MO  Springfield  Fee and Ground Lease
(2056)  100.0 % Built 1970   92.1 %  1,203,129  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney
6.Bay Park Square  WI Green Bay  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   94.5 %  682,401  Kohl's, Marcus Cinema 16, Dave & Buster's (6),
Steinhafel Furniture (6)
7.Brea Mall  CA  Brea (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  90.6 %  1,281,891  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , LifeT ime (6)
8.Briarwood Mall  MI Ann Arbor  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  82.0 %  977,986  Macy's, JCPenney , Von Maur , Hilton Garden
Inn (15), Towne Place Suites by Marriott (15)
9.Brickell City Centre  FL Miami  Fee   25.0 % (4) Built 2016   87.6 %  476,247  Saks Fifth Avenue, Cinemex, EAST  Miami Hotel
(15), La Centrale
10.Broadway Square  TX Tyler  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1994  96.3 %  604,726  Dillard's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
HomeGoods, Party City
11.Burlington Mall  MA  Burlington
(Boston) Fee and Ground Lease
(2026) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  91.5 %  1,183,394  Macy's, Nordstrom, Crate & Barrel, Primark,
Arhaus Furniture
12.Cape Cod Mall  MA  Hyannis  Fee and Ground
Leases (2029-2073) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  85.6 %  709,052  Macy's (8), Best Buy, Marshalls, Barnes &
Noble, Regal Cinema, Target, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Planet Fitness
13.Castleton Square  IN Indianapolis  Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   95.5 %  1,384,538  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
14.Cielo V ista Mall  TX El Paso  Fee and Ground Lease
(2027) (7)  100.0 % Built 1974   98.5 %  1,244,342  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears,
Cinemark Theatres
15.Coconut Point  FL Estero  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2006   82.7 %  1,205,043  Dillard's, Barnes & Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond
(13), Best Buy, DSW, Office Max, PetSmart,
Ross, T.J. Maxx, Hollywood Theatres, Super
Target, Michael's, Total Wine & More, Tuesday
Morning, JoAnn Fabrics, Hyatt Place Coconut
Point (15), TownePlace Suites by Marriott (15)
16.College Mall  IN Bloomington  Fee and Ground Lease
(2048) (7)  100.0 % Built 1965   85.0 %  609,768  Macy's (13), Target, Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed
Bath & Beyond, Ulta, Fresh Thyme
17.Columbia Center  WA Kennewick  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  85.6 %  815,026  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Barnes & Noble, DSW ,
Home Goods, Dick's Sporting Goods
18.Copley Place  MA  Boston  Fee   94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2002  95.4 %  1,263,379  Neiman Marcus, Saks Fifth Avenue Men's,
Boston Marriott Copley Place (15), The Westin
Copley Place (15)
19.Coral Square  FL Coral
Springs
(Miami) Fee   97.2 % Built 1984   89.7 %  943,878  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
20.Cordova Mall  FL Pensacola  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  92.7 %  926,430  Dillard's, Belk, Best Buy, Bed Bath & Beyond,
Cost Plus World Market, Ross, Dick's Sporting
Goods
21.Dadeland Mall  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  98.4 %  1,499,420  Saks Fifth Avenue , Macy's (8), JCPenney , AC
Hotel by Marriott (6)
22.Del Amo Fashion Center  CA  Torrance
(Los
Angeles) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  86.6 %  2,519,111  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Marshalls,
Barnes & Noble, JoAnn Fabrics, AMC Theatres,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Dave & Buster's,
Mitsuwa Marketplace
23.Domain, The  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   90.5 %  1,236,690  Neiman Marcus, Macy's, Dillard's, Dick's
Sporting Goods, iPic Theaters, Arhaus
Furniture, Punch Bowl Social, Westin Austin at
The Domain, Lone Star Court (15), (16)
24.Empire Mall  SD  Sioux Falls  Fee and Ground Lease
(2033) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  86.0 %  1,124,686  Macy's, JCPenney , Hy-V ee, Dick's Sporting
Goods
25.Falls, The  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  89.4 %  708,956  Macy's, Regal Cinema, The Fresh Market,
LifeT ime Athletic (6)
26.Fashion Centre at Pentagon
City, The VA Arlington
(Washington,
DC) Fee   42.5 % (4) Built 1989   87.4 %  1,037,237  Nordstrom, Macy's, The Ritz-Carlton (15)
27.Fashion Mall at Keystone,
The IN Indianapolis  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1997  92.0 %  716,466  Saks Fifth Avenue, Crate & Barrel, Nordstrom,
Keystone Art Cinema, Sheraton (15)
28.Fashion V alley  CA  San Diego  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2001 96.1 %  1,731,260  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres, Forever 21,
The Container Store
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
29Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
29.Firewheel Town Center  TX Garland
(Dallas) Fee   100.0 % Built 2005   89.9 %  996,273  Dillard's, Macy's, Barnes & Noble, DSW , AMC
Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods, Kids
Empire/Hapik, Fairfield Inn by Marriott (14),
(16)
30.Florida Mall, The  FL Orlando  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 1986   92.5 %  1,725,099  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, H&M,
Forever 21, Zara, American Girl, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Crayola Experience, The
Florida Hotel and Conference Center (15)
31.Forum Shops at Caesars
Palace, The NV  Las V egas  Ground Lease (2050)   100.0 % Built 1992   96.8 %  660,240  Caesars Palace Las Vegas Hotel and Casino
(15)
32.Galleria, The  TX Houston  Fee   50.4 % (4) Acquired
2002  93.9 %  2,017,029  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom,
Macy's, The Westin Galleria (15), The Westin
Oaks (15), Life Time Tennis
33.Greenwood Park Mall  IN Greenwood
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1979  94.0 %  1,288,889  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Regal Cinema, Dave
& Buster's
34.Haywood Mall  SC  Greenville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  91.5 %  1,237,560  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Belk
35.Ingram Park Mall  TX San Antonio  Fee   100.0 % Built 1979   91.7 %  1,125,358  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney
36.King of Prussia  PA King of
Prussia
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2003  92.4 %  2,669,368  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Lord & Taylor (13), Macy's, Arhaus Furniture,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Primark
37.La Plaza Mall  TX McAllen  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1976   94.6 %  1,312,890  Macy's (8), Dillard's, JCPenney , CUT! by
Cinemark (6), Wingate by W yndham (15)
38.Lakeline Mall  TX Cedar Park
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 1995   94.4 %  1,099,057  Dillard's (8), Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres
39.Lehigh V alley Mall  PA Whitehall  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  91.3 %  1,193,515  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, Barne s & Noble,
Michael's, Dave & Buster's
40.Lenox Square  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  97.0 %  1,556,507  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Macy's, JW
Marriott (15), Hyatt Centric (14)
41.Livingston Mall  NJ Livingston
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  88.6 %  968,748  Macy's, Lord & Taylor (13), Barnes & Noble
42.Mall at Rockingham Park,
The NH  Salem
(Boston) Fee   28.2 % (4) Acquired
1999  94.9 %  1,064,794  JCPenney , Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Cinemark Theatre
43.Mall of Georgia  GA  Buford
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Built 1999   94.8 %  1,840,162  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Belk, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Barnes & Noble, Havertys
Furniture, Regal Cinema, V on Maur
44.Mall of New Hampshire,
The NH  Manchester  Fee and Ground Lease
(2024-2027) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  93.8 %  803,935  Macy's, JCPenney , Best Buy, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Dave & Buster's
45.McCain Mall  AR  N. Little Rock  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   93.9 %  793,612  Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
46.Meadowood Mall  NV  Reno  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  94.5 %  928,920  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Crunch Fitness, Round 1
47.Menlo Park Mall  NJ Edison (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  88.8 %  1,331,615  Nordstrom, Macy's, Barnes & Noble, AMC
Dine-In Theatre
48.Miami International Mall  FL Miami  Fee   47.8 % (4) Built 1982   94.5 %  1,082,921  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
49.Midland Park Mall  TX Midland  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   97.2 %  643,847  Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Ross, Dick's Sporting
Goods
50.Miller Hill Mall  MN  Duluth  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   91.7 %  829,775  JCPenney , Barnes & Noble, DSW , Dick's
Sporting Goods, Essentia Health West,
Essentia Health East
51.Montgomery Mall  PA North W ales
(Philadelphia) Fee   79.4 % Acquired
2003  73.5 %  1,102,298  Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Wegmans
52.North East Mall  TX Hurst (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Built 1971   93.7 %  1,667,775  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Cinemark Theatres
53.Northgate  WA Seattle  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  —(17)  416,014 (17)Barnes & Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond, DSW ,
Nordstrom Rack, NHL  Seattle (6)
54.Northshore Mall  MA  Peabody
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  90.4 %  1,504,635  JCPenney , Nords trom, Macy's (8), Barnes &
Noble, Shaw's Grocery , The Container Store,
Tesla Sales and Service, Life Time Athletic (6)
55.Ocean County Mall  NJ Toms River
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  85.7 %  876,479  Macy's, Boscov's, JCPenney , LA Fitness,
HomeSense (6), Ulta
56.Orland Square  IL Orland Park
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  93.5 %  1,229,917  Macy's, JCPenney , Dave & Buster's, V on Maur
57.Oxford V alley Mall  PA Langhorne
(Philadelphia) Fee   85.5 % Acquired
2003  75.5 %  1,340,622 Macy's, JCPenney , United Artists Theatre
58.Penn Square Mall  OK  Oklahoma
City Ground Lease (2060)   94.5 % Acquired
2002  90.1 %  1,083,717  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC Theatres,
The Container Store
59.Pheasant Lane Mall  NH  Nashua  -   —%
(12)Acquired
2002  96.4 %  979,534  JCPenney , Target, Macy's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
30Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
60.Phipps Plaza  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  89.1 %  760,105  Saks Fifth Avenue, Nordstrom, AMC Theatres,
Arhaus Furniture, Legoland Discovery Center ,
AC Hotel by Marriott, Life Time Athletic (6), Life
Time Work (6), Nobu Hotel and Restaurant (6),
(16)
61.Plaza Carolina  PR  Carolina (San
Juan) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.3 %  1,157,667  JCPenney , Sears (13), Tiendas Capri, Econo,
T.J. Maxx, Caribbean Cinemas
62.Prien Lake Mall  LA Lake Charles  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1972   89.9 %  842,763  Dillard's, JCPenney , Cinemark Theatres,
Kohl's, Dick's Sporting Goods, T.J.
Maxx/HomeGoods
63.Quaker Bridge Mall  NJ Lawrenceville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  87.3 %  1,081,115  Macy's, Lord & Taylor (13), JCPenney
64.Rockaway Townsquare  NJ Rockaway
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  79.5 %  1,246,023  Macy's, JCPenney , Raymour & Flanigan
65.Roosevelt Field  NY  Garden City
(New York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2090) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  95.0 %  2,346,122  Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's,
JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods, AMC
Entertainment, XSport Fitness, Neiman
Marcus, Residence Inn by Marriott
66.Ross Park Mall  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Built 1986   92.8 %  1,234,352  JCPenney , Nordstrom, L.L. Bean, Macy's (8),
Crate & Barrel
67.Santa Rosa Plaza  CA  Santa Rosa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  84.5 %  693,475  Macy's, Forever 21
68.Shops at Chestnut Hill, The MA  Chestnut Hill
(Boston) Fee   94.4 % Acquired
2002  94.8 %  470,073  Bloomingdale's (8)
69.Shops at Clearfork, The  TX Fort W orth  Fee   45.0 % (4) Built 2017   84.5 %  549,182  Neiman Marcus, Arhaus Furniture, AMC
Theatres, Pinstripes, (16)
70.Shops at Crystals, The  NV  Las V egas  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2016  84.9 %  270,588  Aria Resort and Casino (15)
71.Shops at Nanuet, The  NY  Nanuet  Fee   100.0 % Redeveloped
2013  78.5 %  757,952  Regal Cinema, 24 Hour Fitness, At Home (6),
Stop & Shop (6)
72.Shops at Mission V iejo, The CA  Mission V iejo
(Los Angeles) Fee   51.0 % (4) Built 1979   92.6 %  1,235,577  Nordstrom, Macy's  (8), Dick's Sporting Goods
(6)
73.Shops at Riverside, The  NJ Hackensack
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  87.0 %  707,520  Bloomingdale's, Barnes & Noble, Arhaus
Furniture, AMC Theatres
74.Smith Haven Mall  NY  Lake Grove
(New York) Fee   25.0 % (4)
(2)Acquired
1995  88.2 %  1,296,751  Macy's (8), Dick's Sporting Goods, Barnes &
Noble, L.L. Bean
75.Solomon Pond Mall  MA  Marlborough
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  79.6 %  886,397  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Regal Cinema
76.South Hills V illage  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  89.2 %  1,128,979  Macy's (8), Barnes & Noble, AMC Cinemas,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Target, DSW , Ulta
77.South Shore Plaza  MA  Braintree
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  93.4 %  1,590,606  Macy's, Sears, Nordstrom, Target, Primark
78.Southdale Center  MN  Edina
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  85.8 %  1,246,313  Macy's, AMC Theatres, Dave & Buster's,
Restoration Hardware, Life Time Athletic, Life
Time Work/Sport, Homewood Suites  by Hilton,
(16)
79.SouthPark  NC  Charlotte  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (9)  100.0 % Acquired
2002  96.4 %  1,684,900  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Macy's, Dillard's,
Belk, Dick's Sporting Goods, Crate & Barrel,
The Container Store, Reid's Fine Foods &
Wine Bar (15), (16)
80.Springfield Mall (1)  PA Springfield
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2005  81.1 %  610,066  Macy's, Target
81.St. Charles Towne Center  MD  Waldorf
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Built 1990   76.2 %  980,342  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
82.St. Johns Town Center  FL Jacksonville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2005   95.2 %  1,453,557  Nordstrom, Dillard's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Barnes & Noble, Restoration
Hardware (6), Homewood Suites by Hilton
(15),
 Target, Ashley Furniture Home Store, Ross,
Staples (13), DSW , JoAnn Fabrics, PetsMart
83.Stanford Shopping Center  CA  Palo Alto
(San Jose) Ground Lease (2064)   94.4 %
(11)Acquired
2003  93.9 %  1,288,019  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom,
Macy's, Crate and Barrel, The Container Store,
Restoration Hardware (6)
84.Stoneridge Shopping
Center CA  Pleasanton
(San
Francisco) Fee   49.9 % (4) Acquired
2007  95.7 %  1,299,690  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Arhaus Furniture (6)
85.Summit Mall  OH  Akron  Fee   100.0 % Built 1965   89.4 %  776,843  Dillard's (8), Macy's, Arhaus Furniture
86.Tacoma Mall  WA Tacoma
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  92.8 %  1,240,441  Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Marcus Cinema (6), Nordstrom Rack
(6), Total Wine and More (6), Ulta (6)
87.Tippecanoe Mall  IN Lafayette  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   84.4 %  864,844  Macy's, JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
31Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
88.Town Center at Boca Raton  FL Boca Raton
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.9 %  1,778,863  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus,
Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's, Crate &
Barrel, The Container Store, Joseph's Classic
Market, Arhaus Furniture (6)
89.Towne East Square  KS Wichita  Fee   100.0 % Built 1975   99.4 %  1,144,884  Dillard's, V on Maur , JCPenney , Round 1
90.Treasure Coast Square  FL Jensen
Beach Fee   100.0 % Built 1987   88.7 %  876,234  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
91.Tyrone Square  FL St.
Petersburg
(Tampa) Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   89.0 %  960,570  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , DSW , Cobb 10
Luxury Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Hitchcock's Green Market, PetSmart
92.University Park Mall  IN Mishawaka  Fee   100.0 % Built 1979   84.7 %  918,320  Macy's, JCPenney , Barnes & Noble
93.Walt Whitman Shops  NY  Huntington
Station (New
York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2032) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  91.3 %  1,084,579  Saks Fifth Avenue, Bloomingdale’ s, Macy’ s
94.West Town Mall  TN Knoxville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2042)  50.0 % (4) Acquired
1991  93.6 %  1,281,753  Belk (8), Dillard’ s, JCPenney , Regal Cinebarre
Theatre, Dick's Sporting Goods (6), Tesla Sales
and Service (6)
95.Westchester , The  NY  White Plains
(New York) Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  84.3 %  806,086  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Crate and Barrel
96.White Oaks Mall  IL Springfield  Fee   80.7 % Built 1977   76.8 %  942,836  Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods, LA Fitness,
Michael's
97.Wolfchase Galleria  TN Memphis  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  95.0 %  1,151,336  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Malco Theatres,
Courtyard by Marriott (14)
98.Woodfield Mall  IL Schaumburg
(Chicago) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012  91.2 %  2,155,042  Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Arhaus
Furniture, P AC-MAN Entertainment
99.Woodland Hills Mall  OK  Tulsa  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  93.2 %  1,096,430  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Holiday Inn
Express (15), Courtyard by Marriott (15)
Total Mall GLA  111,905,430 (18)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
32Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
Premium Outlets
1.Albertville Premium Outlets  MN Albertville
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  85.6 %  337,689  Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spad e New York,
Lululemon, Michae l Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
The North Face, Under Armour
2.Allen Premium Outlets  TX Allen (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.5 %  544,216  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Giorgio Armani, J.Cre w, Kate Spade
New York, Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Staybridge Suites (14), The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
3.Aurora Farms Premium
Outlets OH Aurora
(Cleveland) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  92.5 %  271,533  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The
North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
4.Birch Run Premium Outlets  MI Birch Run
(Detroit) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  93.5 %  593,911  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn/Williams-Sonoma Outlet, Tommy
Hilfiger , The North Face, Under Armour
5.Camarillo Premium Outlets  CA Camarillo (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  92.1 %  686,115  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Giorgio Armani, H&M, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Michae l Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
6.Carlsbad Premium Outlets  CA Carlsbad (San
Diego) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.7 %  289,210  Adidas, Barneys New York Warehouse, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Crate & Barrel, Gap Outlet, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tory Burch, Under Armour
7.Carolina Premium Outlets  NC Smithfield
(Raleigh) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  91.0 %  438,752  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
8.Charlotte Premium Outlets  NC Charlotte  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2014   95.1 %  398,331  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportswe ar, Gap Outlet,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
9.Chicago Premium Outlets  IL Aurora
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Built 2004   88.1 %  687,357  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Laure n, Restoration
Hardware, Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Under Armour
10.Cincinnati Premium Outlets  OH Monroe
(Cincinnati) Fee   100.0 % Built 2009   87.0 %  398,958  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
11.Clarksburg Premium Outlets  MD Clarksburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee   66.0 %
(4)Built 2016   89.9 % 390,147  Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange, Adidas,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Express, Kate Spade New York, Lafayette 148 New
York, Marc Jacobs , Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour , Vince
12.Clinton Crossing Premium
Outlets CT Clinton  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.5 % 276,117  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
13.Denver Premium Outlets  CO Thornton
(Denver) Fee   100.0 % Built 2018   97.4 % 328,100  Adidas, A/X Arman i Exchange, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Gap Outlet, H&M,  Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard Vines, Staybridge
Suites (15)
14.Desert Hills Premium Outlets  CA Cabazon (Palm
Springs) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.5 % 655,225  Agent Provocateur , Alexander McQueen, Armani
Outlet, Balenciaga , Bottega Veneta, Brioni, Brunello
Cucinelli, Burberry , Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna,
Fendi, Gucci, Jimmy Choo, Loro Piana, Marc
Jacobs, Moncler , Mulberry , Neima n Marcus Last
Call, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prad a, Saint Laurent
Paris, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Stuart W eitzman, Tory Burch, V alentino
15.Ellenton Premium Outlets  FL Ellenton (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  91.6 % 477,119  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
16.Folsom Premium Outlets  CA Folsom
(Sacramento) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  87.1 % 297,933  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Mich ael Kors, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
17.Gilroy Premium Outlets  CA Gilroy (San
Jose) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  85.8 % 578,505  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spad e New York, Lululemon, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
33Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
18.Gloucester Premium Outlets  NJ Blackwood
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2015   88.7 % 378,506  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess,
Levi's, J. Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , Vera Bradley
19.Grand Prairie Premium
Outlets TX Grand Prairie
(Dallas) Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   93.7 % 423,640  Banana Republic, Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Kate Spade New
York, J.Crew, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
20.Grove City Premium Outlets  PA Grove City
(Pittsburgh) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  86.8 % 530,727  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
21.Gulfport Premium Outlets  MS Gulfport  Ground Lease (2059)   100.0 % Acquired
2010  89.7 % 300,055  Banana Republic, Chico's, Coach , Gap Outlet,
H&M, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
22.Hagerstown Premium
Outlets MD Hagerstown
(Baltimore/
Washington, DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  62.1 % 485,591  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, New Balance,
The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
23.Houston Premium Outlets  TX Cypress
(Houston) Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   95.7 % 542,472  Ann Taylor , A/X Armani Exchange, Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Giorgio Arma ni, Holiday Inn
Express (15), Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfige r, Tory Burch,
Victoria's Secret
24.Indiana Premium Outlets  IN Edinburgh
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  93.2 % 378,029  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
25.Jackson Premium Outlets  NJ Jackson (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  84.9 % 285,560  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
26.Jersey Shore Premium
Outlets NJ Tinton Falls
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   95.1 % 434,491  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Burberry ,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Cre w, Kate Spade New York, Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
27.Johnson Creek Premium
Outlets WI Johnson Creek  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  86.8 % 277,672  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Gap Outlet,
Loft Outlet, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
28.Kittery Premium Outlets  ME Kittery  Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  86.8 % 259,334  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Express Factory
Outlet, Gap Outle t, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
New Balance, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Swarovski,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tumi
29.Las Americas Premium
Outlets CA San Diego  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  94.7 % 553,993  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Giorgio Armani,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
30.Las V egas North Premium
Outlets NV Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Built 2003   94.7 % 676,270  All Saints, Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Banana Republic,  Burberry , Canali, CH Carolina
Herrera, Cheesecake Factory , Coach, David
Yurman, Dolce & Gabbana, Etro, Jimmy Choo, John
Varvatos, Lululem on, Kate Spade New York, Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Roberto Cavalli, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Shake Shack, Tory Burch
31.Las V egas South Premium
Outlets NV Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.6 %  535,721  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
32.Lee Premium Outlets  MA Lee  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  89.7 %  224,756  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet , J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Levi's, Loft Outle t, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
34Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
33.Leesburg Premium Outlets  VA Leesburg
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.8 %  478,218  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outle t, A/X Armani
Exchange, Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Coach,
Design Within Reach, Kate Spade New York, Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Restoration Hardware, Salvatore Ferragamo, Tory
Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard Vines, Williams-
Sonoma
34.Lighthouse Place Premium
Outlets IN Michigan City
(Chicago, IL) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  87.9 %  454,778  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, H&M , J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
35.Merrimack Premium Outlets  NH Merrimack  Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   98.1 %  408,892  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Barbour ,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coac h, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
36.Napa Premium Outlets  CA Napa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  83.2 %  179,427  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger
37.Norfolk Premium Outlets  VA Norfolk  Fee   65.0 %
(4)Built 2017   86.1 %  332,281  A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswea r, Gap Outlet,
H&M, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tory Burch, Under Armour
38.North Bend Premium Outlets  WA North Bend
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  84.9 %  223,621  Banana Republic, Coach, Gap Outlet, Levi's, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Skechers,
Under Armour
39.North Georgia Premium
Outlets GA Dawsonville
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  89.8 % 540,802  Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Crew, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Michae l Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Pottery Barn, The North Face, Tomm y Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, W est Elm, Williams-Sonoma
40.Orlando International
Premium Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  99.2 % 773,380  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Carhartt,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , H&M ,  J.Crew , Karl
Lagerfeld, Kate Spade New York,Marc Jacobs,
Michael Kors, Nike, Panera Brea d, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
41.Orlando V ineland Premium
Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  99.4 % 656,753  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outlet,  Bally , Bottega
Veneta, Brunello Cucinelli, Burberr y, Calvin Klein,
Carolina Herrera, Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna,
Jimmy Choo, John Varvatos, Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Prada,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Roberto Cavalli, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragam o, TAG Heuer ,
The North  Face, Tod's, Tommy Hilfig er, Tory Burch,
Under Armour
42.Petaluma V illage Premium
Outlets CA Petaluma (San
Francisco) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  82.6 % 201,948  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Tommy Hilfiger
43.Philadelphia Premium
Outlets PA Limerick
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Built 2007   91.3 % 549,155  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess,
H&M, J.Crew, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Restoration Hardwa re, The North
Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
44.Phoenix Premium Outlets  AZ Chandler
(Phoenix) Ground Lease (2077)   100.0 % Built 2013   94.9 %  356,509  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswea r, Gap Factory
Store, Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tumi, Under Armour
45.Pismo Beach Premium
Outlets CA Pismo Beach Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  85.1 %  147,403  Calvin Klein, Coach, Guess, Kate Spade New York,
Levi's, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Van Heusen
46.Pleasant Prairie Premium
Outlets WI Pleasant Prairie
(Chicago, IL/
Milwaukee) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  93.6 %  402,412  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, J.Crew ,
Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy  Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
47.Puerto Rico Premium Outlets  PR Barceloneta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  94.7 % 349,884  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Disney Store Outlet,
Gap Outlet, Invicta, Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy
Hilfiger
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
35Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
48.Queenstown Premium
Outlets MD Queenstown
(Baltimore) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  89.5 % 289,682  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, St. John, Tommy
Bahama, Under Armour
49.Rio Grande V alley Premium
Outlets TX Mercedes
(McAllen) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   85.1 % 603,929  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani
Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M, Kate
Spade New York, Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike,
Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy  Hilfiger , Under
Armour
50.Round Rock Premium
Outlets TX Round Rock
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   97.3 % 498,387  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Duluth Trading
Company , Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , (16)
51.San Francisco Premium
Outlets CA Livermore (San
Francisco) Fee and Ground Lease
(2021) (9)  100.0 % Built 2012   97.1 % 696,873  All Saints, Arc'teryx, Athleta, A/X Armani Exchange,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Bottega Veneta,
Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , CH Carolina Herrera,
Coach, Ermenegi ldo Zegna, Etro, Furla, Gucci,
H&M, Jimmy Choo, John Varvato s, Kate Spade
New York, Lacoste, Longchamp, MaxMara, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prad a, Roger Vivier,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Sandro & Maje,
Salvatore Ferraga mo, Stuart Weitzman, The North
Face, Tod's, Tory Burch, Under Armour , Versace,
Zadig et V oltaire
52.San Marcos Premium
Outlets TX San Marcos
(Austin/ San
Antonio) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  88.1 % 735,171  Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,  Burberry , CH
Carolina Herrera, Etro, Gucci, J. Crew , Jimmy
Choo, Kate Spade  New York, Laco ste, Lululemon,
Neiman Marcus Last Call, Marc Jacobs, Michael
Kors, Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren , Pottery Barn,
Prada, Restoration Hardware, Saint Laurent Paris,
Salvatore Ferraga mo, Stuart Weitzman, The North
Face, Tommy Bahama, Tory Burch, Versace,
Vineyard V ines
53.Seattle Premium Outlets  WA Tulalip (Seattle)  Ground Lease (2079)   100.0 % Built 2005   97.4 % 554,532  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet,
Banana Republic, Burberry , Calvin  Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
St. John, Stuart Weitzman, The North Face, Tommy
Bahama, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
54.Silver Sands Premium
Outlets FL Destin  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Acquired
2012  91.4 % 450,954  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Unde r Armour , Vera
Bradley
55.St. Augustine Premium
Outlets FL St. Augustine
(Jacksonville) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.3 % 327,720  Adidas,  Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet,  J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
56.St. Louis Premium Outlets  MO  St. Louis
(Chesterfield) Fee   60.0 %
(4)Built 2013   93.1 %  351,425  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap
Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's,
Michael Kors, Nike, Puma, Tomm y Hilfiger , Ugg,
Under Armour , Vera Bradley
57.Tampa Premium Outlets  FL Lutz (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   98.6 %  459,694  Adidas, A/X Arma ni Outlet, Banana Republic, BJ's
Restaurant and Brewhouse, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap
Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lucky
Brand, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tumi, Under Armour
58.Tanger Outlets - Columbus
(1) OH Sunbury
(Columbus) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2016   94.7 %  355,254  Banana Republic,  Brooks Brothers, Coach, Kate
Spade New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Under
Armour
59.Tanger Outlets -
Galveston/Houston (1) TX Texas City  Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2012   91.8 %  352,705  Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Mich ael Kors, Nike,
Tommy Hilfiger
60.The Crossings Premium
Outlets PA Tannersville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2029) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.5 %  411,766  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Johnny
Rockets, Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
36Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name State City (CBSA) Lease) (3) Ownership AcquiredOccupancy
(5)  Total GLA   Selected T enants
61.Tucson Premium Outlets  AZ Marana (T ucson)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   79.9 %  363,456  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Godiva, Guess, Johnny
Rockets, Levi’s, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
62.Twin Cities Premium Outlets  MN Eagan  Fee   35.0 %
(4)Built 2014   90.4 %  408,925  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin  Klein, Coach,
Gap Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue
Off 5th, Talbots,  Under Armour
63.Vacaville Premium Outlets  CA Vacaville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  89.6 %  447,273  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour , West Elm Outlet
64.Waikele Premium Outlets  HI Waipahu
(Honolulu) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  92.8 %  219,485  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outlet , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Furla, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Swarovski, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch
65.Waterloo Premium Outlets  NY Waterloo  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  81.5 %  421,436  American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Chico’s, Coach,
Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
66.Williamsburg Premium
Outlets VA Williamsburg  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  93.9 %  522,562  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor ,
Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft
Outlet, Michael Kors, New Balance, Nike, Pandora,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, The North Face,
Timberland, Tommy Bahama, Tomm y Hilfiger , Under
Armour , Vera Bradley , Vineyard V ines
67.Woodburn Premium Outlets  OR Woodburn
(Portland) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2013  93.5 %  389,513  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, J. Crew , Levi's, Michael Kors,
Nike, The North Face, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
68.Woodbury Common
Premium Outlets NY Central V alley
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.1 %  909,425  Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Balenciaga, Balmain,
Bottega Veneta, Breitling, Brioni, Brunello Cucinelli,
Burberry , Canali, Celine, Chloe, Coach, Dior, Dolce
& Gabbana, Dunhill, Fendi, Givenchy , Golden
Goose, Gucci, Jimmy Choo, Lacoste, Loewe,
Longchamp, Loro Piana, Marc Jacobs, Michael
Kors, Moncler , Mulberry , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Prada, Saint Laurent, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Salvatore Ferraga mo, Santoni, Shake Shack, Stone
Island, Stuart Weitzman, Theory , Tod's, Tom Ford,
Tory Burch, V alentino, V ersace, Zegna
69.Wrentham V illage Premium
Outlets MA Wrentham
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  93.8 %  672,869  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers,
Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, David Yurman,
Gucci, Karl Lage rfeld, Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Lululemon, Marc Jacobs,  Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Puma, Restoration
Hardware, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Theo ry, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
Total U.S. Premium Outlets
GLA 30,434,534
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
37Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
The Mills
1.Arizona Mills  AZ Tempe
(Phoenix) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  88.2 %  1,224,704  Marshalls, Burlington, Ross, Harkin s Cinemas &
IMAX, Sea Life Center , Conn's, Legoland,  Forever
21, dd's Discou nts (6), Overtime by Dick's
Sporting Goods, Rainforest Café
2.Arundel Mills  MD  Hanover
(Baltimore) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  97.1 %  1,929,910  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Best Buy,
Burlington, Dave & Buster's, Medieva l Times, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Off Broadway Shoe
Warehouse, T.J. Maxx, Cinemark  Egyptian 24
Theatres, Maryland Live! Casino, Forever 21, Ulta,
Live! Hotel (14)
3.Colorado Mills  CO Lakewood
(Denver) Fee   37.5 % (4) Acquired
2007  86.1 %  1,416,322  Forever 21, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse,
Super Target, United Artists Theatre, Burlington,
H&M, Dick's Sporting Goods, Springhill Suites (15)
4.Concord Mills  NC Concord
(Charlotte) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  97.5 %  1,369,966  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington, Dave
& Buster's, Nike Factory Store, Off Broadway
Shoes, AMC Theatres, Best Buy, Forever 21, Sea
Life Center , H&M, Dick's Sporting Goods (6)
5.Grapevine Mills  TX Grapevine
(Dallas) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.1 % 1,781,214  Burlington, Marsh alls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
AMC Theatres, Sun & Ski Sports, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Legoland Discovery Center, Sea Life
Center , Ross, H&M, Round 1 Entertainment,
Fieldhouse USA, Rainforest Café, Springhill Suites
(15), Hyatt Place (15), Hawthorn (15)
6.Great Mall  CA Milpitas (San
Jose) Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2007  98.4 % 1,368,462  Camille La Vie, Kohl's, Dave & Buster's,
Burlington, Marsh alls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Nike Factory Store , Century Theatres, Bed Bath &
Beyond, Dick's Sporting Goods, Legoland
Discovery Center (6)
7.Gurnee Mills  IL Gurnee
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  90.0 % 1,734,951  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath &
Beyond/Buy Buy Baby , Burlington, Kohl's,
Marshalls Home Goods, Marcus Cinemas, Value
City Furniture, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse,
Macy's, Floor & Decor , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Rainforest Café, The Room Place
8.Katy Mills  TX Katy
(Houston) Fee   62.5 % (4)
(2)Acquired
2007  91.9 % 1,787,611  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Books-A-Million,
Burlington, Marsh alls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Sun & Ski Sports, AMC Theatres, Tilt, Ross, H&M,
RH Outlet, Rainforest Café
9.Mills at Jersey Gardens, The NJ Elizabeth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  91.1 % 1,304,609  Burlington, Cohoes, Forever 21, AMC Theatres,
Marshalls, Nike Factory Store, Saks 5th Avenue
Off 5th, H&M, Tommy Hilfiger , Residence Inn (15),
Courtyard by Marriott (15), Embassy Suites (15),
Country Inn & Suites (15)
10.Ontario Mills  CA Ontario
(Riverside) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  100.0 % 1,422,344  Burlington, Nike Factory Store, Marshalls, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nordstrom Rack, Dave &
Buster's, Camille La Vie, Sam Ash Music, AMC
Theatres, Forever 21, Uniqlo, Skechers
Superstore, Rainforest Café, Aki Home
11.Opry Mills  TN Nashville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.7 % 1,169,158  Regal Cinema & IMAX, Dave & Buster's, Sun &
Ski, Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Forever 21,
H&M, Madame Tussauds, Rainforest Café,
Aquarium Restaurant
12.Outlets at Orange, The  CA Orange (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.0 %  866,975  Dave & Buster ’s, Vans Skatepark, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, AMC Theatres, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Nordstrom Rack, Bloomingdale's the
Outlet Store, Guitar Center , Nike Factory Store
13.Potomac Mills  VA Woodbridge
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 96.8 %  1,553,574  Marshalls, T.J. Maxx, JCPenney , Burlington,
Nordstrom Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th Outlet,
Costco Warehouse, AMC Theatres,
Bloomingdale's Outlet, Buy Buy Baby/and That!,
Round 1
14.Sawgrass Mills  FL Sunrise
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 92.6 % 2,327,229  Bed Bath & Beyond, BrandsMart USA, Burlington,
Marshalls, Neiman  Marcus Last Call, Nordstrom
Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Super Target,
T.J. Maxx , Regal Cinema, Bloomingdale's Outlet,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Primark, AC Hotel by
Marriott (6)
Total Mills Properties GLA 21,257,029
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
38Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
Lifestyle Centers
1.ABQ Uptown  NM Albuquerque  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2011 96.1 % 229,511  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
2.Hamilton Town Center  IN Noblesville
(Indianapolis) Fee   50.0 %
(4)Built 2008  88.3 % 675,179  JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed Bath &
Beyond, DSW
3.Pier Park  FL Panama City
Beach Fee   65.6 %
(4)Built 2008  94% 947,994  Dillard's, JCPenney , Target, Grand Theatres,
Ron Jon Surf Shop, Margaritaville, Marshalls,
Dave & Buster's, Skywheel
4.University Park V illage  TX Fort W orth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  96.9 % 169,992  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
Total Lifestyle Centers
GLA 2,022,676
Other Properties
1 - 15. Other Properties  11,385,786  
16 - 17. TMLP  Acquired
2007 2,913,461  
Total Other GLA 14,299,247 (18)
Total U.S. Properties GLA 179,918,916
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
39FOOTNOTES:
(1)This property is managed by a third party .
(2)Our direct and indirect interests in some of the properties held as joint venture interests are subject to preferences on distributions in favor of other
partners or us.
(3)The date listed is the expiration date of the last renewal option available to the operating entity under the ground lease. In a majority of the ground leases,  
we have a right to purchase the lessor ’s interest under an option, right of first refusal or other provision.  Unless otherwise indicated, each ground lease  
listed in this column covers at least 50% of its respective property .
(4)Joint venture properties accounted for under the equity method.
(5)Malls - Executed leases for all company-owned GLA  in mall stores, excluding majors and anchors. Premium Outlets and The Mills - Executed leases for
all company-owned GLA  (or total center GLA).
(6)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction or has announced plans for development.
(7)Indicates ground lease covers less than 50% of the acreage of this property .
(8)Tenant has multiple locations at this center .
(9)Indicates ground lease covers outparcel only .
(10)Tenant has an existing store at this center but will move to a new location.
(11)We receive substantially all the economic benefit of the property due to a preference or advance.
(12)We own a mortgage note that encumbers Pheasant Lane Mall that entitles us to 100% of the economics of this property .
(13)Indicates anchor has announced its intent to close this location.
(14)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction by a third party .
(15)Owned by a third party .
(16)Includes multi-family tenant on-site.
(17)This property is undergoing significant renovation.
(18)GLA includes of fice space.  Centers with more than 75,000 square feet of of fice space are listed below:
Circle Centre - 104,944 sq. ft.
Copley Place - 893,439 sq. ft.
Domain, The - 156,240 sq. ft.
Fashion Centre at Pentagon City , The - 169,089 sq. ft.
Oxford V alley Mall - 139,701 sq. ft.
Shops at Clearfork, The - 146,571 sq. ft.
Southdale Center - 102,400 sq. ft.
Table of Contents
40United States Lease Expirations
The following table summarizes lease expiration data for our U.S. malls and Premium Outlets, including
Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2020. The data presented does not consider the impact of renewal options that
may be contained in leases and excludes data related to TRG.
U.S. MALLS AND PREMIUM OUTLETS LEASE EXPIRATIONS (1)
Avg. Base Percentage of Gross
Number of Minimum Rent Annual Rental
Year Leases ExpiringSquare FeetPSF at 12/31/2020 Revenues (2)
Inline Stores and Freestanding
Month to Month Leases  995  3,463,698 $  56.04  3.7%
2021  2,392  8,635,941 $  50.52  8.0%
2022  2,561  9,658,952 $  50.16  9.2%
2023  2,325  9,254,119 $  59.14  8.9%
2024  1,785  7,076,454 $  59.86  7.8%
2025  1,561  6,100,909 $  63.53  7.4%
2026  1,246  5,046,888 $  61.22  5.8%
2027  924  3,621,868 $  65.80  4.5%
2028  810  3,543,203 $  61.61  4.1%
2029  697  3,025,932 $  66.61  3.5%
2030  437  2,085,678 $  64.17  2.3%
2031 and Thereafter  323  2,169,536 $  42.04  1.8%
Specialty Leasing Agreements w/ terms
in excess of 12 months  1,865  4,898,558 $  16.47  1.6%
Anchors
Month to Month Leases  1  138,409 $  1.18 0.0%
2021  2  158,266 $  3.73 0.0%
2022  10 1,408,024 $  4.22  0.1%
2023  17 2,381,099 $  6.00  0.3%
2024  18 1,565,287 $  8.59  0.3%
2025  17 1,676,634 $  6.72  0.2%
2026  14 1,660,628 $  4.50  0.1%
2027  6  920,224 $  4.16  0.1%
2028  8  707,745 $  8.27  0.1%
2029  4  511,660 $  2.44 0.0%
2030  8  824,573 $  8.52  0.1%
2031 and Thereafter  19 1,749,992 $  12.09  0.4%
(1)Does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be contained in leases.
(2)Annual rental revenues represent domestic 2020 consolidated and joint venture combined base rental revenue.
Table of Contents
41International Properties
Our ownership interests in properties outside the United States are primarily owned through joint venture
arrangements.  With the exception of our Premium Outlets in Canada, all of our international properties are
managed by related parties.  
European Investments
At December 31, 2020, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.4%, of Klépierre, which had a
quoted market price of $22.55 per share. Klépierre is a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which
owns, or has an interest in shopping centers located in 15 countries.
As of December 31, 2020, we had a controlling interest in a European investee with interests in ten Designer
Outlet properties. Nine of the outlet properties are located in Europe and one outlet property is located in Canada.
Of the nine properties in Europe, two are in Italy, two are in the Netherlands, and one each is in Austria, France,
Germany, Spain and the United Kingdom. As of December 31, 2020, our legal percentage ownership interests in
these entities ranged from 45% to 94%.
We own a 14.6% interest in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own and operate nine luxury
outlets throughout Europe. We also have a minority direct ownership in three of those outlets.
Other International Investments
We hold a 40% interest in nine operating joint venture properties in Japan, a 50% interest in four operating
joint venture properties in South Korea, a 50% interest in two operating joint venture properties in Mexico, a 50%
interest in two operating joint venture properties in Malaysia, a 50% interest in one operating joint venture in
Thailand, and a 50% interest in three Premium Outlet operating joint venture properties in Canada. The nine
Japanese Premium Outlets operate in various cities throughout Japan and comprise over 3.6 million square feet of
GLA and were 99.5% leased as of December 31, 2020.
Our investment in TRG includes an interest in four operating joint venture properties located outside of the
U.S.; two located in the People’s Republic of China and two located in South Korea. Our effective ownership in
these centers, through our investment in TRG, ranges from 13.7% to 39.2%.
The following property tables summarize certain data for our international properties as of December 31,
2020 and do not include our equity investments in Klépierre, TRG, or our investment in Value Retail PLC and
affiliated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
42     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year BuiltLeasable Area
(1) Selected T enants  
INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM
OUTLETS
JAPAN
 1.Ami Premium Outlets Ami (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2009  315,000 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,
TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger
2.Gotemba Premium Outlets
(2)Gotemba City
(Tokyo)Fee  40.0 %  2000  659,500 Adidas, Armani, Balenciaga, Bally , Beams, Bottega
Veneta, Burberry , Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Gap
Outlet, Gucci, Loro Piana, Michael Kors, Moncler , Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, Puma, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Tod's, Tory Burch, United Arrows
Phase 4 -
2020
3.Kobe-Sanda Premium
OutletsHyougo-ken
(Osaka)Ground Lease
(2026) 40.0 %  2007  441,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams, Coac h, Dolce & Gabbana,
Gap Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , United
Arrows, V alentino
4.Rinku Premium Outlets (2) Izumisano (Osaka) Ground Lease
(2031) 40.0 %  2000  512,500 Adidas, Armani, Bally, Beams, Brooks Brothers, Burberry ,
Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Eddie Bauer , Furla,
Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Lanvin Collection,
Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Salvatore Ferragamo, TaylorMade, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows, Zara
Phase 5 -
2020
5.Sano Premium Outlets Sano (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2003  390,800 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Dunhill, Eddie Bauer , Etro, Furla,
Gap Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, Salvatore
Ferragamo, TaylorMade
6.Sendai-Izumi Premium
OutletsIzumi Park Town
(Sendai)Ground Lease
(2027) 40.0 %  2008  164,200 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
7.Shisui Premium Outlets Shisui (Chiba),
JapanGround Lease
(2033) 40.0 %  2013  434,600 Adidas, Beams, Citizen, Coach, Dunhill, Furla, Gap, Kate
Spade New York, Marmot, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Samsonite, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
8.Toki Premium Outlets Toki (Nagoya) Ground Lease
(2033) 40.0 %  2005  367,700 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
9.Tosu Premium Outlets Fukuoka (Kyushu) Fee  40.0 %  2004  328,400 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
Subtotal Japan 3,613,700
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
43     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
MEXICO
10.Punta Norte Premium Outlets Mexico City Fee  50.0 %  2004  333,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, CH Carolina
Herrera, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Kate
Spade New York, Nautica, Nike, Palacio
Outlet, Salvatore Ferragamo, Zegna
11.Premium Outlets Querétaro Querétaro Fee  50.0 %  2019  274,800 Adidas, Adrianna Papell, Calvin Klein,
Guess, Levi's, Nike, Tommy Hilfiger , True
Religion, Under Armour
Subtotal Mexico  607,800
SOUTH KOREA
12.Yeoju Premium Outlets Yeoju (Seoul) Fee  50.0 %  2007  551,600 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Chloe, Coach,
Fendi, Gucci, Michael Kors, Nike,  Polo
Ralph Lauren, Prada, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Tod's, Under Armour ,
Valentino, V ivienne W estwood
13.Paju Premium Outlets Paju (Seoul) Ground Lease (2040)  50.0 %  2011  558,900 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Jill Stuart, Lanvin Collection,  Marc
Jacobs, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Tory Burch, Under Armour ,
Vivienne W estwood
14.Busan Premium Outlets Busan Fee  50.0 %  2013  360,200 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger
15.Siehung Premium Outlets Siehung Fee  50.0 %  2017  444,400 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo, The North
Face, Under Armour
Subtotal South Korea  1,915,100
MALA YSIA
16.Johor Premium Outlets Johor (Singapore) Fee  50.0 %  2011  309,400 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach,
DKNY , Furla, Gucci, Guess, Michael  Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Puma,
Salvatore Ferraga mo, Timberland, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Zegna
17.Genting Highlands Premium Outlets Kuala Lumpur Fee  50.0 %  2017  277,500 Adidas, Coach, Furla, Kate Spade  New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Padini,  Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma
Subtotal Malaysia  586,900
THAILAND
18.Siam Premium Outlets Bangkok Bangkok Fee  50.0 %  2020  264,000 Adidas, Balenciage, Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Coach, Furla, Kate Spade  New
York, Nike, Skechers, Under Armour
Subtotal Thailand  264,000
CANADA
19.Toronto Premium Outlets Toronto (Ontario) Fee  50.0 %  2013  504,600 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Eddie Bauer , Gap, Gucci, Guess,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour
20.Premium Outlets Montreal Montreal (Quebec) Fee  50.0 %  2014  367,400 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap,  Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo,
The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
21.Premium Outlet Collection
Edmonton International AirportEdmonton (Alberta) Ground Lease (2072)  50.0 %  2018  422,600 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Factory ,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Subtotal Canada  1,294,600
TOTAL INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM OUTLETS  8,282,100
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
44     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
INTERNA TIONAL  DESIGNER OUTLETS
AUSTRIA                             
1.Parndorf Designer Outlet  Vienna Fee  90.0 %  2005  118,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Burberry ,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Dolce &
Gabbana, Furla, Geox, Gucci,
Guess, Michael Kors, Moncler , Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Porsche Design,
Prada, Puma, Tommy Hilfiger ,
 Zegna
Subtotal Austria  118,000
ITALY
2.La Reggia Designer Outlet (3)  Marcianise (Naples) Fee  90.0 %  2010  288,000 Adidas, Armani,  Calvin Klein,
Coach, Guess, Liu Jo, Michael Kors,
Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger
3.Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet  Venice Fee  90.0 %  2008  353,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Bottega
Veneta, Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Dolce & Gabanna, Fendi,
Furla, Gucci, Loro Piana, Michael
Kors, Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Sergio Rossi,T ommy
Hilfiger , Valentino, V ersace, Zegna
Subtotal Italy  641,000
NETHERLANDS
4.Roermond Designer Outlet Phases 2 & 3  Roermond Fee  90.0 %  2005  173,000 Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Coach, Furla, Gucci, Michael
Kors, Moncler , Mulberry , Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Swarovski, Tod's,
Tommy Hilfiger , UGG, Zegna
5.Roermond Designer Outlet Phase 4 Roermond Fee  46.1 % 2017  125,000 Adidas, Karl Lagerfield, Liu Jo,
Longchamp, Tag Heuer , Tom Tailor,
Woolrich
6.Designer Outlet Roosendaal Roosendaal Fee  94.0 % 2017  247,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Esprit, Guess,
Nike, Puma, S. Oliver , Tommy
Hilfiger
Subtotal Netherlands  545,500
UNITED KINGDOM
7.Ashford Designer Outlet  Kent Fee  45.0 %  2000  281,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Clarks, Fossil,
French Connection, Gap, Guess,
Kate Spade New York, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Superdry , Tommy
Hilfiger
Subtotal England  281,000
CANADA
8.Vancouver Designer Outlets  Vancouver Ground Lease (2072)  45.0 %  2015  326,000 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Subtotal Canada  326,000
GERMANY
9.Ochtrup Designer Outlets Ochtrup Fee 70.5 % 2016  191,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Guess, Lindt,
Nike, Puma, Samsonite, Schiesser ,
Seidensticker , Steiff, Tom Tailor,
Vero Moda
Subtotal Germany  191,500
FRANCE
10.Provence Designer Outlet Miramas Fee 90.0 % 2017  269,000 Armani, Calvin Klein, Guess,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Prada, Timberland,
Tommy Hilfiger
Subtotal France  269,000
SPAIN
11.Málaga Designer Outlet Málaga Fee 46.1 % 2020  191,000 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Furla, Guess, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Subtotal Spain  191,000
Total International Designer Outlets  2,563,000
FOOTNOTES:
(1)All gross leasable area listed in square feet.
(2)Property completed an expansion in 2020.
(3)Property is undergoing an expansion.
Table of Contents
45Land
We have direct or indirect ownership interests in approximately 186 acres of land held in the United States
and Canada for future development.
Sustainability
At Simon, we define and implement sustainability and ESG initiatives into all aspects of our business; from
how we plan, develop, and operate our properties, to how we do business with our customers, engage with our
communities, and create a healthy, safe, productive, and positive work environment for our employees. Our
sustainability framework focuses on four key areas: Customers, Communities, Environment, and Employees.
The health and safety of all who work in and visit our properties has and continues to be our top priority, and
in 2020, our Sustainability office enrolled and successfully achieved the International WELL Building Institute’s
(IWBI) third party verified WELL Health-Safety Rating for Facility Operations and Management for over 200
properties in our portfolio. This rating was earned primarily as a result of our first in class emergency management
programs, and the implementation of Simon’s rigorous COVID-19 exposure mitigation protocols. Simon will
continue to go above and beyond to ensure that all occupants in our centers can feel confident that Simon is
working hard to protect them. To learn more about our Health-Safety efforts and rating visit: www.simon.com/health.
 Since 2003, we have measured our environmental impact and leveraged sustainability to reduce this impact
while achieving cost efficiencies in our operations by implementing a range of energy management practices, and
continuous energy monitoring and reporting. As a result, we have reduced our energy consumption every year
since 2003. In this period, excluding new developments, we have reduced the energy usage over which we have
direct control, by 354 million kWh, representing a 33% reduction across a portfolio of comparable properties. In
recent years, we have ramped up these efforts, and from 2013-2019 have achieved an energy use reduction of 182
million kWh, representing a 20% reduction in a six-year period, accounting for 51% of total reductions achieved
since 2003.
Our reduction in greenhouse gas emissions resulting from our energy management efforts since 2003 is
312,067 metric tons of CO2e. This figure represents a reduction of 54% and includes emission streams scope 1
and  scope 2. Enhanced efforts from 2013-2019 have resulted in emissions reduction of 125,457 metric tons of
CO2e. This represents a 32% reduction in a six-year period, accounting for 40% of total reductions achieved since
2003. Additional emission streams, such as scope 3 emissions generated from tenants’ plug-load consumptions,
are included in Simon’s annual sustainability report published in accordance with the guidelines of the Global
Reporting Initiatives (GRI), the most widely used international standard for sustainability reporting.
We are also focused on reducing our water usage, and in 2019, achieved a reduction of 5.4% in water use.
We have reduced water consumption by 1.5 million gallons, representing an 18% reduction since 2015, and are on
track to meet our 2025 20% reduction target ahead of time.
In 2020, Simon announced new 2035 emissions targets approved by the Science Based Target Initiative
(SBTi). Our commitment is to reduce scope 1 and scope 2 emissions by 68% (2019 baseline), and scope 3,
including tenant emissions by 21% (2018 baseline). We have also aligned our climate-related risk disclosure with
the recommendations made by the Task Force on Climate Related Financial Disclosures (TCFD), established by
the Financial Stability Board (FSB). To learn more and access the full report visit:
investors.simon.com/sustainability.
Simon’s sustainability performance has been recognized by international organizations. In 2020, Simon
participated in CDP’s annual climate change questionnaire and received an A score, earning a prestigious place on
CDP’s climate change ‘A List’ that represents results achieved by only 270 of the 5,800+ (<5%) reporting
organizations globally. Simon was also awarded a Green Star ranking - the designation awarded for leadership in
sustainability performance by the Global Real Estate Sustainability Benchmark (GRESB).
Mortgages and Unsecured Debt
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the mortgages encumbering our properties, and
the properties held by our domestic and international joint venture arrangements, and also our unsecured corporate
debt, excluding TRG. Substantially all of the mortgage and property related debt is nonrecourse to us.  
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Consolidated Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:
Arizona Mills   
5.76%  $ 145,874 $12,247 07/01/21
Battlefield Mall   
3.95%   112,707  6,908 09/01/22
Birch Run Premium Outlets   
4.21%   123,000  5,263 (2)02/06/26
Calhoun Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   17,941 
(19)  1,140 06/01/26
Carolina Premium Outlets   
3.36%   41,757  2,672 12/01/22
Domain, The   
5.44%   176,533 14,066 08/01/21
Ellenton Premium Outlets   
4.30%   178,000  7,779 (2)12/01/25
Empire Mall   
4.31%   183,782 11,290 12/01/25
Florida Keys Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   17,001  720 (2)12/01/25
Gaffney Outlet Marketplace   
4.17%   28,981 
(19)  1,839 06/01/26
Grand Prairie Premium Outlets   
3.66%   109,122  6,588 04/01/23
Grove City Premium Outlets   
4.31%   140,000  6,133 (2)12/01/25
Gulfport Premium Outlets   
4.35%   50,000  2,211 (2)12/01/25
Gurnee Mills   
3.99%   253,708 16,156 (2)10/01/26
Hagerstown Premium Outlets   
4.26%   73,314  4,548 02/06/26
Ingram Park Mall   
5.38%   122,251  9,732 06/01/21
La Reggia Designer Outlet Phases 1 & 2   
2.25%   
(25)  159,432 
(30)  7,889 02/15/22
Lee Premium Outlets   
4.17%   49,504 
(19)  3,331 06/01/26
Merrimack Premium Outlets   
3.78%   116,398  7,238 07/01/23
Midland Park Mall   
4.35%   71,822  5,072 09/06/22
Mills at Jersey Gardens, The   
3.38%   (1)  355,000 14,111 (2)11/09/25(3)
Montgomery Mall   
4.57%   100,000  4,646 (2)05/01/24
Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet Phases 1, 2, 3, 4   
1.95%   343,042 
(30)  6,130 (2)07/25/25
Opry Mills   
4.09%   375,000 15,601 (2)07/01/26
Outlets at Orange, The   
4.22%   215,000  9,218 (2)04/01/24
Oxford Valley Mall   
4.77%   32,779 (8)  4,310 12/07/20
Parndorf Designer Outlet   
2.00%   226,896 
(30)  4,268 (2)07/04/29
Penn Square Mall   
3.84%   310,000 12,109 (2)01/01/26
Phipps Plaza Hotel   
1.89%   (1)  25,000  603 (2)10/25/26
Pismo Beach Premium Outlets   
3.33%   34,329 
(20)  1,423 09/06/26
Plaza Carolina   
1.24%   (1)  225,000  3,925 (2)07/27/21
Pleasant Prairie Premium Outlets   
4.00%   145,000  5,889 (2)09/01/27
Potomac Mills   
3.46%   416,000 14,623 (2)11/01/26
Provence Designer Outlet   
1.60%   
(33)  100,445 
(30)  1,756 (2)07/27/22(3)
Puerto Rico Premium Outlets   
1.24%   (1)  160,000  2,816 (2)07/26/21
46Queenstown Premium Outlets   
3.33%   60,308 
(20)  2,494 09/06/26
Roermond Designer Outlet   
1.78%   282,085 
(30)  4,847 (2)12/18/21
Roosendaal Designer Outlets   
1.75%   
(24)  72,342 
(30)  2,692 02/25/24(3)
Shops at Chestnut Hill, The   
4.69%   120,000  5,718 (2)11/01/23
Shops at Riverside, The   
3.37%   130,000  4,455 (2)02/01/23
Southdale Center   
3.84%   138,131  8,703 04/01/23
Southridge Mall   
3.85%   112,087  6,802 06/06/23
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Summit Mall   
3.31%   85,000  2,864 (2)10/01/26
The Crossings Premium Outlets   
3.41%   103,304  6,123 12/01/22
Town Center at Cobb   
4.76%   180,376  9,968 05/01/22
University Park Village   
3.85%   54,425  2,685 05/01/28
White Oaks Mall   
2.89%   
(28)  46,915  2,261 06/01/24(3)
Williamsburg Premium Outlets   
4.23%   185,000  7,954 (2)02/06/26
Wolfchase Galleria 
4.15%   155,152  7,563 (2)11/01/26
Total Consolidated Secured Indebtedness $ 6,959,743
Unsecured Indebtedness:
Simon Property Group, L.P.  
Global Commercial Paper - USD   
0.29%   
(16)  623,020   1,779 (2)02/19/21
Revolving Credit Facility - USD   
0.84%   
(15)  125,000   1,050 (2)06/30/25(3)
Term Facility - USD 
0.85%   
(15)  2,000,000 
(35) 17,000 (2)06/30/23(3)
Unsecured Notes - 22C   
6.75%   600,000  40,500 (14)02/01/40
Unsecured Notes - 25C   
4.75%   550,000  26,125 (14)03/15/42
Unsecured Notes - 26B   
2.75%   500,000  13,750 (14)02/01/23
Unsecured Notes - 27B   
3.75%   600,000  22,500 (14)02/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28A   
3.38%   900,000 30,375 (14)10/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28B   
4.25%   400,000 17,000 (14)10/01/44
Unsecured Notes - 29B   
3.50%   1,100,000  38,500 (14)09/01/25
Unsecured Notes - 30A   
2.50%   550,000 
(35) 13,750 (14)07/15/21
Unsecured Notes - 30B   
3.30%   800,000  26,400 (14)01/15/26
Unsecured Notes - 31A   
2.35%   550,000  12,925 (14)01/30/22
Unsecured Notes - 31B   
3.25%   750,000  24,375 (14)11/30/26
Unsecured Notes - 31C   
4.25%   550,000  23,375 (14)11/30/46
Unsecured Notes - 32A   
2.63%   600,000  15,750 (14)06/15/22
Unsecured Notes - 32B   
3.38%   750,000  25,313 (14)06/15/27
Unsecured Notes - 33A   
2.75%   600,000  16,500 (14)06/01/23
Unsecured Notes - 33B   
3.38%   750,000  25,313 (14)12/01/27
Unsecured Notes - 34A   
2.00%   1,000,000  20,000 (14)09/13/24
Unsecured Notes - 34B   
2.45%   1,250,000  30,625 (14)09/13/29
Unsecured Notes - 34C   
3.25%   1,250,000  40,625 (14)09/13/49
Unsecured Notes - 35A 
2.65%   750,000 19,875 (14)07/15/30
Unsecured Notes - 35B 
3.80%   750,000 28,500 (14)07/15/50
Unsecured Notes - Euro 2   
1.38%   919,850 
(13) 12,648 (6)11/18/22
Unsecured Notes - Euro 3 
1.25%   613,232 
(10)  7,665 (6)05/13/25
Total Consolidated Unsecured Indebtedness $19,831,102
Total Consolidated Indebtedness at Face Amounts $26,790,845
47Premium on Indebtedness   35,077
Discount on Indebtedness   (54,199)
Debt Issuance Costs   (113,132)
Other Debt Obligations   64,770 
(18)
Total Consolidated Indebtedness $26,723,361
Our Share of Consolidated Indebtedness $26,542,123
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Joint Venture Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:  
Ami Premium Outlets   
1.64%  $  35,097 
(26)$ 8,882 09/25/23
Arundel Mills   
4.29%    383,500  16,717 (2)02/06/24
Ashford Designer Outlet   
3.08%   
(27)  136,504 
(21)  4,210 (2)02/22/22
Aventura Mall   
4.12%    1,750,000  73,324 (2)07/01/28
Avenues, The   
3.60%    110,000   4,026 (2)02/06/23
Briarwood Mall   
3.29%    165,000   5,522 (2)09/01/26
Busan Premium Outlets   
3.04%    100,274 
(17)  2,855 (2)06/20/23
Cape Cod Mall 
5.75%   84,739  6,995 03/06/21
Charlotte Premium Outlets   
4.27%    100,000   4,297 (2)07/01/28
Circle Centre   
2.89%   (1)  63,500   2,696 12/06/24(3)
Clarksburg Premium Outlets   
3.95%    160,000   6,325 (2)01/01/28
Coconut Point   
3.95%    182,775  10,812 10/01/26
Colorado Mills - 1   
4.28%    128,913   8,050 11/01/24
Colorado Mills - 2   
5.04%    25,083   1,811 07/01/21
Concord Mills   
3.84%    235,000   9,165 (2)11/01/22
Crystal Mall   
4.46%    84,074   5,743 06/06/22
Dadeland Mall   
4.50%    392,014  26,975 12/05/21
Dadeland Mall Hotel   
2.49%   (1)  15,101   377 (2)07/01/23
Del Amo Fashion Center 
3.66%   585,000 21,753 (2)06/01/27
Domain Westin   
4.12%    63,663   3,721 09/01/25
Dover Mall   
5.57%    81,426   7,497 08/06/21
Emerald Square Mall   
4.71%    99,568   5,538 08/11/22
Falls, The   
3.45%    150,000   5,261 (2)09/01/26
Fashion Centre Pentagon Office   
5.11%    40,000   2,077 (2)07/01/21
Fashion Centre Pentagon Retail   
4.87%    410,000  20,289 (2)07/01/21
Fashion Valley   
4.30%   
(34)  411,565  28,171 02/01/21
Florida Mall, The   
5.25%    305,474  24,502 03/05/21
Galleria, The   
3.55%    1,200,000  43,308 (2)03/01/25
Genting Highland Premium Outlets   
3.96%   (7)  25,311 (9)  1,125 (2)02/14/24
Gloucester Premium Outlets   
1.64%   (1)  86,000   1,855 (2)03/01/23(3)
Gotemba Premium Outlets 
0.16%   126,010 
(26)  235 (2)04/08/27
Grapevine Mills   
3.83%    268,000  10,443 (2)10/01/24
Hamilton Town Center   
4.81%   76,227  5,287 04/01/22
Katy Mills   
3.49%   140,000  4,967 (2)12/06/22
48Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets   
0.34%   
(12)  8,725 
(26)  42 (2)01/31/23
Lehigh Valley Mall   
4.06%    189,147  11,523 11/01/27
Liberty Tree Mall   
3.41%    29,445   1,765 05/06/23
Malaga Designer Outlet   
2.75%   
(22)  61,744   1,737 (2)02/09/23
Mall at Rockingham Park, The   
4.04%    262,000  10,761 (2)06/01/26
Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The   
3.56%    114,814   5,685 05/01/23
Mall of New Hampshire, The   
4.11%    150,000   6,265 (2)07/01/25
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Meadowood Mall   
5.82%    107,751   8,809 11/06/21
Miami International Mall   
4.42%    160,000   7,190 (2)02/06/24
Northshore Mall   
3.30%    230,163  14,177 07/05/23
Ochtrup Designer Outlet   
2.49%   
(27)  46,262 
(30)  1,871 06/30/21
Ontario Mills   
4.25%    289,141  20,328 03/05/22
Paju Premium Outlets   
3.36%    69,915 
(17)  4,556 07/13/23
Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton IA   
1.76%   (4)  106,105 (5)  2,202 (2)11/10/21
Premium Outlets Montréal   
3.08%    94,177 (5)  2,537 (2)06/01/24
Quaker Bridge Mall   
4.50%    180,000   8,235 (2)05/01/26
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Fixed   
9.98%    22,469 
(32)  2,243 (3)12/20/33
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Variable   
8.49%    5,581 
(32)  474 (2)12/20/21
Rinku Premium Outlets - Fixed 
0.30%   57,189 
(26) 172,551 (2)07/31/27
Rinku Premium Outlets - Variable   
0.34%   
(12)  9,693 
(26)  32,604 (2)07/31/22
Roermond 4 Designer Outlet 
1.30%   
(23)  206,046 
(30)  2,834 (2)08/17/25
Roosevelt Field Hotel   
3.24%   (1)  28,270   516 (2)01/12/23
Round Rock Plaza Residential   
2.14%   (1)  29,462   50 (2)01/24/24
Sano Premium Outlets 
0.28%   44,103 
(26)  126 (2)02/28/25
Sawgrass Mills Hotel   
5.27%   (2)  20,033   1,056 (1)06/07/24
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 1   
0.32%   
(12)  27,141 
(26)  246 (2)05/31/23
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 2   
0.35%    48,465 
(26)  167 (2)04/08/25
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 3   
0.32%   
(12)  25,202 
(26)  81 (2)11/30/23
Shops at Clearfork, The   
2.81%   (1)  145,000   3,940 (2)03/11/30(3)
Shops at Crystals, The   
3.74%    550,000   20,935 (2)07/01/26
Shops at Mission Viejo, The   
3.61%    295,000   10,827 (2)02/01/23
Siam Premium Outlets Bangkok   
3.95%    81,008 
(11)  1,496 (2)06/05/31
Siheung Premium Outlets   
3.28%    137,990 
(17)  4,176 (2)03/15/23
Silver Sands Premium Outlets   
3.93%    100,000   2,948 (2)06/01/22
Smith Haven Mall   
2.64%   (1)  171,750   12,619 01/30/21
Solomon Pond Mall   
4.01%    93,308   5,464 11/01/22
Southdale Hotel   
2.14%    17,000   473 (2)06/01/22
Southdale Residential   
4.46%    38,012   2,457 10/15/35
Springfield Mall   
4.45%    59,485   3,680 10/06/25
Square One Mall   
5.47%    86,064   6,451 01/06/22
St. Johns Town Center   
3.82%    350,000   13,589 (2)09/11/24
St. Louis Premium Outlets   
4.06%    93,138   5,478 10/06/24
Stoneridge Shopping Center   
3.50%    330,000   11,550 (2)09/05/26
49Tanger Outlets Columbus   
1.99%   (1)  71,000   1,864 (2)11/28/22
Tanger Outlets - Galveston/Houston   
1.79%   (1)  80,000   1,757 (2)07/01/22(3)
Toki Premium Outlets - Fixed   
0.21%    25,687 
(26)  48 (2)11/30/24
Toki Premium Outlets - Variable   
0.29%   
(12)  3,392 
(26)  3,392 (2)11/30/24
Toronto Premium Outlets   
3.11%    133,420 (5)  4,144 (2)06/01/22
Toronto Premium Outlets II   
1.66%   (4)  90,824 (5)  1,508 (2)05/24/22(3)
Tosu Premium Outlets   
0.17%   
(12)  71,242 
(26)  140 (2)10/31/26
Twin Cities Premium Outlets   
4.32%    115,000   5,051 (2)11/06/24
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
50Interest Face Annual DebtMaturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Vancouver Designer Outlet   
2.01%   (4)  125,849 (5)  3,103 (2)02/18/21
West Midlands Designer Outlets 
3.68%    42,042 
(16)  1,545 (1)02/27/23
West Town Mall 
4.37%    206,957   12,305 07/01/22
Westchester, The 
3.25%    400,000   14,288 (2)02/01/30
Woodfield Mall 
4.50%    397,944  25,526 03/05/24
Yeoju Premium Outlets 
3.41%    67,152 
(17)  2,078 (2)03/06/23
Total Joint Venture Secured Indebtedness at Face
Value 15,221,125 
TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value   378,845 
(29)
Total Joint Venture and TMLP Indebtedness at Face
Value  15,599,970 
Debt Issuance Costs   (30,485)
Total Joint Venture Indebtedness $15,569,485 
Our Share of Joint Venture Indebtedness $ 7,159,202 
(31)
(1)Variable rate loans based on one-month (1M) LIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 77.5 bps to 324 bps.  1M
LIBOR as of December 31, 2020 was 0.14%.
(2)Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(3)Includes applicable extension available at the Applicable Borrower's option.
(4)Variable rate loans based on 1M CDOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 120 bps to 155 bps.  1M CDOR at
December 31, 2020 was 0.46%.
(5)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  CAD equivalent is 701.3 million.
(6)Requires annual payment of interest only.
(7)Variable rate loans based on Cost of Fund plus interest rate spreads of 175 bps. Cost of Fund as of December 31,
2020 was 2.21%.
(8)Mortgage is outstanding as of 12/31/2020, the single purpose entity borrower and the lender are currently working
together to extend the maturity date of this non-recourse loan.
(9)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Ringgit equivalent is 102.0 million.
(10)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 500.0 million.
(11)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Baht equivalent is 2.4 billion.
(12)Variable rate loans based on six-month (6M) TIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 17.5 bps to 35 bps.  As of
December 31, 2020, 6M TIBOR was 0.14%.
(13)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 750.0 million.
(14)Requires semi-annual payments of interest only.
(15)Credit Facilities. As of December 31, 2020, the Credit Facilities bear interest at a spread of LIBOR plus an interest
rate spread of 0 bps to 160 bps or LIBOR plus 77.5 bps. The Credit Facilities provide for different pricing based upon
our investment grade rating. As of December 31, 2020, $6.7 billion was available after outstanding borrowings and
letters of credit under our Credit Facilities.
(16)Reflects the weighted average maturity date and weighted average interest rate of all outstanding tranches of
commercial paper at December 31, 2020.
(17)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Won equivalent is 408.0 billion.
(18)City of Sunrise Bond Liability (Sawgrass Mills).
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
51(19)Loans secured by these three properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(20)Loans secured by these two properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(21)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  GBP equivalent is 100.0 million.
(22)Variable rate loan based on three-month (3M) EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate
spread of 275 bps.
(23)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 130 bps. Through an interest rate floor
agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. Also, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.30%.
(24)Variable rate loan based on one-month (1M) EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate
spread of 175 bps.
(25)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread from 250 bps to 275 bps.  Through an interest
rate floor agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(26)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Yen equivalent is 49.7 billion
(27)Associated with this loan is an interest rate swap agreement that effectively fixes the interest rate on this loan at the
all-in rate presented.
(28)Variable rate loan based on 1M LIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 275 bps.  In addition, 1M LIBOR is capped at
5.00%.
(29)Consists of two properties with interest rates ranging from 5.65% to 7.32% and maturities between 2021 and 2024.
(30)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 1.2 billion.
(31)Our share of total indebtedness includes a pro rata share of the mortgage debt on joint venture properties, including
properties owned by The Mills Limited Partnership.  To the extent total indebtedness is secured by a property, it is
non-recourse to us, with the exception of approximately $219.2 million of payment guarantees provided by the
Operating Partnership.
(32)Amount shown in USD equivalent. Peso equivalent is 557.9 million.
(33)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 160 bps. Through an interest rate floor
agreement, 3M EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. In addition, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.00%.
(34)Subsequent to December 31, 2020, this mortgage was refinanced to $415 million, with a maturity date of February 1,
2024, and an interest rate of 3.75%.
(35)On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550 million 2.50%
notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount. Further on February 2, 2021, the Operating
Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
52The changes in consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 are as follows:
    2020     2019     2018  
Balance, Beginning of Year $ 24,163,230 $ 23,305,535 $ 24,632,463
Additions during period:
New Loan Originations   15,269,455   13,355,809   7,980,569
Loans assumed in acquisitions and consolidation   —   21,001   215,000
Net (Discount)/Premium   28,906   (16,903)   301
Net Debt Issuance Costs  (34,595)  (23,505)  (6,885)
Deductions during period:
Loan Retirements   
(12,932,448)   
(12,366,951)   (9,340,861)
Amortization of Net Discounts/(Premiums)   174   (758)   1,618
Debt Issuance Cost Amortization  23,076  18,400  21,444
Scheduled Principal Amortization   (51,728)   (58,419)   (54,624)
Foreign Currency Translation  257,291  (70,979)  (143,490)
Balance, Close of Year $ 26,723,361 $ 24,163,230 $ 23,305,535
Table of Contents
53Item 3.  Legal Proceedings
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary
course of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in
connection with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that our current proceedings will not
have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations. We record a liability when
a loss is considered probable, and the amount can be reasonably estimated.
Item 4.  Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
54Part II
Item 5.  Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities
Simon
Market Information
Simon’s common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “SPG”.
Holders
The number of holders of record of common stock outstanding was 1,140 as of January 31, 2021. The
Class B common stock is subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees.
Shares of Class B common stock convert automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the
occurrence of certain events and can be converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Dividends
We must pay a minimum amount of dividends to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT. Simon’s future
dividends and future distributions of the Operating Partnership will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in
its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash
available for dividends and limited partner distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary for capital and
operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
Common stock cash dividends paid during 2020 aggregated $4.70 per share. Common stock cash dividends
during 2019 aggregated $8.30 per share. On December 15, 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly
cash dividend for the fourth quarter of 2020 of $1.30 per share, payable on January 22, 2021 to shareholders of
record on December 24, 2020.  
We offer a dividend reinvestment plan that allows Simon’s stockholders to acquire additional shares by
automatically reinvesting cash dividends. Shares are acquired pursuant to the plan at a price equal to the prevailing
market price of such shares, without payment of any brokerage commission or service charge.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
During the quarter ended December 31, 2020, Simon issued 98,290 shares of common stock to 20 limited
partners of the Operating Partnership in exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership
agreement of the Operating Partnership.  The issuance of shares of common stock was exempt from registration
pursuant to Section 4(a)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
Issuances Under Equity Compensation Plans
For information regarding the securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see
Item 12 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
None.
The Operating Partnership
Market Information
There is no established trading market for units or preferred units.  
Holders
The number of holders of record of units was 222 as of January 31, 2021.
Table of Contents
55Distributions
The Operating Partnership makes distributions on its units in amounts sufficient to maintain Simon's
qualification as a REIT. Simon is required each year to distribute to its stockholders at least 90% of its REIT taxable
income after certain adjustments. Future distributions will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole
discretion, based on actual and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for
distributions, cash reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if
any, and the distributions that may be required to maintain Simon's status as a REIT.
Distributions during 2020 aggregated $4.70 per unit.  Distributions during 2019 aggregated $8.30 per unit.
 On December 15, 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash distribution for the fourth quarter of
2020 of $1.30 per unit, payable on January 22, 2021 to unitholders of record on December 24, 2020.  The
distribution rate on the Operating Partnership’s units is equal to the dividend rate on Simon’s common stock.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
During the quarter ended December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership issued 955,705 units in connection
with the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
None.
Table of Contents
56Item 6.  Selected Financial Data
The following tables set forth selected financial data. The selected financial data should be read in
conjunction with the financial statements and notes thereto and with Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations. Other data we believe is important in understanding trends in our
business is also included in the tables.
As of or for the Year Ended December 31
   2020    2019 (1)   2018    2017 (2)   2016 (3)
(in thousands, except per share data)
OPERATING DATA:
Total consolidated revenue (4) $ 4,607,503$ 5,755,189$ 5,645,288$ 5,527,336$ 5,427,910
Consolidated net income   1,277,324  2,423,188  2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706
Net income attributable to common
stockholders - SPG Inc.  1,109,227  2,098,247  2,436,721  1,944,625  1,835,559
Net income attributable to unitholders -
SPG L.P.  1,276,450  2,416,945  2,805,764  2,239,638  2,122,236
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER
SHARE/UNIT:
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common
stockholders $  3.59$  6.81$  7.87$  6.24$  5.87
Basic weighted average shares outstanding  308,738  307,950  309,627  311,517  312,691
Diluted weighted average shares
outstanding   308,738  307,950  309,627  311,517  312,691
Dividends per share (5) $  6.00$  8.30$  7.90$  7.15$  6.50
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $  3.59$  6.81$  7.87$  6.24$  5.87
Basic weighted average units outstanding   355,282  354,724  356,520  358,777  361,527
Diluted weighted average units outstanding  355,282  354,724  356,520  358,777  361,527
Distributions per unit (5) $  6.00$  8.30$  7.90$  7.15$  6.50
BALANCE SHEET DATA:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,011,613$ 669,373$ 514,335$ 1,482,309$ 560,059
Total assets (6)   
34,786,846  
31,231,630  
30,686,223  
32,257,638  
31,103,578
Mortgages and other indebtedness   
26,723,361  
24,163,230  
23,305,535  
24,632,463  
22,977,104
Total equity   3,472,346  2,911,250  3,796,956  4,238,764  4,959,912
OTHER DATA:
Cash flow provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 2,326,698$ 3,807,831$ 3,750,796$ 3,593,788$ 3,372,694
Investing activities   
(3,978,398)  
(1,076,707)  (236,506)  (761,467)  (969,026)
Financing activities   1,993,940  
(2,576,086)  
(4,482,264)  
(1,910,071)  
(2,544,743)
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Funds from Operations (FFO) (7) $ 3,236,963$ 4,272,271$ 4,324,601$ 4,020,505$ 3,792,951
Dilutive FFO allocable to common
stockholders $ 2,812,900$ 3,708,929$ 3,755,784$ 3,490,910$ 3,280,590
Diluted FFO per share $  9.11$  12.04$  12.13$  11.21$  10.49
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Funds from Operations (FFO) (7) $ 3,236,963$ 4,272,271$ 4,324,601$ 4,020,505$ 3,792,951
(1)During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recorded a $116.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with
the early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per
share by $0.33.
(2)During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recorded a $128.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with
the early redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per
share by $0.36.
Table of Contents
57(3)During the year ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a $136.8 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated
with the early redemption of a series of unsecured senior notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted
FFO per share by $0.38.
(4)Total consolidated revenue for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, and 2016 has been reclassified to conform
to the current year presentation.
(5)Represents dividends per share of Simon common stock/distributions per unit of Operating Partnership units declared
per period.
(6)On January 1, 2019, we recognized a right of use asset and corresponding lease liability of $524.0 million as a result
of the adoption of ASU 2016-02.
(7)FFO is a non-GAAP financial measure that we believe provides useful information to investors. Please refer to
Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for a definition and
reconciliation of FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, FFO per share to net income per share.
Table of Contents
58Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes
thereto that are included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Overview
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-
managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the
Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they
distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned
Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. In this discussion,
unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc.
and references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and
"our" mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by
Simon and/or the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the
Operating Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2020, we owned or held an
interest in 203 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 99 malls, 69 Premium Outlets,
14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 17 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80%
noncontrolling interest in The Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-
regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. In addition, we have redevelopment and expansion projects,
including the addition of anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants, underway at several properties in the United
States, Canada, Europe and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2020, we had ownership in 31 Premium
Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. We also have four
international outlet properties under development. As of December 31, 2020, we also owned a 22.4% equity stake
in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in,
shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment, and other tenants including
consideration received from:
●fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements, and
●variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate
taxes, utilities, marketing and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management
fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We invest in real estate properties to maximize total financial return which includes both operating cash
flows and capital appreciation. We seek growth in earnings, funds from operations, or FFO, and cash flows by
enhancing the profitability and operation of our properties and investments. We seek to accomplish this growth
through the following:
●attracting and retaining high quality tenants and utilizing economies of scale to reduce operating
expenses,
●expanding and re-tenanting existing highly productive locations at competitive rental rates,
●selectively acquiring or increasing our interests in high quality real estate assets or portfolios of assets,
●generating consumer traffic in our retail properties through marketing initiatives and strategic corporate
alliances, and
●selling selective non-core assets.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our malls as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and
consumer-focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the
sales of bank-issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives,
business development, sponsorship, and events,
Table of Contents
59●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility
services, and the provision of energy services,
●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related
entities.
We focus on high quality real estate across the retail real estate spectrum. We expand or redevelop
properties to enhance profitability and market share of existing assets when we believe the investment of our
capital meets our risk-reward criteria. We selectively develop new properties in markets we believe are not
adequately served by existing retail outlet properties.
We routinely review and evaluate acquisition opportunities based on their ability to enhance our portfolio.
Our international strategy includes partnering with established real estate companies and financing international
investments with local currency to minimize foreign exchange risk.
To support our growth, we employ a three-fold capital strategy:
●provide the capital necessary to fund growth,
●maintain sufficient flexibility to access capital in many forms, both public and private, and
●manage our overall financial structure in a fashion that preserves our investment grade credit ratings.
We consider FFO, net operating income, or NOI, and portfolio NOI to be key measures of operating
performance that are not specifically defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, or
GAAP. We use these measures internally to evaluate the operating performance of our portfolio and provide a basis
for comparison with other real estate companies. Reconciliations of these measures to the most comparable GAAP
measure are included below in this discussion.
COVID-19
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, or COVID-19, a
global pandemic and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. The COVID-19 pandemic
has already had a significant negative impact on economic and market conditions around the world in 2020, and,
notwithstanding the fact that vaccines have started to be administered in the United States and elsewhere, the
pandemic continues to adversely impact economic activity in real estate. The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic
continues to evolve and governments and other authorities, including where we own or hold interests in properties,
have imposed measures intended to control its spread, including restrictions on freedom of movement, group
gatherings and business operations such as travel bans, border closings, business closures, quarantines, stay-at-
home, shelter-in-place orders, capacity limitations and social distancing measures. Governments and other
authorities are in varying stages of lifting or modifying some of these measures, however certain governments and
other authorities have already been forced to, and others may in the future, reinstate these measures or impose
new, more restrictive measures, if the risks, or the tenants’ and consumers’ perception of the risks, related to the
COVID-19 pandemic worsen at any time. Although tenants and consumers have been adapting to the COVID-19
pandemic, with tenants adding services like curbside pickup, and while consumer risk-tolerance is evolving, such
adaptations and evolution may take time, and there is no guarantee that retail will return to pre-pandemic levels
even once the pandemic subsides. As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and these measures, the Company may
experience material impacts including changes in the ability to recognize revenue due to changes in our
assessment of the probability of collection of lease income and asset impairment charges as a result of changing
cash flows generated by our properties.  Due to certain restrictive governmental orders placed on us, our domestic
portfolio lost approximately 13,500 shopping days during the year.
As of October 7, 2020, all of our domestic properties and certain of our retailer investments had reopened,
but we do not have certainty that additional closures in the future will not be required.
As we developed and implemented our response to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and restriction
intended to prevent its spread on our business, our primary focus has been on the health and safety of our
employees, our shoppers and the communities in which we serve.  We implemented a series of actions to reduce
costs and increase liquidity in light of the economic impacts of the pandemic, including:
●significantly reduced all non-essential corporate spending,
●significantly reduced property operating expenses, including discretionary marketing spend,
Table of Contents
60●implemented a temporary furlough of certain corporate and field employees due to the closure of the
Company’s U.S. properties as a result of restrictive governmental orders; reduced certain corporate and
field personnel and implemented a temporary freeze on company hiring efforts, and
●suspended more than $1.0 billion of redevelopment and new development projects.    
Results Overview
Diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit decreased $3.22 during 2020 to $3.59 as compared
to $6.81 in 2019. The decrease in diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit was primarily attributable
to:
●a lawsuit settled with our former insurance broker in 2019 related to the significant flood damage
sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010 of $68.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share/unit,
●a gain in 2019 related to the disposition of our interest in a multi-family residential investment of $16.2
million, or $0.05 per diluted share/unit,
●decreased consolidated lease income of $941.4 million, or $2.65 per diluted share/unit, comprised of
decreased fixed lease income of $422.0 million and decreased variable lease income of $519.4 million,
which was primarily due to COVID-19 disruption,
●decreased other income, excluding the two aforementioned 2019 transactions, of $106.1 million, or $0.30
per diluted share/unit, primarily related to decreased Simon Brand Ventures and gift card revenues due
to COVID-19 disruption,
●a net loss in 2020 of $115.0 million, or $0.32 per diluted share/unit, primarily related to impairment
charges in 2020 related to Klépierre, our investment in HBS, one consolidated property, and three joint
venture properties, partially offset by gains from disposition activity in 2020, of $14.9 million, or $0.04 per
diluted share/unit which was lower than 2019 net gains,
●decreased income from unconsolidated entities of $224.5 million, or $0.63 per diluted share/unit,
primarily due to unfavorable domestic and international operations and year-over-year operations from
retailer investments of $7.5 million, or $0.02 per diluted share/unit, all of which were impacted by COVID-
19 disruption, and
●an unrealized unfavorable change in fair value of equity instruments of $11.4 million, or $0.03 per diluted
share/unit, partially offset by
●decreased consolidated total operating expenses of $211.7 million, or $0.60 per diluted share/unit, which
was primarily related to cost reduction efforts as a result of the COVID-19 disruption,
●a charge on early extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million, or $0.33 per diluted share/unit, in 2019, and
●decreased tax expense of $34.7 million, or $0.10 per diluted share/unit.  
Portfolio NOI decreased 17.1% in 2020 as compared to 2019. Average base minimum rent for U.S. Malls
and Premium Outlets increased 2.2% to $55.80 psf as of December 31, 2020, from $54.59 psf as of December 31,
2019. Leasing spreads in our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets decreased to an open/close leasing spread (based
on total tenant payments — base minimum rent plus common area maintenance) of $4.41 psf ($60.08 openings
compared to $64.49 closings) as of December 31, 2020, representing a 6.8% decrease. Ending occupancy for our
U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets decreased 3.8% to 91.3% as of December 31, 2020, from 95.1% as of December
31, 2019, primarily due to 2020 tenant bankruptcy activity, partially offset by leasing activity.
Our effective overall borrowing rate at December 31, 2020 on our consolidated indebtedness decreased 18
basis points to 2.98% as compared to 3.16% at December 31, 2019. This decrease was primarily due to a
decrease in the effective overall borrowing rate on variable rate debt of 130 basis points (1.31% at December 31,
2020 as compared to 2.61% at December 31, 2019) partially offset by an increase in the effective overall borrowing
rate on fixed rate debt of four basis points (3.50% at December 31, 2020 as compared to 3.46% at December 31,
2019).  The weighted average years to maturity of our consolidated indebtedness was 7.3 years and 7.4 years at
December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Table of Contents
61Our financing activity for the year ended December 31, 2020 included:
●amending and replacing in its entirety the Operating Partnership’s existing $4.0 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility, by entering into an unsecured credit facility comprised of (i) an
amendment and extension of the Credit Facility and (ii) a $2.0 billion delayed-draw term loan facility, or
Term Facility,
●borrowing $3.1 billion under the Credit Facility and subsequently repaying $3.1 billion under the Credit
Facility,
●borrowing $875.0 million under the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured revolving credit facility,
or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit Facility and Term Facility, the Facilities, and
subsequently repaying $875.0 million,
●decreasing our borrowings under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper note
program, or the Commercial Paper program, by $704.0 million,
●borrowing $2.0 billion under the Term Facility,
●issuing 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering for $1.6 billion, net of issue costs,
●completing, on July 9, 2020, the issuance by the Operating Partnership of the following senior unsecured
notes: $500 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.50%, $750 million with a fixed interest rate 2.65%, and
$750 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.80%, with maturity dates of September 2025 (the “2025
Notes”), June 2030, and June 2050, respectively. The 2025 Notes were issued as additional notes under
an indenture pursuant to which the Operating Partnership previously issued $600 million principal
amount of 3.50% senior notes due September 2025 on August 17, 2015. Proceeds from the unsecured
notes offering funded the optional redemption at par of senior unsecured notes in July and August 2020,
as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the indebtedness under the Facilities,
●completing, on July 22, 2020, the optional redemption at par of the Operating Partnership’s $500 million
2.50% notes due September 1, 2020, and
●completing, on August 6, 2020, the optional redemption at par of the Operating Partnership’s €375 million
2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.
Subsequent Activity
On January 21, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.75%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%, with
maturity dates of January 2028 and 2031, respectively.
On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550
million 2.50% notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount.  Further on February 2, 2021, the
Operating Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.  
United States Portfolio Data
The portfolio data discussed in this overview includes the following key operating statistics: ending
occupancy, and average base minimum rent per square foot. We include acquired properties in this data beginning
in the year of acquisition and remove disposed properties in the year of disposition. For comparative information
purposes, we separate the information related to The Mills from our other U.S. operations. We also do not include
any information for properties located outside the United States or properties included in TRG.
Table of Contents
62The following table sets forth these key operating statistics for the combined U.S. Malls and Premium
Outlets:
●properties that are consolidated in our consolidated financial statements,
●properties we account for under the equity method of accounting as joint ventures, and
●the foregoing two categories of properties on a total portfolio basis.
%/Basis Point %/Basis Point  
    2020 Change (1) 2019 Change (1) 2018 
U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets:
Ending Occupancy
Consolidated  91.5 %  -380bps  95.3 %  -60 bps  95.9 %
Unconsolidated  90.9 %  -360bps  94.5 %  -130 bps  95.8 %
Total Portfolio  91.3 %  -380bps  95.1 %  -80 bps  95.9 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per
Square Foot
Consolidated $ 
53.98  1.7%  $ 
53.06  1.0%  $ 
52.51
Unconsolidated $ 
60.97  3.8%  $ 
58.71  0.2%  $ 
58.59
Total Portfolio $ 
55.80  2.2%  $ 
54.59  0.8%  $ 
54.18
The Mills:
Ending Occupancy   95.3 %  -170 bps   97.0 %  -60bps   97.6 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per
Square Foot $ 
33.77  2.1%  $ 
33.09  1.4%  $ 
32.63
(1)Percentages may not recalculate due to rounding. Percentage and basis point changes are representative of the
change from the comparable prior period.
Ending Occupancy Levels and Average Base Minimum Rent per Square Foot.  Ending occupancy is
the percentage of gross leasable area, or GLA, which is leased as of the last day of the reporting period. We
include all company owned space except for mall anchors, mall majors, mall freestanding and mall outlots in the
calculation. Base minimum rent per square foot is the average base minimum rent charge in effect for the reporting
period for all tenants that would qualify to be included in ending occupancy.
Total Reported Sales per Square Foot.  Given the impact of COVID-19 and the governmental restrictions
placed on us, we are not presenting reported retail sales per square foot as we do not believe the trends for the
period are indicative of future operating trends.
Current Leasing Activities
During 2020, we signed 460 new leases and 1,175 renewal leases (excluding mall anchors and majors, new
development, redevelopment and leases with terms of one year or less) with a fixed minimum rent across our U.S.
Malls and Premium Outlets portfolio, comprising approximately 6.1 million square feet, of which 4.8 million square
feet related to consolidated properties. During 2019, we signed 990 new leases and 1,281 renewal leases with a
fixed minimum rent, comprising approximately 7.6 million square feet, of which 5.7 million square feet related to
consolidated properties. The average annual initial base minimum rent for new leases was $53.97 per square foot
in 2020 and $56.80 per square foot in 2019 with an average tenant allowance on new leases of $51.01 per square
foot and $47.57 per square foot, respectively.
Japan Data
The following are selected key operating statistics for our Premium Outlets in Japan. The information used to
prepare these statistics has been supplied by the managing venture partner.
    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,  
2020 Change 2019 Change 2018  
Ending Occupancy 99.5% +0 bps 99.5% -20 bps 99.7%
Average Base Minimum Rent
per Square Foot ¥ 5,447 3.38% ¥ 5,269 2.19% ¥ 5,156
Table of Contents
63Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or
GAAP, requires management to use judgment in the application of accounting policies, including making estimates
and assumptions. We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions believed to be
reasonable under the circumstances. These judgments affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities,
disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the dates of the financial statements and the reported amounts of
revenue and expenses during the reporting periods. If our judgment or interpretation of the facts and circumstances
relating to various transactions had been different, it is possible that different accounting policies would have been
applied resulting in a different presentation of our financial statements. From time to time, we reevaluate our
estimates and assumptions. In the event estimates or assumptions prove to be different from actual results,
adjustments are made in subsequent periods to reflect more current information. Below is a discussion of
accounting policies that we consider critical in that they may require complex judgment in their application or require
estimates about matters that are inherently uncertain. For a summary of our significant accounting policies, see
Note 3 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements.
● We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties
and account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight-line basis
over the terms of the leases, when we believe substantially all lease income, including the related
straight-line rent receivable, is probable of collection. Our assessment of collectability incorporates
available operational performance measures such as sales and the aging of billed amounts as well as
other publicly available information with respect to our tenant’s financial condition, liquidity and capital
resources, including declines in such conditions due to, or amplified by, the COVID-19 pandemic.  When
a tenant seeks to reorganize its operations through bankruptcy proceedings, we assess the collectability
of receivable balances including, among other things, the timing of a tenant’s bankruptcy filing and our
expectations of the assumption by the tenant in bankruptcy proceeding of leases at the Company’s
properties on substantially similar terms.  In the event that we determine accrued receivables are not
probable of collection, lease income will be recorded on a cash basis, with the corresponding tenant
receivable and straight-line rent receivable charged as a direct write-off against lease income in the
period of the change in our collectability determination.  
●We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate
events or changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may
not be recoverable. These circumstances include, but are not limited to, changes in a property’s
operational performance such as declining cash flows, occupancy or total sales per square foot, the
Company’s intent and ability to hold the related asset, and, if applicable, the remaining time to maturity of
underlying financing arrangements. We measure any impairment of investment property when the
estimated undiscounted operating income before depreciation and amortization during the anticipated
holding period plus its residual value is less than the carrying value of the property. To the extent
impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying value of the property over our
estimate of its fair value. We also review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated
entities, to identify and evaluate whether events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of our investments may not be recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine
the fair value of the investments are less than their carrying value and such impairment is other-than-
temporary. Our evaluation of changes in economic or operating conditions and whether an impairment is
other-than-temporary may include developing estimates of fair value, forecasted cash flows or operating
income before depreciation and amortization. We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using
observable and unobservable data such as operating income, hold periods, estimated capitalization and
discount rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information and whether
certain impairments are other-than-temporary. Changes in economic and operating conditions, including
changes in the financial condition of our tenants, and changes to our intent and ability to hold the related
asset, that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment property and other investments
could impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result in future charges to earnings if
assumptions regarding those investments differ from actual results.
●To maintain Simon’s status as a REIT, we must distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income in any
given year and meet certain asset and income tests. We monitor our business and transactions that may
potentially impact Simon’s REIT status. In the unlikely event that we fail to maintain Simon’s REIT status,
and available relief provisions do not apply, we would be required to pay U.S. federal income taxes at
regular corporate income tax rates during the period Simon did not qualify as a REIT. If Simon lost its
REIT status, it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following the year during which
qualification was lost unless its failure was due
Table of Contents
64to reasonable cause and certain other conditions were met. As a result, failing to maintain REIT status
would result in a significant increase in the income tax expense recorded and paid during those periods.
●In the period of a significant acquisition of real estate, we make estimates as part of our valuation of the
purchase price of asset acquisitions (including the components of excess investment in joint ventures) to
the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each component. The
most significant components of our real estate valuations are typically the determination of relative fair
value to the buildings as-if-vacant, land and market value of in-place leases. In the case of the fair value
of buildings and fair value of land and other intangibles, our estimates of the values of these components
will affect the amount of depreciation or amortization we record over the estimated useful life of the
property acquired or the remaining lease term. In the case of the market value of in-place leases, we
make our best estimates of the tenants’ ability to pay rents based upon the tenants’ operating
performance at the property, including the competitive position of the property in its market as well as
sales psf, rents psf, and overall occupancy cost for the tenants in place at the acquisition date. Our
assumptions affect the amount of future revenue that we will recognize over the remaining lease term for
the acquired in-place leases.  
Results of Operations
In addition to the activity discussed above in the “Results Overview” section, the following acquisitions,
dispositions, and openings of consolidated properties affected our consolidated results in the comparative periods:
●During the fourth quarter of 2020, we disposed of one consolidated retail property.
●On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our
properties from our joint venture partner.
●During the third quarter of 2019, we disposed of two retail properties.
●On September 27, 2018, we opened Denver Premium Outlets, a 330,000 square foot center in Thornton
(Denver), Colorado. We own a 100% interest in this center.
●On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the previously unconsolidated The
Outlets at Orange in Los Angeles, California from our joint venture partner.
●During 2018, we disposed of two retail properties.
In addition to the activities discussed above and in “Results Overview”, the following acquisitions,
dispositions, and openings of noncontrolling interests in joint venture properties affected our income from
unconsolidated entities in the comparative periods:
●On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG, which is
engaged in the ownership of 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia.
●On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C.
Penney, a department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our interest in the venture is 41.67%.
●On June 23, 2020, we opened Siam Premium Outlets, a 264,000 square foot center in Bangkok,
Thailand. We own a 50% interest in this center.
●On February 19, 2020 we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever
21, a retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interests were acquired through two
separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our interest in each of the retail
operations venture and in the licensing venture is 37.5%.
●On February 13, 2020 through our European investee, we opened Malaga Designer Outlets, a 191,000
square foot center in Malaga, Spain. We own a 46% interest in this center.
●In January 2020, we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group, formerly known
as Aeropostale and Authentic Brands Groups, LLC, or ABG, respectively.
●On October 16, 2019 we acquired a 45% interest in Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, to create a new multi-
platform venture dedicated to digital value shopping.
Table of Contents
65●On May 22, 2019, we and our partner opened Premium Outlets Querétaro, a 274,800 square foot center
in Santiago de Querétaro, Mexico. We own a 50% interest in this center.
●During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the 41 German department store properties owned
through our investment in HBS Global Properties, or HBS, was sold, as further discussed in Note 6 of the
notes to the consolidated financial statements.
●During 2018, we contributed our interest in the licensing venture of Aéropostale for additional interests in
Authentic Brands Group LLC, or ABG.  Our original interest in ABG was 5.4% and is currently 6.8%.
●On May 2, 2018, we and our partner opened Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton International Airport, a
424,000 square foot shopping center in Edmonton (Alberta), Canada. We have a 50% noncontrolling
interest in this new center.
For the purposes of the following comparisons between the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019 and
the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, the above transactions are referred to as the property transactions.
In the following discussions of our results of operations, “comparable” refers to properties we owned and operated
in both years in the year to year comparisons.
Year Ended December 31, 2020 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2019
Lease income decreased $941.4 million, of which the property transactions accounted for $3.9 million of the
decrease.  Comparable lease income decreased $937.5 million, or 17.9%. Total lease income decreased primarily
due to decreases in fixed minimum lease and CAM consideration recorded on a straight-line basis of $422.0 million
and reduced variable lease income of $519.4 million, primarily related to lower consideration based on tenant sales
and negative variable lease income due to abatements as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic.  
Total other income decreased $190.2 million, primarily due to a $75.7 million decrease related to Simon
Brand Venture and gift card revenues, a $68.0 million decrease related to a gain on settlement with our former
insurance broker in 2019, a $16.2 million gain on the 2019 sale of our interest in a multi-family residential property,
a $10.9 million decrease in distributions from investments, a $9.1 million decrease in interest income and lower
business interruption insurance proceeds received in connection with our two Puerto Rico properties as a result of
hurricane damages of $5.2 million, partially offset by a $6.2 million gain on a partial sale and mark-to-market
adjustment of our retained interest in a non-retail investment and a $4.1 million gain related to the sale of
outparcels.
Property operating expenses decreased $104.0 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a result
of the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts,
as previously discussed.
Repairs and maintenance expenses decreased $19.6 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a
result of the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction
efforts, as previously discussed.
Advertising and promotion decreased $51.7 million primarily due to the closure of properties as a result of
the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions intended to prevent its spread and cost reduction efforts, as
previously discussed.
General and administrative expense decreased $12.3 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense increased $27.8 million primarily related to an increase in legal fees and expenses.
During 2019, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million as a result of the early
redemption of senior unsecured notes.
Income and other tax expense changed by $34.7 million primarily as a result of a higher tax benefit due to
larger losses on our share of operating results in the retail operations venture of SPARC Group as compared to
2019, and reduced withholding and income taxes related to certain of our international investments, partially offset
by tax expense from a bargain purchase gain recorded as a result of the acquisition of our interest in Forever 21.
Income from unconsolidated entities decreased $224.5 million primarily due to unfavorable year-over-year
domestic and international property operations, as well as results of operations from our retailer investments, both
of which were impacted by COVID-19 disruption, partially offset by a $35.0 million pre-tax non-cash bargain
purchase gain recorded as a result of the acquisition of our interest in Forever 21 and a gain from the sale of a non-
retail asset, of which our share
Table of Contents
66was $17.8 million.
During 2020, we recorded $125.6 million of impairment charges related to one consolidated property, an
other-than-temporary impairment on our equity investment in three joint venture properties, an other-than-
temporary impairment to reduce our investment in HBS to its estimated fair value, and a $4.3 million loss, net,
related to the impairment and disposition of certain assets by Klépierre, partially offset by a $12.3 million gain on
the disposal of our interest in one consolidated property, a $1.9 million excess gain on insurance proceeds related
to our two properties in Puerto Rico and a $1.0 million gain related to the disposition of a shopping center by one of
our joint venture investments. During 2019, we recorded net gains of $62.1 million primarily related to Klépierre’s
disposition of certain shopping centers, offset by a $47.2 million impairment charge related to our investment in
HBS.  
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests decreased $156.8 million due to a decrease in
the net income of the Operating Partnership.  
Year Ended December 31, 2019 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2018
Lease income increased $85.4 million during 2019, of which the property transactions accounted for $33.2
million of the increase.  Comparable lease income increased $52.2 million, or 1.0%, due to increases in fixed
minimum lease and CAM consideration recorded on a straight-line basis, as a result of the adoption of ASC 842.  
Total other income increased $27.9 million, primarily due to a $68.0 million increase related to a lawsuit
settled with our former insurance broker in 2019 related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in
May 2010, a $16.2 million gain on the sale of our interest in a multi-family residential property, a $12.4 million
increase in interest income, an $11.2 million increase in Simon Brand Venture and gift card revenues, an increase
of $10.4 million in land sales including gains as a result of land contributions for densification projects at two of our
properties, and the impact of consolidated franchise and hotel revenues, partially offset by a $35.6 million non-cash
gain recorded in 2018 associated with our contribution of our interest in the Aéropostale licensing venture for
additional interests in ABG, a $26.7 million decrease in lease settlement income, a $23.9 million decrease in
income related to distributions from an international investment received in 2018 and a $9.5 million decrease
related to business interruption insurance proceeds received in connection with our two Puerto Rico properties as a
result of hurricane damages.
Depreciation and amortization expense increased $58.0 million, of which the property transactions
accounted for $11.0 million.  The comparable properties increased $47.0 million primarily as a result of an increase
in tenant allowance write-offs in 2019 and the acceleration of depreciation on a property upon initiation of a major
redevelopment.
Home and regional office costs increased $53.4 million, primarily due to the suspension of leasing cost
capitalization in 2019 as a result of the adoption of a new accounting pronouncement.
General and administrative expense decreased $11.7 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense increased $15.8 million primarily related to a $4.9 million unfavorable non-cash mark-to-
market on certain of our non-real estate equity instruments, and the impact of consolidated franchise and hotel
operational expenses.
During 2019, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million as a result of the early
redemption of senior unsecured notes.
Income from unconsolidated entities decreased $30.9 million as a result of the sale of German assets within
our HBS joint venture in 2018, and the impact from the consolidation of a property that was previously
unconsolidated in the third quarter of 2018, partially offset by favorable results of operations from our international
joint venture investments.
During 2019, we recorded net gains of $62.1 million primarily related to Klépierre’s disposition of certain
shopping centers, offset by a $47.2 million impairment charge related to our investment in HBS.  During 2018, we
recorded net gains of $12.5 million related to property insurance recoveries of previously depreciated assets and
$276.3 million primarily related to our disposition of two retail properties, as well as the disposal of our interest in
the German department stores owned through our investment in HBS, as further discussed in Note 6 of the notes to
the consolidated financial statements.
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests decreased $60.7 million due to a decrease in the
net income of the Operating Partnership.  
Table of Contents
67Liquidity and Capital Resources
Because we own long-lived income-producing assets, our financing strategy relies primarily on long-term
fixed rate debt. Floating rate debt comprised only 12.1% of our total consolidated debt at December 31, 2020. We
also enter into interest rate protection agreements from time to time to manage our interest rate risk. We derive
most of our liquidity from positive net cash flow from operations and distributions of capital from unconsolidated
entities that totaled $2.6 billion in the aggregate during 2020. The Facilities and the Commercial Paper program
provide alternative sources of liquidity as our cash needs vary from time to time. Borrowing capacity under these
sources may be increased as discussed further below.
Our balance of cash and cash equivalents increased $342.2 million during 2020 to $1.0 billion as of
December 31, 2020 as further discussed below.
On December 31, 2020, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of approximately $6.7 billion
under the Facilities, net of outstanding borrowings of $2.1 billion, amounts outstanding under the Commercial Paper
program of $623.0 million and letters of credit of $12.3 million. For the year ended December 31, 2020, the
maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Facilities was $3.9 billion and the weighted average
outstanding balance was $1.8 billion. The weighted average interest rate was 1.04% for the year ended December
31, 2020.
Simon has historically had access to public equity markets and the Operating Partnership has historically
had access to private and public, short and long-term unsecured debt markets and access to secured debt and
private equity from institutional investors at the property level.
Our business model and Simon’s status as a REIT require us to regularly access the debt markets to raise
funds for acquisition, development and redevelopment activity, and to refinance maturing debt. Simon may also,
from time to time, access the equity capital markets to accomplish our business objectives. We believe we have
sufficient cash on hand and availability under the Credit Facility and the Supplemental Facility, or together the
Credit Facilities, and the Commercial Paper program to address our debt maturities and capital needs through
2021.
Cash Flows
Our net cash flow from operating activities and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities totaled
$2.6 billion during 2020. In addition, we had net proceeds from our debt financing and repayment activities of $2.3
billion in 2020. These activities are further discussed below under “Financing and Debt.” During 2020, we also:
●funded the acquisition of the ventures which purchased certain assets of Forever 21, acquired additional
interests in SPARC Group and ABG, funded the acquisition of the ventures which purchased certain
assets of J.C. Penney, and funded the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG, the aggregate
cash portion of which was $3.6 billion,
●issued 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering for $1.6 billion, net of issue costs,
●paid stockholder dividends and unitholder distributions totaling approximately $1.7 billion and preferred
unit distributions totaling $5.3 million,
●funded consolidated capital expenditures of $484.1 million (including development and other costs of
$26.3 million, redevelopment and expansion costs of $399.3 million, and tenant costs and other
operational capital expenditures of $58.5 million),
●funded investments in unconsolidated entities of $191.4 million,
●funded investments in equity instruments of $33.0 million,
●received proceeds on the sale of equity instruments of $30.0 million,
●received insurance proceeds from third-party carriers for property restoration related to hurricane
damages of $31.2 million,
●funded the repurchase of $152.6 million of Simon’s common stock and redeemed units of the Operating
Partnership for $16.1 million.
In general, we anticipate that cash generated from operations will be sufficient to meet operating expenses,
monthly debt service, recurring capital expenditures, and dividends to stockholders and/or distributions to partners
necessary to
Table of Contents
68maintain Simon’s REIT qualification on a long-term basis.  At this time, we do not expect the impact of COVID-19 to
impact our ability to fund these needs for the foreseeable future; however its ultimate impact is difficult to predict. In
addition, we expect to be able to generate or obtain capital for nonrecurring capital expenditures, such as
acquisitions, major building redevelopments and expansions, as well as for scheduled principal maturities on
outstanding indebtedness, from the following, however a severe and prolonged disruption and instability in the
global financial markets, including the debt and equity capital markets, may affect our ability to access necessary
capital:
●excess cash generated from operating performance and working capital reserves,
●borrowings on the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program,
●additional secured or unsecured debt financing, or
●additional equity raised in the public or private markets.
We expect to generate positive cash flow from operations in 2021, and we consider these projected cash
flows in our sources and uses of cash. These cash flows are principally derived from rents paid by our tenants. A
significant deterioration in projected cash flows from operations, including one due to the impact of the COVID-19
pandemic and restrictions intended to restrict its spread, could cause us to increase our reliance on available funds
from the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program, further curtail planned capital expenditures, or seek other
additional sources of financing.
Financing and Debt
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2020, our unsecured debt consisted of $17.1 billion of senior unsecured notes of the
Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Credit Facility, $2.0 billion outstanding under the Term
Facility, and $623.0 million outstanding under Commercial Paper program.  
On March 16, 2020, the Operating Partnership replaced in its entirety its existing $4.0 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility by entering into an unsecured credit facility comprised of (i) an amendment and extension of
the Credit Facility and (ii) the Term Facility. The Credit Facility and the Term Facility can be increased in the form of
either additional commitments under the Credit Facility or incremental term loans under the Term Facility in an
aggregate amount for all such increases not to exceed $1.0 billion, for a total aggregate size of $7.0 billion, in each
case, subject to obtaining additional lender commitments and satisfying certain customary conditions precedent.
 Borrowings may be denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.
Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as
defined. The initial maturity date of the Term Facility and Credit Facility are June 30, 2022 and June 30, 2024,
respectively. Each of the Term Facility and Credit Facility can be extended for two additional six-month periods to
June 30, 2023 and June 30, 2025, respectively, at our sole option, subject to satisfying certain customary conditions
precedent. The Term Facility was available via a single draw during the nine-month period following March 16,
2020, which the Operating Partnership drew on December 15, 2020.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR
plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.65% and 1.40% or (ii)
the base rate (which rate is equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or
LIBOR plus 1.00%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit
rating of between 0.00% and 0.40%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by the Operating
Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.10% and 0.30% on the aggregate revolving commitments under
the Credit Facility. The Credit Facility contains a money market competitive bid option program that allows the
Operating Partnership to hold auctions to achieve lower pricing for short-term borrowings. Borrowings under the
Term Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR plus a margin determined
based on the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.725% and 1.60% or (ii) the base rate
(equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or LIBOR plus 1.00%) plus a
margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.00% and 0.60%.  The Term
Facility includes a ticking fee equal to 0.10% of the unused term loan commitment under the Term Facility, which
ticking fee commenced accruing on the date that is forty-five days after the closing of the Term Facility.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during
its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and
Australian dollars. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was extended to June 30, 2022 and can be
extended for an additional year
Table of Contents
69to June 30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest
rate on the Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
On December 31, 2020, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.7 billion under the
Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Facilities during the year ended December 31,
2020 was $3.9 billion and the weighted average outstanding balance was $1.8 billion. Letters of credit of
$12.3 million were outstanding under the Facilities as of December 31, 2020.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S.
dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in
U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more
subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership.  Notes will be sold
under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a
result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior
indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit Facilities and if necessary or
appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts outstanding from
time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2020, we had $623.0 million outstanding under
the Commercial Paper program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar denominated notes with a weighted average interest
rate of 0.29%.  These borrowings have a weighted average maturity date of February 19, 2021 and reduce
amounts otherwise available under the Credit Facilities.
On July 9, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes:
$500.0 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.50%, $750 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.65%, and $750 million
with a fixed interest rate of 3.80%, with maturity dates of September 2025 (the “2025” Notes”), June 2030, and June
2050, respectively. The 2025 Notes were issued as additional notes under an indenture pursuant to which the
Operating Partnership previously issued $600 million principal amount of 3.50% senior notes due September 2025
on August 17, 2015. Proceeds from the unsecured notes offering funded the optional redemption at par of senior
unsecured notes in July and August 2020, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the indebtedness under the
Facilities.
On July 10, 2020 the Operating Partnership repaid $1.75 billion under the Credit Facility and $750.0 million
under the Supplemental Facility.
On July 22, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its $500 million
2.50% notes due September 1, 2020.
On August 6, 2020 the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its €375 million
2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.
On January 21, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.75%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%, with
maturity dates of January 2028 and 2031, respectively.
On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550
million 2.50% notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount. Further, on February 2, 2021, the
Operating Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.
On October 7, 2019 the Operating Partnership completed the early redemption of its $900 million 4.375%
notes due March 1, 2021, $700 million 4.125% notes due December 1, 2021, $600 million 3.375% notes due March
15, 2022 and €375 million of the €750 million 2.375% notes due October 2, 2020. We recorded a $116.3 million
loss on extinguishment of debt in the fourth quarter of 2019 as a result of the early redemption.
Mortgage Debt
Total consolidated mortgage indebtedness, which is typically secured by the underlying assets and non-
recourse to the Operating Partnership, was $7.0 billion and $6.9 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Covenants
Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If we were
to fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity could be
accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable interest rate.
As of December 31, 2020, we were in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
Table of Contents
70At December 31, 2020, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 46 non-recourse mortgage
notes secured by mortgages on 49 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and
cross-collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a
default under any mortgage included in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within
that pool and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our
secured debt instruments contain financial and other non-financial covenants which are specific to the properties
that serve as collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to
fail to comply with these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their
collateral. At December 31, 2020, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage notes were in
compliance with all covenants where non-compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect to
applicable cross-default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of
operations.
Summary of Financing
Our consolidated debt, adjusted to reflect outstanding derivative instruments, and the effective weighted
average interest rates as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, consisted of the following (dollars in thousands):
        Effective         Effective  
Adjusted Balance Weighted Adjusted Weighted 
as of Average Balance as of Average  
Debt Subject to December 31, 2020 Interest Rate(1)December 31, 2019 Interest Rate(1)
Fixed Rate $  23,477,498  3.50% $  23,298,167  3.46%
Variable Rate   3,245,863  1.31%   865,063  2.61%
$  26,723,361  2.98% $  24,163,230  3.16%
(1)Effective weighted average interest rate excludes the impact of net discounts and debt issuance costs.
Contractual Obligations and Off-balance Sheet Arrangements
In regards to long-term debt arrangements, the following table summarizes the material aspects of these
future obligations on our consolidated indebtedness as of December 31, 2020, and subsequent years thereafter
(dollars in thousands) assuming the obligations remain outstanding through initial maturities:
    2021     2022-2023    2024-2025    After 2025    Total  
Long Term Debt (1) (2) (5) $ 
2,322,729 $ 
6,664,864 $ 
6,034,695 $ 11,768,557 $ 26,790,845
Interest Payments (3)   787,627   
1,367,869   
1,065,883   3,888,169   7,109,548
Consolidated Capital
Expenditure Commitments (3)   183,447   —   —   —   183,447
Lease Commitments (4)   32,787   65,765   66,185   886,336   1,051,073
(1)Represents principal maturities only and, therefore, excludes net discounts and debt issuance costs.
(2)Variable rate interest payments are estimated based on the LIBOR or other applicable rate at December 31,
2020.
(3)Represents contractual commitments for capital projects and services at December 31, 2020. Our share of
estimated 2020 development, redevelopment and expansion activity is further discussed below under
“Development Activity”.
(4)Represents only the minimum non-cancellable lease period, excluding applicable lease extension and renewal
options, unless reasonably certain of exercise.
(5)The amount due in 2021 includes $623.0 million in Global Commercial Paper.
Our off-balance sheet arrangements consist primarily of our investments in joint ventures which are common
in the real estate industry and are described in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements. Our
joint ventures typically fund their cash needs through secured non-recourse debt financings obtained by and in the
name of the joint venture entity. The joint venture debt is secured by a first mortgage, is without recourse to the joint
venture partners, and does not represent a liability of the partners, except to the extent the partners or their
affiliates expressly guarantee the joint venture debt. As of December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership
guaranteed joint venture-related mortgage
Table of Contents
71indebtedness of $219.2 million. Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating Partnership are secured by the property of
the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding obligation and which has an estimated fair
value in excess of the guaranteed amount. We may elect to fund cash needs of a joint venture through equity
contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although
such fundings are not required contractually or otherwise.
Hurricane Impacts
As discussed further in Note 10 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, during the third quarter
of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained significant property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Maria.  
Since the date of the loss, we have received $81.1 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers
related to the two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $47.5 million was used for property restoration and
remediation and to reduce the insurance recovery receivable.  During the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019, we recorded $5.2 million and $10.5 million, respectively, as business interruption income, which was
recorded in other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Texas experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Hanna.  We wrote-off assets of approximately $9.6 million, and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $14.3 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Louisiana experienced property damage
and business interruption as a result of Hurricane Laura.   We wrote-off assets of approximately $11.1 million and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $20.6 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.  
Acquisitions and Dispositions
Buy-sell, marketing rights, and other exit mechanisms are common in real estate partnership agreements.
Most of our partners are institutional investors who have a history of direct investment in retail real estate. We and
our partners in our joint venture properties may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar
restrictions). If we determine it is in our best interests for us to purchase the joint venture interest and we believe we
have adequate liquidity to execute the purchase without hindering our cash flows, then we may initiate these
provisions or elect to buy our partner’s interest. If we decide to sell any of our joint venture interests, we expect to
use the net proceeds to reduce outstanding indebtedness or to reinvest in development, redevelopment, or
expansion opportunities.
Acquisitions.  In January 2020, we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group and
ABG, respectively, for $6.7 million and $33.5 million, respectively. During the third quarter of 2020, SPARC acquired
certain assets and operations of Brooks Brothers and Lucky Brands out of bankruptcy. At September 30, 2020, our
noncontrolling equity method interests in the operations venture of SPARC Group and in ABG were 50.0% and
6.8%, respectively.
On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties
from our joint venture partner for cash consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a
$21.5 million, 4.02% variable rate mortgage.
On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from our joint
venture partner.  The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or approximately $84.1 million, as consideration
for the acquisition.  The property is subject to a $215.0 million 4.22% fixed rate mortgage loan.
Dispositions.  We may continue to pursue the disposition of properties that no longer meet our strategic
criteria or that are not a primary retail venue within their trade area.
During 2020, we disposed of our interest in one consolidated retail property. A portion of the gross proceeds
on this transaction of $33.4 million was used to partially repay a cross-collateralized mortgage. Our share of the
$12.3 million gain is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and
comprehensive income.
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross
proceeds on this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in
the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income. We also recorded net gains of
$62.1 million, primarily
Table of Contents
72related to Klépierre’s disposition of its interests in certain shopping centers, of which our share was $58.6 million, as
discussed in Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements.
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included
the foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and $80.0 million non-
recourse mortgage loans and, as discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, our
interest in the German department store properties owned through our investment in HBS was sold during the
fourth quarter of 2018. Also, as discussed further in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements,
Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers resulting in a gain of which our share was $20.2
million.
Joint Venture Formation Activity
On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% ownership interest in TRG, which has an
ownership interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Under the terms of the
transaction, we, through the Operating Partnership, acquired all of Taubman Centers, Inc. common stock for $43.00
per share in cash. Total consideration for the acquisition, including the redemption of Taubman’s $192.5 million
6.5% Series J Cumulative Preferred Shares and its $170.0 million 6.25% Series K Cumulative Preferred Shares,
and the issuance of 955,705 Operating Partnership units, was approximately $3.5 billion.  Our investment includes
the 6.38% Series A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units for $362.5 million issued to us.
On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C. Penney,
a department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our noncontrolling interest in the venture is 41.67% and was
acquired for cash consideration of $125.0 million.
On February 19, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever 21, a
retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interests were acquired through two separate joint
ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our noncontrolling interest in each of the retail operations
venture and in the licensing venture is 37.5%. Our aggregate investment in the ventures was $67.6 million. In
connection with the acquisition of our interest, the Forever 21 joint venture recorded a non-cash bargain purchase
gain of which our share of $35.0 million pre-tax is included in income from unconsolidated entities in the
consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On October 16, 2019, we contributed approximately $276.8 million consisting of cash and the Shop
Premium Outlets, or SPO, assets for a 45% noncontrolling interest in Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, to create a new
multi-platform venture dedicated to digital value shopping, as further discussed in Note 6 to the consolidated
financial statements.  
Development Activity
We routinely incur costs related to construction for significant redevelopment and expansion projects at our
properties. Redevelopment and expansion projects, including the addition of anchors, big box tenants, and
restaurants are underway at several properties in the United States, Canada, Europe, and Asia.
In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the Company has suspended more than $1.0 billion of capital in
development projects.  The Company will re-evaluate all suspended projects over time.  Construction continues on
certain redevelopment and new development projects in the U.S. and internationally that are nearing completion.
 Our share of the costs of all new development, redevelopment and expansion projects currently under construction
is approximately $829 million.  Simon’s share of remaining net cash funding required to complete the new
development and redevelopment projects currently under construction is approximately $89 million.  We expect to
fund these capital projects with cash flows from operations. We seek a stabilized return on invested capital in the
range of 8-10% for all of our new development, expansion and redevelopment projects.
Table of Contents
73Summary of Capital Expenditures.  The following table summarizes total capital expenditures on
consolidated properties on a cash basis (in millions):
    2020    2019    2018 
New Developments $ 27 $ 73 $ 87
Redevelopments and Expansions   
399   
498   419
Tenant Allowances   53   
162   144
Operational Capital Expenditures   5  
143   132
Total $ 
484 $ 
876 $ 782
Table of Contents
74International Development Activity  
We typically reinvest net cash flow from our international joint ventures to fund future international
development activity. We believe this strategy mitigates some of the risk of our initial investment and our exposure
to changes in foreign currencies. We have also funded most of our foreign investments with local currency-
denominated borrowings that act as a natural hedge against fluctuations in exchange rates. Our consolidated net
income exposure to changes in the volatility of the Euro, Yen, Peso, Won, and other foreign currencies is not
material. We expect our share of estimated committed capital for international development projects to be
completed with projected delivery in 2021 or 2022 is $36 million, primarily funded through reinvested joint venture
cash flow and construction loans.
The following table describes recently completed and new development and expansion projects as well as
our share of the estimated total cost as of December 31, 2020 (in millions):
Gross Our Our Share of Our Share of Projected
LeasableOwnershipProjected Net CostProjected Net Cost Opening
Property    Location    Area (sqft)   Percentage   (in Local Currency)   (in USD)  (1)   Date
New Development
Projects:
Málaga Designer Outlet Málaga, Spain  191,000 46%EUR  50.3$  61.7 Opened Feb. -
2020
Siam Premium Outlets
BangkokBangkok, Thailand  264,000 50%THB  1,654$  55.2 Opened Jun. -
2020
West Midlands Designer
OutletCannock (West
Midlands), England 197,000 23%GBP  31.2$  42.6 Mar. 2021
Expansions:
Gotemba Premium Outlets
Phase 4Gotemba, Japan  178,000 40%JPY  7,476$  72.5 Opened Jun. -
2020
Rinku Premium Outlets
Phase 5Izumisano (Osaka),
Japan 110,000 40%JPY  3,219$  31.2 Opened Aug. -
2020
La Reggia Designer Outlet
Phase 3Marcianise (Naples),
Italy 58,000 92%EUR  30.9$  37.9 Nov. 2021
(1)USD equivalent based upon December 31, 2020 foreign currency exchange rates.
Dividends, Distributions and Stock Repurchase Program
Simon paid a common stock dividend of $1.30 per share in the fourth quarter of 2020 and $4.70 per share
for the year ended December 31, 2020. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts.
In 2019, Simon paid dividends of $2.10 and $8.30 per share for the three and twelve month periods ended
December 31, 2019, respectively. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts. On
December 15, 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend for the fourth quarter of 2020 of
$1.30 per share, payable on January 22, 2021 to shareholders of record on December 24, 2020.  The distribution
rate on units is equal to the dividend rate on common stock. In order to maintain its status as a REIT, Simon must
pay a minimum amount of dividends. Simon’s future dividends and the Operating Partnership’s future distributions
will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial
condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner distributions, cash
reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount
required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's
Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the plan, Simon could repurchase up
to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period ending February 11, 2021 in the open market or in
privately negotiated transactions as market conditions warrant.  During the year ended December 31, 2020, Simon
purchased 1,245,654 shares at an average price of $122.50 per share.  During the year ended December 31, 2019,
Simon purchased 2,247,074 shares at an average price of $160.11 per share, of which 46,377 shares at an
average price of $164.49 were purchased as part of the previous program.  At December 31, 2020, we had
remaining authority to repurchase approximately $1.5 billion of common stock, which has subsequently expired.  As
Simon repurchases shares under these programs, the Operating Partnership repurchases an equal number of units
from Simon.  
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made in this section or elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K may be deemed
"forward–looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Although
we believe the expectations reflected in any forward–looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we
can give no assurance that its expectations will be attained, and it is possible that our actual results may differ
materially from those indicated by
Table of Contents
75these forward–looking statements due to a variety of risks, uncertainties and other factors. Such factors include, but
are not limited to: uncertainties regarding the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and governmental restrictions
intended to prevent its spread on our business, financial condition, results of operations, cash flow and liquidity and
our ability to access the capital markets, satisfy our debt service obligations and make distributions to our
stockholders; changes in economic and market conditions that may adversely affect the general retail environment;
the potential loss of anchor stores or major tenants; the inability to collect rent due to the bankruptcy or insolvency
of tenants or otherwise; the intensely competitive market environment in the retail industry, including e-commerce;
an increase in vacant space at our properties; the inability to lease newly developed properties and renew leases
and relet space at existing properties on favorable terms; our international activities subjecting us to risks that are
different from or greater than those associated with our domestic operations, including changes in foreign exchange
rates; risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment, expansion, leasing and management of
properties; general risks related to real estate investments, including the illiquidity of real estate investments; the
impact of our substantial indebtedness on our future operations, including covenants in the governing agreements
that impose restrictions on us that may affect our ability to operate freely; any disruption in the financial markets that
may adversely affect our ability to access capital for growth and satisfy our ongoing debt service requirements; any
change in our credit rating; changes in market rates of interest; the transition of LIBOR to an alternative reference
rate; our continued ability to maintain our status as a REIT; changes in tax laws or regulations that result in adverse
tax consequences; risks relating to our joint venture properties, including guarantees of certain joint venture
indebtedness; environmental liabilities; natural disasters; the availability of comprehensive insurance coverage; the
potential for terrorist activities;  security breaches that could compromise our information technology or
infrastructure; and the loss of key management personnel; and. We discussed these and other risks and
uncertainties under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part 1, Item 1A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. We may
update that discussion in subsequent other periodic reports, but except as required by law, we undertake no duty or
obligation to update or revise these forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future
developments, or otherwise.  
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Industry practice is to evaluate real estate properties in part based on performance measures such as FFO,
diluted FFO per share, NOI, and portfolio NOI. We believe that these non-GAAP measures are helpful to investors
because they are widely recognized measures of the performance of REITs and provide a relevant basis for
comparison among REITs. We also use these measures internally to measure the operating performance of our
portfolio.
We determine FFO based upon the definition set forth by the National Association of Real Estate Investment
Trusts (“NAREIT”) Funds From Operations White Paper – 2018 Restatement.  Our main business includes
acquiring, owning, operating, developing, and redeveloping real estate in conjunction with the rental of real estate.
 Gains and losses of assets incidental to our main business are included in FFO.  We determine FFO to be our
share of consolidated net income computed in accordance with GAAP:
●excluding real estate related depreciation and amortization,
●excluding gains and losses from extraordinary items,
●excluding gains and losses from the sale, disposal or property insurance recoveries of, or any impairment
related to, depreciable retail operating properties,
●plus the allocable portion of FFO of unconsolidated joint ventures based upon economic ownership
interest, and
●all determined on a consistent basis in accordance with GAAP.
You should understand that our computations of these non-GAAP measures might not be comparable to
similar measures reported by other REITs and that these non-GAAP measures:
●do not represent cash flow from operations as defined by GAAP,
●should not be considered as an alternative to net income determined in accordance with GAAP as a
measure of operating performance, and
●are not an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity.
Table of Contents
76The following schedule reconciles total FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, diluted net income
per share to diluted FFO per share.
 
2020 2019 2018
(in thousands)  
Funds from Operations (A) $3,236,963 $4,272,271 $ 
4,324,601
Change in FFO from prior period   (24.2)%    (1.2)%    7.6%
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324 $2,423,188 $ 
2,822,343
Adjustments to Arrive at FFO:
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties  1,308,419  1,329,843   
1,270,888
Our share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated
entities, including Klépierre and other corporate investments   536,133   551,596   533,595
Loss (gain) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests
in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   114,960   (14,883)  (288,827)
Unrealized losses (gains) in fair value of equity instruments  19,632  8,212  15,212
Net loss (gain) attributable to noncontrolling interest holders in
properties   4,378   (991)  (11,327)
Noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization and
loss (gain) on disposal of properties   (18,631)  (19,442)  (12,031)
Preferred distributions and dividends   (5,252)  (5,252)  (5,252)
FFO of the Operating Partnership (A) $3,236,963 $4,272,271 $ 
4,324,601
FFO allocable to limited partners   424,063   563,342   568,817
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders (A) $2,812,900 $3,708,929 $ 
3,755,784
Diluted net income per share to diluted FFO per share reconciliation:
Diluted net income per share $  3.59 $  6.81 $  7.87
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties and our
share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated entities,
including Klépierre and other corporate investments, net of
noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization   5.14   5.25   5.01
Loss (gain) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests
in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net   0.32   (0.04)  (0.79)
Unrealized losses (gains) in fair value of equity instruments  0.06  0.02  0.04
Diluted FFO per share (A) $  9.11 $  12.04 $  12.13
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   308,738   307,950   309,627
Weighted average limited partnership units outstanding   46,544   46,774   46,893
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares and units outstanding   355,282   354,724   356,520
(A)Includes FFO of the Operating Partnership related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million for the
year ended December 31, 2019. Includes Diluted FFO per share/unit related to a loss on extinguishment of
debt of $0.33 for the year ended December 31, 2019. Includes Diluted FFO allocable to common stockholders
related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $100.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Table of Contents
77The following schedule reconciles consolidated net income to NOI.
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2020     2019  
(in thousands)  
Reconciliation of NOI of consolidated entities:      
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324 $2,423,188
Income and other tax expense (benefit)   (4,637)  30,054
Interest expense   784,400   789,353
Income from unconsolidated entities   (219,870)  (444,349)
Loss on extinguishment of debt  --  116,256
Unrealized losses (gains) in fair value of equity instruments   19,632   8,212
Loss (gain) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net   114,960   (14,883)
Operating Income Before Other Items  1,971,809  2,907,831
Depreciation and amortization  1,318,008  1,340,503
Home and regional office costs  171,668  190,109
General and administrative  22,572  34,860
NOI of consolidated entities $3,484,057 $4,473,303
Reconciliation of NOI of unconsolidated entities:
Net Income $ 453,816 $ 892,506
Interest expense   616,332   636,988
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities,
net   —   (24,609)
Operating Income Before Other Items  1,070,148  1,504,885
Depreciation and amortization   692,424   681,764
NOI of unconsolidated entities $1,762,572 $2,186,649
Add: Our share of NOI from Klépierre, and other corporate investments  253,093  293,979
Combined NOI $5,499,722 $6,953,931
Less: Corporate and Other NOI Sources (1)   228,874   548,117
Less: Our share of NOI from Retailer Investments  21,507  40,149
Less: Our share of NOI from Investments (2)  194,174  269,598
Portfolio NOI $5,055,167 $6,096,067
Portfolio NOI Change  (17.1)%  
(1)Includes income components excluded from portfolio NOI (domestic lease termination income, interest income,
land sale gains, straight line lease income, above/below market lease adjustments), unrealized and realized
gains/losses on non-real estate related equity instruments, Northgate, Simon management company revenues,
and other assets.
(2)Includes our share of NOI of Klépierre (at constant currency) and other corporate investments.
Item 7A.  Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt
obligations. We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a
combination of interest rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt. We are
also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of certain foreign operations. Our intent is to offset gains and
losses that occur on the underlying exposures, with gains and losses on the derivative contracts hedging these
exposures. We do not enter into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate protection agreements for
speculative purposes.
Table of Contents
78We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of anticipated issuances of senior notes. Upon
completion of the debt issuance, the cost of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
Our future earnings, cash flows and fair values relating to financial instruments are dependent upon
prevalent market rates of interest, primarily LIBOR. Based upon consolidated indebtedness and interest rates at
December 31, 2020, a 50 basis point increase in the market rates of interest would decrease future earnings and
cash flows by approximately $16.3 million, and would decrease the fair value of debt by approximately
$747.2 million.
Table of Contents
79Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion,
Simon Property Group, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed
in the Index at Item 15(a) and our report dated February 25, 2021, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting
and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on
the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission
and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial
reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk
that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control
based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting
includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the
policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 25, 2021
Table of Contents
80Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, Inc. (the
Company) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020,
and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as
the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all
material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based
on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our report dated February 25, 2021, expressed
an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission
and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks
of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the
financial statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1)
relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially
challenging, subjective or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way
our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the
critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or
disclosures to which they relate.
Evaluation of Investment Properties for Impairment
Description of
the MatterAt December 31, 2020, the Company’s consolidated net investment properties totaled $23.2
billion. In addition, a significant number of the Company’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investment in Klépierre hold investment properties. As discussed in Note 3 to
the consolidated financial statements, the Company reviews investment properties for
impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or changes in
circumstances that indicate the carrying value of an investment property may not be
recoverable. The Company estimates undiscounted cash flows of an investment property using
observable and unobservable inputs such as historical and forecasted cash flows, operating
income before depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization rates, leasing prospects
and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment was complex due to
the estimation uncertainty in determining the undiscounted cash flows of an investment
property. In particular, the impairment evaluation for investment properties was sensitive to
significant assumptions such as forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization, and capitalization rates, all of which can be affected by
expectations about future market
Table of Contents
81or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for evaluating investment properties for impairment,
including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions described above.  
To test the Company’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied, evaluating the
significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and accuracy of the
underlying data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information,
and other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating
certain assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income
before depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant
variances, including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our
evaluation, we assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed
sensitivity analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the undiscounted
cash flows of the related investment property that would result from changes in the
assumptions.
Evaluation of Investments in Unconsolidated Entities for Impairment
Description of
the MatterAt December 31, 2020, the carrying value of the Company’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investment in Klépierre totaled $4.3 billion. As explained in Note 3 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Company reviews investments in unconsolidated entities
for impairment if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of an
investment in an unconsolidated entity may not be recoverable. To identify and evaluate
whether an other-than-temporary decline in the fair value of an investment below its carrying
value has occurred, the Company assesses economic and operating conditions that may affect
the fair value of the investment. The evaluation of operating conditions may include developing
estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization to
support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the investment. When required, the
Company estimates the fair value of an investment and assesses whether any impairment is
other-than-temporary using observable and unobservable inputs such as historical and
forecasted cash flows or operating income, estimated capitalization and discount rates, or
relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment
was complex due to the estimation uncertainty in determining the forecasted cash flows,
operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated fair value of each investment
and whether any decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying amount is other-
than-temporary. In particular, the impairment evaluation for these investments was sensitive to
significant assumptions such as forecasted cash flows, operating income before depreciation
and amortization, relevant market multiples, and capitalization and discount rates, all of which
can be affected by expectations about future market or economic conditions, demand, and
competition.
Table of Contents
82How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for evaluating investments in unconsolidated entities for
impairment, including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions
described above.
To test the Company’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment, we
performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied,
evaluating the significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and
accuracy of data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant
assumptions used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market
information, and other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in
evaluating certain assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and
operating income before depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and
evaluated significant variances, including consideration of the current economic environment.
As part of our evaluation, we assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and
performed sensitivity analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the cash
flows and the fair value of the related investment that would result from changes in the
assumptions, and we evaluated whether a decline in fair value below the related investment’s
carrying value was other-than-temporary.
Evaluation of Collectability of Tenant Receivables and Accrued Revenue
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2020, the Company’s tenant receivables and accrued revenue totaled $1.2
billion. As discussed in Notes 3 and 9 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company
accrues fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease when the
Company believes substantially all lease income, including the related straight-line receivable,
is probable of collection. The Company’s assessment of collectability incorporates available
tenant operational and liquidity information and includes expectations and estimates made by
the Company with respect to each lease.
Auditing management’s evaluation of collectability of tenant receivables and accrued revenue
was challenging due to the significant judgment that was necessary when assessing whether it
is probable that the tenant will pay outstanding receivables and whether it is probable that
substantially all future lease payments will be collected in accordance with the lease terms. In
particular, the assessment of collectability incorporates information regarding a tenant’s
financial condition that is obtained from available financial data, the expected outcome of
contractual disputes and management’s communications and negotiations with the tenant.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’s process for evaluating collectability of tenant receivables and
accrued revenues, including controls over management’s review of the information and
judgments described above.
To test the Company’s evaluation of collectability of tenant receivables and accrued revenue,
we performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies
applied and evaluating the information used by management in its analysis. As part of our
assessment, we reviewed executed lease agreements and amendments, evaluated publicly
available information on the tenant’s financial condition and operational performance and
considered recent collections activity. Further, we evaluated the status of contractual disputes
with certain tenants, including review of the related lease agreements, considered recent
resolutions of similar matters and obtained representations from internal legal counsel. We
also evaluated the impact of activity subsequent to the balance sheet date on the Company’s
estimates.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 25, 2021
Table of Contents
83Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, L.P.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion,
Simon Property Group, L.P. (the Partnership) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Partnership as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the
three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed
in the Index at Item 15(a) and our report dated February 25, 2021, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Partnership’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial
reporting and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the
accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express
an opinion on the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public
accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Partnership in
accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and
Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial
reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk
that a material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control
based on the assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the
circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting
includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail,
accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable
assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made
only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that
controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the
policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 25, 2021
Table of Contents
84Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, L.P. (the
Partnership) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the related consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020
and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as
the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all
material respects, the financial position of the Partnership at December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with
U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board
(United States) (PCAOB), the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020,
based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) and our report dated February 25, 2021, expressed
an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Partnership’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on the Partnership’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with
the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we
plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks
of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that
respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and
disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial
statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to
accounts or disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging,
subjective or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion
on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit
matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which
they relate.
Evaluation of Investment Properties for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2020, the Partnership’s consolidated net investment properties totaled $23.2
billion. In addition, a significant number of the Partnership’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investment in Klépierre hold investment properties. As discussed in Note 3 to
the consolidated financial statements, the Partnership reviews investment properties for
impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or changes in
circumstances that indicate the carrying value of an investment property may not be
recoverable. The Partnership estimates undiscounted cash flows of an investment property
using observable and unobservable inputs such as historical and forecasted cash flows,
operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization rates, leasing
prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment was complex due
to the estimation uncertainty in determining the undiscounted cash flows of an investment
property. In particular, the impairment evaluation for investment properties was sensitive to
significant
Table of Contents
85assumptions such as forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciation and
amortization, and capitalization rates, all of which can be affected by expectations about future
market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for evaluating investment properties for impairment,
including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions described above.  
To test the Partnership’s evaluation of investment properties for impairment, we performed
audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied,
evaluating the significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and
accuracy of the underlying data used by management in its analysis. We compared the
significant assumptions used by management to current industry and economic trends,
relevant market information, and other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation
specialist to assist in evaluating certain assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted
cash flows and operating income before depreciation and amortization to historical actual
results and evaluated significant variances, including consideration of the current economic
environment. As part of our evaluation, we assessed the historical accuracy of management’s
estimates and performed sensitivity analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the
changes in the undiscounted cash flows of the related investment property that would result
from changes in the assumptions.
Evaluation of Investments in Unconsolidated Entities for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2020, the carrying value of the Partnership’s investments in unconsolidated
entities and its investment in Klépierre totaled $4.3 billion. As explained in Note 3 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Partnership reviews investments in unconsolidated
entities for impairment if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of
an investment in an unconsolidated entity may not be recoverable. To identify and evaluate
whether an other-than-temporary decline in the fair value of an investment below its carrying
value has occurred, the Partnership assesses economic and operating conditions that may
affect the fair value of the investment. The evaluation of operating conditions may include
developing estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and
amortization to support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the investment. When
required, the Partnership estimates the fair value of an investment and assesses whether any
impairment is other than temporary using observable and unobservable inputs such as
historical and forecasted cash flows or operating income, estimated capitalization and discount
rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment
was complex due to the estimation uncertainty in determining the forecasted cash flows,
operating income before depreciation and amortization, estimated fair value of each
investment and whether any decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying
amount is other-than-temporary. In particular, the impairment evaluation for these investments
was sensitive to significant assumptions such as forecasted cash flows, operating income
before depreciation and amortization, relevant market multiples, and capitalization and
discount rates, all of which can be affected by expectations about future market or economic
conditions, demand, and competition.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for evaluating investments in unconsolidated entities
for impairment, including controls over management’s review of the significant assumptions
described above.
To test the Partnership’s evaluation of investments in unconsolidated entities for impairment,
we performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies
applied, evaluating the significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness
and accuracy of data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant
assumptions used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market
information, and other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in
evaluating certain
Table of Contents
86assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances,
including consideration of the current economic environment. As part of our evaluation, we
assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed sensitivity
analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the cash flows and the fair
value of the related investment that would result from changes in the assumptions, and we
evaluated whether a decline in fair value below the related investment’s carrying value was
other-than-temporary.
Evaluation of Collectability of Tenant Receivables and Accrued Revenue
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2020, the Partnership’s tenant receivables and accrued revenue totaled $1.2
billion. As discussed in Notes 3 and 9 to the consolidated financial statements, the Partnership
accrues fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease when the
Partnership believes substantially all lease income, including the related straight-line
receivable, is probable of collection. The Partnership’s assessment of collectability
incorporates available tenant operational and liquidity information and includes expectations
and estimates made by the Partnership with respect to each lease.
Auditing management’s evaluation of collectability of tenant receivables and accrued revenue
was challenging due to the significant judgment that was necessary when assessing whether it
is probable that the tenant will pay outstanding receivables and whether it is probable that
substantially all future lease payments will be collected in accordance with the lease terms. In
particular, the assessment of collectability incorporates information regarding a tenant’s
financial condition that is obtained from available financial data, the expected outcome of
contractual disputes and management’s communications and negotiations with the tenant.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Partnership’s process for evaluating collectability of tenant receivables and
accrued revenues, including controls over management’s review of the information and
judgments described above.
To test the Partnership’s evaluation of collectability of tenant receivables and accrued revenue,
we performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies
applied and evaluating the information used by management in its analysis. As part of our
assessment, we reviewed executed lease agreements and amendments, evaluated publicly
available information on the tenant’s financial condition and operational performance and
considered recent collections activity. Further, we evaluated the status of contractual disputes
with certain tenants, including review of the related lease agreements, considered recent
resolutions of similar matters and obtained representations from internal legal counsel. We
also evaluated the impact of activity subsequent to the balance sheet date on the Partnership’s
estimates.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Partnership’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 25, 2021
Table of Contents
87Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except share amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2020 2019  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $38,050,196$37,804,495
Less - accumulated depreciation  14,891,937 13,905,776
 23,158,259 23,898,719
Cash and cash equivalents  1,011,613 669,373
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  1,236,734 832,151
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity  2,603,571 2,371,053
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,729,690 1,731,649
Investment in TRG, at equity 3,451,897 —
Right-of-use assets, net 512,914 514,660
Deferred costs and other assets  1,082,168 1,214,025
Total assets $34,786,846$31,231,630
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $26,723,361$24,163,230
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,311,925 1,390,682
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,577,393 1,566,294
Dividend payable 486,922 —
Lease liabilities 515,492 516,809
Other liabilities  513,515 464,304
Total liabilities  31,128,608 28,101,319
Commitments and contingencies
Limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties  185,892 219,061
EQUITY:
Stockholders’ Equity
Capital stock (850,000,000 total shares authorized, $0.0001 par value,
238,000,000 shares of excess common stock, 100,000,000 authorized shares of
preferred stock):
Series J 83/8% cumulative redeemable preferred stock, 1,000,000 shares
authorized, 796,948 issued and outstanding with a liquidation value of $39,847  42,091 42,420
Common stock, $0.0001 par value, 511,990,000 shares authorized, 342,849,037
and 320,435,256 issued and outstanding, respectively  34 32
Class B common stock, $0.0001 par value, 10,000 shares authorized, 8,000
issued and outstanding  —  —
Capital in excess of par value  11,179,688 9,756,073
Accumulated deficit  (6,102,314) (5,379,952)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (188,675) (118,604)
Common stock held in treasury, at cost, 14,355,621 and 13,574,296 shares,
respectively  (1,891,352) (1,773,571)
Total stockholders’ equity  3,039,472 2,526,398
Noncontrolling interests  432,874 384,852
Total equity  3,472,346 2,911,250
Total liabilities and equity $34,786,846$31,231,630
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
88Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per share amounts)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2020     2019     2018  
REVENUE:
Lease income $4,302,367$5,243,771$5,158,420
Management fees and other revenues  96,882 112,942 116,286
Other income  208,254 398,476 370,582
Total revenue  4,607,503 5,755,189 5,645,288
EXPENSES:
Property operating  349,154 453,145 450,636
Depreciation and amortization  1,318,008 1,340,503 1,282,454
Real estate taxes  457,142 468,004 457,740
Repairs and maintenance  80,858 100,495 99,588
Advertising and promotion  98,613 150,344 151,241
Home and regional office costs  171,668 190,109 136,677
General and administrative  22,572 34,860 46,543
Other  137,679 109,898 94,110
Total operating expenses  2,635,694 2,847,358 2,718,989
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  1,971,809 2,907,831 2,926,299
Interest expense  (784,400) (789,353) (815,923)
Loss on extinguishment of debt — (116,256) —
Income and other tax benefit (expense)  4,637 (30,054) (36,898)
Income from unconsolidated entities  219,870 444,349 475,250
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (19,632) (8,212) (15,212)
(Loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  (114,960) 14,883 288,827
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME 1,277,324 2,423,188 2,822,343
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests  164,760 321,604 382,285
Preferred dividends  3,337 3,337 3,337
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS $1,109,227$2,098,247$2,436,721
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE:
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 3.59$ 6.81$ 7.87
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324$2,423,188$2,822,343
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative hedge agreements  (106,548) (4,066) 21,633
Net (gain) loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings  (106) 13,634 7,020
Currency translation adjustments  27,288 (1,850) (47,038)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  180 718 373
Comprehensive income  1,198,138 2,431,624 2,804,331
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  155,646 322,627 379,837
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders $1,042,492$2,108,997$2,424,494
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
89Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year
Ended December 31, 
2020 2019 2018
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324 $2,423,188 $2,822,343
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash
provided by operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,354,991  1,394,172  1,349,776
Loss on debt extinguishment — 116,256 —
Loss (gain) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  114,960  (14,883) (288,827)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 19,632 8,212 15,212
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 6) — — (35,621)
Straight-line lease loss (income)  19,950  (67,139) (18,325)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (219,870) (444,349) (475,250)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  184,733  428,769  390,137
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  (415,911) (157) (17,518)
Deferred costs and other assets  (28,191) (49,338) (75,438)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred
revenues and other liabilities  19,080  13,100  84,307
Net cash provided by operating activities  2,326,698  3,807,831  3,750,796
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (3,606,694) (12,800) (51,060)
Funding of loans to related parties  (8,236) —  (4,641)
Proceeds on loans to related parties  —  7,641  —
Capital expenditures, net  (484,119) (876,011) (781,909)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  —  1,045  11,276
Net proceeds from sale of assets  33,418  6,776  183,241
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (191,368) (63,789) (63,397)
Purchase of equity instruments  (32,955) (374,231) (21,563)
Proceeds from sales of equity instruments  30,000  —  25,000
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 31,198 5,662 19,083
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  250,358  229,000  447,464
Net cash used in investing activities  (3,978,398) (1,076,707) (236,506)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Proceeds from sales of common stock and other, net of
transaction costs  1,556,148  (328) (329)
Purchase of shares related to stock grant recipients' tax
withholdings (854) (2,955) (2,911)
Redemption of limited partner units  (16,106) (6,846) (81,506)
Purchase of treasury stock (152,589) (359,773) (354,108)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (8,271) (41,549) (76,963)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  220  139  161
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership  (1,915) (1,915) (1,915)
Distributions to stockholders and preferred dividends  (1,443,183) (2,558,944) (2,449,071)
Distributions to limited partners  (219,095) (388,542) (370,656)
Cash paid to extinguish debt — (99,975) —
Proceeds from issuance of debt, net of transaction costs  15,234,860  13,312,301  7,973,719
Repayments of debt  (12,955,275) (12,427,699) (9,118,685)
Net cash provided by (used in) provided by financing
activities  1,993,940  (2,576,086) (4,482,264)
INCREASE (DECREASE) IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  342,240  155,038  (967,974)
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period 669,373  514,335  1,482,309
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $1,011,613 $ 669,373 $514,335
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
90Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2017 $43,077 $ 32 $ (110,453 )$9,614,748 $(4,782,173 )$(1,079,063 )$ 552,596 $4,238,764
Exchange of limited partner units ( 92,732
common shares, Note 8) 1,004 (1,004 ) —
Issuance of limited partner units ( 475,183
units) 84,103 84,103
Series J preferred stock premium
amortization (329) (329)
Stock incentive program ( 51,756  common
shares, net) (8,651 ) 8,651  —
Redemption of limited partner units
(454,704  units) (76,555 ) (4,951 ) (81,506 )
Amortization of stock incentive 12,029 12,029
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,275,194
shares) (354,108 ) (354,108 )
Long-term incentive performance units 26,172 26,172
Cumulative ef fect of accounting change 7,264 7,264
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(18,680  common shares repurchased) 1,602 (109,147 ) (2,911 ) (2,510 ) (112,966 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities 18,781 2,852 21,633
Currency translation adjustments (40,766 ) (6,271 ) (47,037)
Changes in available-for-sale securities
and other 324 49 373
Net gain reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into
earnings 6,097 923 7,020
Other comprehensive income (15,564 ) (2,447 ) (18,011 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest
from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership 156,241 (156,241 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (2,449,071 ) (370,656 ) (2,819,727 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (1,741 ) (1,741 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable
to preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and $3,416  attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 2,440,058 376,954  2,817,012
Balance at December 31, 2018 $42,748 $ 32 $ (126,017 )$9,700,418 $(4,893,069 )$(1,427,431 )$ 500,275 $3,796,956
Exchange of limited partner units ( 24,000
common shares, Note 8) 253 (253) —
Series J preferred stock premium
amortization (328) (328)
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common
shares, net) (16,589 ) 16,589 —
Redemption of limited partner units
(43,255  units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,247,074
shares) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(16,336  common shares repurchased) 19 (29,523 ) (2,956 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized gain on  hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities
and other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into
earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023 8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest
from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (2,558,944 ) (388,541 ) (2,947,485 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (2,446 ) (2,446 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable
to preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $431 loss
attributable to noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties 2,101,584 320,120 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $42,420 $ 32 $ (118,604 )$9,756,073 $(5,379,952 )$(1,773,571 )$ 384,852 $2,911,250
Table of Contents
91            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Exchange of limited partner units
(293,204  common shares, Note 8) 2,028 (2,028 ) —
Issuance of limited partner units ( 955,705
units) 79,601 79,601
Public of fering of common stock
(22,137,500  common shares) 2 1,556,477 — 1,556,479
Series J preferred stock premium
amortization (329) (329)
Stock incentive program ( 462,967
common shares, net) (35,662 ) 35,662 —
Redemption of limited partner units
(116,658  units) (15,163 ) (943) (16,106 )
Amortization of stock incentive 11,660 11,660
Treasury stock purchase ( 1,245,654
shares) (152,590 ) (152,590 )
Long-term incentive performance units 2,331 2,331
Issuance of unit equivalents and other
(15,561  common shares repurchased) 30 34,894 (853) (3,582 ) 30,489
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (92,834 ) (13,714 ) (106,548 )
Currency translation adjustments 22,694 4,594 27,288
Changes in available-for-sale securities
and other 162 18 180
Net gain reclassified from accumulated
other comprehensive loss into
earnings (93) (13) (106)
Other comprehensive income (70,071 ) (9,115 ) (79,186 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest
from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership (95,755 ) 95,755 —
Distributions to common stockholders and
limited partners, excluding Operating
Partnership preferred interests (1,869,820 ) (279,379 ) (2,149,199 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (3,507 ) (3,507 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable
to preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $6,044  loss
attributable to noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties 1,112,564 168,889 1,281,453
Balance at December 31, 2020 $42,091 $ 34 $ (188,675 )$11,179,688 $(6,102,314 )$(1,891,352 )$ 432,874 $3,472,346
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
92Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except unit amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2020 2019  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $38,050,196$37,804,495
Less — accumulated depreciation  14,891,937  13,905,776
 23,158,259  23,898,719
Cash and cash equivalents  1,011,613  669,373
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  1,236,734  832,151
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity  2,603,571  2,371,053
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,729,690  1,731,649
Investment in TRG, at equity 3,451,897 —
Right-of-use assets, net 512,914 514,660
Deferred costs and other assets  1,082,168  1,214,025
Total assets $34,786,846$31,231,630
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $26,723,361$24,163,230
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,311,925  1,390,682
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,577,393  1,566,294
Distribution payable 486,922 —
Lease liabilities 515,492 516,809
Other liabilities  513,515  464,304
Total liabilities  31,128,608  28,101,319
Commitments and contingencies
Preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable
interests in properties  185,892  219,061
EQUITY:
Partners’ Equity
Preferred units, 796,948 units outstanding. Liquidation value of $39,847  42,091  42,420
General Partner, 328,501,416 and 306,868,960 units outstanding, respectively  2,997,381  2,483,978
Limited Partners, 47,322,212 and 46,740,117 units outstanding, respectively  431,784  378,339
Total partners’ equity  3,471,256  2,904,737
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  1,090  6,513
Total equity  3,472,346  2,911,250
Total liabilities and equity $34,786,846$31,231,630
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
93Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per unit amounts)
 For the Year  
 Ended December 31,  
 2020 2019 2018  
REVENUE:           
Lease income $4,302,367$5,243,771$5,158,420
Management fees and other revenues  96,882 112,942 116,286
Other income  208,254 398,476 370,582
Total revenue  4,607,503 5,755,189 5,645,288
EXPENSES:
Property operating  349,154 453,145 450,636
Depreciation and amortization  1,318,008 1,340,503 1,282,454
Real estate taxes  457,142 468,004 457,740
Repairs and maintenance  80,858 100,495 99,588
Advertising and promotion  98,613 150,344 151,241
Home and regional office costs  171,668 190,109 136,677
General and administrative  22,572 34,860 46,543
Other  137,679 109,898 94,110
Total operating expenses  2,635,694 2,847,358 2,718,989
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  1,971,809 2,907,831 2,926,299
Interest expense  (784,400) (789,353) (815,923)
Loss on extinguishment of debt — (116,256) —
Income and other tax benefit (expense)  4,637 (30,054) (36,898)
Income from unconsolidated entities  219,870 444,349 475,250
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (19,632) (8,212) (15,212)
(Loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  (114,960) 14,883 288,827
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME  1,277,324 2,423,188 2,822,343
Net (loss) income attributable to noncontrolling interests  (4,378) 991 11,327
Preferred unit requirements  5,252 5,252 5,252
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS $1,276,450$2,416,945$2,805,764
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS ATTRIBUTABLE TO:
General Partner $1,109,227$2,098,247$2,436,721
Limited Partners  167,223 318,698 369,043
Net income attributable to unitholders $1,276,450$2,416,945$2,805,764
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER UNIT:
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 3.59$ 6.81$ 7.87
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324$2,423,188$2,822,343
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative hedge agreements  (106,548) (4,066) 21,633
Net (gain) loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings  (106) 13,634 7,020
Currency translation adjustments  27,288 (1,850) (47,038)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  180 718 373
Comprehensive income  1,198,138 2,431,624 2,804,331
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  1,666 1,422 7,911
Comprehensive income attributable to unitholders $1,196,472$2,430,202$2,796,420
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
94Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2020     2019     2018 
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:       
Consolidated Net Income $1,277,324$2,423,188$2,822,343
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided
by operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,354,991  1,394,172  1,349,776
Loss on debt extinguishment — 116,256 —
Loss (gain) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and
interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  114,960  (14,883) (288,827)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 19,632 8,212 15,212
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 6) — — (35,621)
Straight-line lease loss (income)  19,950  (67,139) (18,325)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (219,870) (444,349) (475,250)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  184,733  428,769  390,137
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  (415,911) (157) (17,518)
Deferred costs and other assets  (28,191) (49,338) (75,438)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred
revenues and other liabilities  19,080  13,100  84,307
Net cash provided by operating activities  2,326,698  3,807,831  3,750,796
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (3,606,694) (12,800) (51,060)
Funding of loans to related parties (8,236) — (4,641)
Proceeds on loans to related parties  —  7,641  —
Capital expenditures, net  (484,119) (876,011) (781,909)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  —  1,045  11,276
Net proceeds from sale of assets 33,418 6,776 183,241
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (191,368) (63,789) (63,397)
Purchase of equity instruments  (32,955) (374,231) (21,563)
Proceeds from sales of equity instruments 30,000 — 25,000
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 31,198 5,662 19,083
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  250,358  229,000  447,464
Net cash used in investing activities  (3,978,398) (1,076,707) (236,506)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Issuance of units and other  1,556,148  (328) (329)
Purchase of units related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings (854) (2,955) (2,911)
Redemption of limited partner units (16,106) (6,846) (81,506)
Purchase of general partner units (152,589) (359,773) (354,108)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (8,271) (41,549) (76,963)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  220  139  161
Partnership distributions  (1,664,193) (2,949,401) (2,821,642)
Cash paid to extinguish debt — (99,975) —
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness proceeds, net of transaction
costs  15,234,860  13,312,301  7,973,719
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness principal payments  (12,955,275) (12,427,699) (9,118,685)
Net cash provided by (used in) provided by financing
activities  1,993,940  (2,576,086) (4,482,264)
INCREASE (DECREASE) IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  342,240  155,038  (967,974)
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period  669,373  514,335  1,482,309
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $1,011,613$ 669,373$514,335
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
95Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
    Units     General Partner)     Partners     Interests     Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 43,077 $ 3,643,091 $ 548,858 $ 3,738 $ 4,238,764
Issuance of limited partner units ( 475,183  units) 84,103 84,103
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (329) (329)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 92,732  units) 1,004 (1,004 ) —
Stock incentive program ( 51,756  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 12,029 12,029
Redemption of limited partner units ( 454,704  units) (76,555 ) (4,951 ) (81,506 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,275,194  units) (354,108 ) (354,108 )
Long-term incentive performance units 26,172 26,172
Cumulative ef fect of accounting change 7,264 7,264
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 18,680  common units) (110,456 ) (2,510 ) (112,966 )
Unrealized gain on hedging activities 18,781 2,852 21,633
Currency translation adjustments (40,766 ) (6,271 ) (47,037)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 324 49 373
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings 6,097 923 7,020
Other comprehensive income (15,564 ) (2,447 ) (18,011 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership 156,241 (156,241 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as
temporary equity (3,337 ) (2,445,734 ) (370,656 ) (1,741 ) (2,821,468 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred
units of $1,915  and $3,416  attributable to noncontrolling redeemable
interests in properties 3,337 2,436,721 369,043 7,911 2,817,012
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 42,748 $ 3,253,933 $ 492,877 $ 7,398 $ 3,796,956
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (328) (328)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 24,000  units) 253 (253) —
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Redemption of limited partner units ( 43,255  units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,247,074  units) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 16,336  common units) (32,460 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023 8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as
temporary equity (3,337 ) (2,555,607 ) (388,541 ) (2,446 ) (2,949,931 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred
units of $1,915  and a $431 loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable
interests in properties 3,337 2,098,247 318,698 1,422 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 42,420 $ 2,483,978 $ 378,339 $ 6,513 $ 2,911,250
Table of Contents
96Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
    Units     General Partner)     Partners     Interests     Equity  
Issuance of limited partner units ( 955,705  units) 79,601 79,601
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (329) (329)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 293,204  units) 2,028 (2,028 ) —
Issuance of units related to Simon's public of fering of its common stock
(22,137,500  units) 1,556,479 1,556,479
Stock incentive program ( 462,967  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 11,660 11,660
Redemption of limited partner units ( 116,658  units) (15,163 ) (943) (16,106 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 1,245,654  units) (152,590 ) (152,590 )
Long-term incentive performance units 2,331 2,331
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 36,252  units and 15,561  common units) 34,071 (3,582 ) 30,489
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (92,834 ) (13,714 ) (106,548 )
Currency translation adjustments 22,694 4,594 27,288
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 162 18 180
Net gain reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
earnings (93) (13) (106)
Other comprehensive income (70,071 ) (9,115 ) (79,186 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the
Operating Partnership (95,755 ) 95,755 —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as
temporary equity (3,337 ) (1,866,483 ) (279,379 ) (3,507 ) (2,152,706 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred
units of $1,915  and a $6,044  loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable
interests in properties 3,337 1,109,227 167,223 1,666 1,281,453
Balance at December 31, 2020 $ 42,091 $ 2,997,381 $ 431,784 $ 1,090 $ 3,472,346
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
971. Organization
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-
managed real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the
Internal Revenue Code. REITs will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they
distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned
Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real estate properties and other assets. Unless stated
otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and
references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to "we," "us" and "our"
mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon
and/or the Operating Partnership. Unless otherwise indicated, these notes to consolidated financial statements
apply to both Simon and the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership
agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which
consist primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®.  As of December 31, 2020, we owned or held an
interest in 203 income-producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 99 malls, 69 Premium Outlets,
14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and 17 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. We also own an 80%
noncontrolling interest in the Taubman Realty Group, LLC, or TRG, which has an interest in 24 regional, super-
regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2020, we had ownership
interests in 31 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. As
of December 31, 2020, we also owned a 22.4% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-
based real estate company which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment and other tenants including
consideration received from:
●Fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements and,
●Variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate
taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management
fees that are typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our properties as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and
consumer-focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the
sales of bank-issued prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives,
business development, sponsorship, and events,
●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility
services, and the provision of energy services,
●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related
entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
982. Basis of Presentation and Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of all controlled subsidiaries, and
all significant intercompany amounts have been eliminated.
We consolidate properties that are wholly-owned or properties where we own less than 100% but we control.
Control of a property is demonstrated by, among other factors, our ability to refinance debt and sell the property
without the consent of any other partner or owner and the inability of any other partner or owner to replace us.
We also consolidate a variable interest entity, or VIE, when we are determined to be the primary beneficiary.
Determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE is based on whether an entity has (1) the power to direct activities
that most significantly impact the economic performance of the VIE and (2) the obligation to absorb losses or the
right to receive benefits of the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. Our determination of the primary
beneficiary of a VIE considers all relationships between us and the VIE, including management agreements and
other contractual arrangements. There have been no changes during 2020 in previous conclusions about whether
an entity qualifies as a VIE or whether we are the primary beneficiary of any previously identified VIE. During the
periods presented, we did not provide financial or other support to any identified VIE that we were not contractually
obligated to provide.
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures represent our noncontrolling ownership interests. We account
for these unconsolidated entities using the equity method of accounting. We initially record these investments at
cost and we subsequently adjust for net equity in income or loss, which we allocate in accordance with the
provisions of the applicable partnership or joint venture agreement, cash contributions and distributions, and foreign
currency fluctuations, if applicable. The allocation provisions in the partnership or joint venture agreements are not
always consistent with the legal ownership interests held by each general or limited partner or joint venture investee
primarily due to partner preferences. We separately report investments in partnerships and joint ventures for which
accumulated distributions have exceeded investments in and our share of net income of the partnerships and joint
ventures within cash distributions and losses in partnerships and joint ventures, at equity in the consolidated
balance sheets. The net equity of certain partnerships and joint ventures is less than zero because of financing or
operating distributions that are usually greater than net income, as net income includes non-cash charges for
depreciation and amortization.
As of December 31, 2020, we consolidated 133 wholly-owned properties and 17 additional properties that
are less than wholly-owned, but which we control or for which we are the primary beneficiary. We account for the
remaining 84 properties, or the joint venture properties, as well as our investments in Klépierre, HBS Global
Properties, or HBS, and TRG, and our retailer investments in Authentic Brands Group LLC, or ABG, Forever 21,
J.C. Penney, Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, and SPARC Group, formerly known as Aéropostale, using the equity
method of accounting, as we have determined we have significant influence over their operations. We manage the
day-to-day operations of 57 of the 84 joint venture properties, but have determined that our partner or partners have
substantive participating rights with respect to the assets and operations of these joint venture properties. Our
investments in joint ventures in Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Malaysia, Germany, Canada, Spain, Thailand, and the
United Kingdom comprise 23 of the remaining 27 properties. These international properties and TRG are managed
by joint ventures in which we share control.
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership are accrued at declaration and represent distributions on
outstanding preferred units of partnership interests, or preferred units, and are included in net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests.  We allocate net operating results of the Operating Partnership after preferred distributions
to limited partners and to us based on the partners’ respective weighted average ownership interests in the
Operating Partnership. Net operating results of the Operating Partnership attributable to limited partners are
reflected in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
99Our weighted average ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was as follows:
For the Year Ended 
December 31,  
    2020    2019    2018
Weighted average ownership interest  86.9 %  86.8 %  86.8 %  
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, our ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was 87.4% and
86.8%, respectively. We adjust the noncontrolling limited partners’ interest at the end of each period to reflect their
interest in the net assets of the Operating Partnership.
Preferred unit requirements in the Operating Partnership’s accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income represent distributions on outstanding preferred units and are recorded
when declared.    
3. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Investment Properties
Investment properties consist of the following as of December 31:
    2020     2019  
Land $3,700,023 $3,692,056
Buildings and improvements  33,908,615  33,664,683
Total land, buildings and improvements  37,608,638  37,356,739
Furniture, fixtures and equipment  441,558  447,756
Investment properties at cost  38,050,196  37,804,495
Less — accumulated depreciation  14,891,937  13,905,776
Investment properties at cost, net $23,158,259 $23,898,719
Construction in progress included above $773,061 $812,982
We record investment properties at cost. Investment properties include costs of acquisitions; development,
predevelopment, and construction (including allocable salaries and related benefits); tenant allowances and
improvements; and interest and real estate taxes incurred during construction. We capitalize improvements and
replacements from repair and maintenance when the repair and maintenance extends the useful life, increases
capacity, or improves the efficiency of the asset. All other repair and maintenance items are expensed as incurred.
We capitalize interest on projects during periods of construction until the projects are ready for their intended
purpose based on interest rates in place during the construction period. The amount of interest capitalized during
each year is as follows:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
    2020    2019    2018
Capitalized interest $22,917 $33,342 $19,871
We record depreciation on buildings and improvements utilizing the straight-line method over an estimated
original useful life, which is generally 10 to 35 years. We review depreciable lives of investment properties
periodically and we make adjustments when necessary to reflect a shorter economic life. We amortize tenant
allowances and tenant improvements utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the related lease or
occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter. We record depreciation on equipment and fixtures utilizing the straight-line
method over seven to ten years.
We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate
events or changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not be
recoverable. These
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
100circumstances include, but are not limited to, declines in a property’s operational performance, such as declining
cash flows, occupancy or total sales per square foot, the Company’s intent and ability to hold the related asset, and,
if applicable, the remaining time to maturity of underlying financing arrangements. We measure any impairment of
investment property when the estimated undiscounted operating income before depreciation and amortization
during the anticipated holding period plus its residual value, and, if applicable, on a probability weighted basis, is
less than the carrying value of the property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the
excess of carrying value of the property over our estimate of fair value.
We also review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated entities, to identify and evaluate
whether events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of our investments may not be
recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine the fair value of the investment is less than its
carrying value and such impairment is other-than-temporary. Our evaluation of changes in economic or operating
conditions and whether an impairment is other-than-temporary may include developing estimates of fair value,
forecasted cash flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization.
We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using observable and unobservable data such as
operating income before depreciation and amortization, hold periods, estimated capitalization and discount rates, or
relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information, expected probabilities of outcomes, if
applicable, and whether an impairment is other-than-temporary. Changes in economic and operating conditions
including, changes in the financial condition of our tenants and changes to our intent and ability to hold the related
asset, that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment property and other investments could
impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result in future charges to earnings if assumptions
regarding those investments differ from actual results.  
During the fourth quarter of 2020, we recorded an impairment charge of $34.4 million related to one
consolidated property, which is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and
comprehensive income.  During the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary impairment charge
of $55.2 million, representing our equity method investment balance in three joint venture properties, which is
included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net, in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.  
Purchase Accounting
We allocate the purchase price of asset acquisitions and any excess investment in unconsolidated entities to
the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each component which may be
derived from various observable or unobservable inputs and assumptions. Also, we may utilize third party valuation
specialists. These components typically include buildings, land and intangibles related to in-place leases and we
estimate:
●the relative fair value of land and related improvements and buildings on an as-if-vacant basis,
●the market value of in-place leases based upon our best estimate of current market rents and amortize
the resulting market rent adjustment into lease income,
●the value of costs to obtain tenants, including tenant allowances and improvements and leasing
commissions, and
●the value of lease income and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if the
space was vacant.
The relative fair value of buildings is depreciated over the estimated remaining life of the acquired building or
related improvements. We amortize tenant improvements, in-place lease assets and other lease-related intangibles
over the remaining life of the underlying leases. We also estimate the value of other acquired intangible assets, if
any, which are amortized over the remaining life of the underlying related intangibles.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
101Cash and Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments purchased with an original maturity of 90 days or less to be cash
and cash equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at cost, which approximates fair value. Cash equivalents
generally consist of commercial paper, bankers’ acceptances, Eurodollars, repurchase agreements, and money
market deposits or securities. Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk
include our cash and cash equivalents and our trade accounts receivable. We place our cash and cash equivalents
with institutions of high credit quality. However, at certain times, such cash and cash equivalents are in excess of
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and Securities Investor Protection Corporation insurance limits. See Notes
4 and 8 for disclosures about non-cash investing and financing transactions.
Equity Instruments and Debt Securities
Equity instruments and debt securities consist primarily of equity instruments, our deferred compensation
plan investments, the debt securities of our captive insurance subsidiary, and certain investments held to fund the
debt service requirements of debt previously secured by investment properties. At December 31, 2020 and 2019,
we had equity instruments with readily determinable fair values of $41.9 million and $68.2 million, respectively.
Changes in the fair value of these equity instruments are recorded in earnings. Non-cash mark-to-market
adjustments related to an investment we hold in units of a publicly traded real estate investment trust are included
in unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments in our consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. Non-cash mark-to-market adjustments related to other non-real estate securities with
readily determinable fair values for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 were nil, $5.0 million, and
nil, respectively, and these losses were recorded in other expense in our consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had equity instruments without readily determinable
fair values of $309.3 million and $295.4 million, respectively, for which we have elected the measurement
alternative. We regularly evaluate these investments for any impairment in their estimated fair value, as well as any
observable price changes for an identical or similar equity instrument of the same issuer, and determined that no
material adjustment in the carrying value was required for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Our deferred compensation plan equity instruments are valued based upon quoted market prices.  The
investments have a matching liability as the amounts are fully payable to the employees that earned the
compensation.  Changes in value of these securities and changes to the matching liability to employees are both
recognized in earnings and, as a result, there is no impact to consolidated net income.
At December 31, 2020 and 2019, we held debt securities of $40.5 million and $52.8 million, respectively, in
our captive insurance subsidiary. The types of securities included in the investment portfolio of our captive
insurance subsidiary are typically U.S. Treasury or other U.S. government securities as well as corporate debt
securities with maturities ranging from less than one year to ten years. These securities are classified as available-
for-sale and are valued based upon quoted market prices or other observable inputs when quoted market prices
are not available. The amortized cost of debt securities, which approximates fair value, held by our captive
insurance subsidiary is adjusted for amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts to maturity. Changes in
the values of these securities are recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) until the gain or
loss is realized or until any unrealized loss is deemed to be other-than-temporary. We review any declines in value
of these securities for other-than-temporary impairment and consider the severity and duration of any decline in
value. To the extent an other-than-temporary impairment is deemed to have occurred, an impairment is recorded
and a new cost basis is established.
Our captive insurance subsidiary is required to maintain statutory minimum capital and surplus as well as
maintain a minimum liquidity ratio. Therefore, our access to these securities may be limited.
Fair Value Measurements
Level 1 fair value inputs are quoted prices for identical items in active, liquid and visible markets such as
stock exchanges. Level 2 fair value inputs are observable information for similar items in active or inactive markets,
and
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
102appropriately consider counterparty creditworthiness in the valuations. Level 3 fair value inputs reflect our best
estimate of inputs and assumptions market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability at the measurement
date. The inputs are unobservable in the market and significant to the valuation estimate. We have no investments
for which fair value is measured on a recurring basis using Level 3 inputs.
The equity instruments with readily determinable fair values we held at December 31, 2020 and 2019 were
primarily classified as having Level 1 and Level 2 fair value inputs. In addition, we had derivative instruments which
were classified as having Level 2 inputs, which consist primarily of foreign currency forward contracts and interest
rate swap agreements with an insignificant gross asset balance at December 31, 2020 and $17.5 million at
December 31, 2019, and a gross liability balance of $44.6 million and $3.8 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Note 7 includes a discussion of the fair value of debt measured using Level 2 inputs.  Notes 3 and 4 include
discussions of the fair values recorded in purchase accounting using Level 2 and Level 3 inputs.  Level 3 inputs to
our purchase accounting and impairment analyses include our estimations of fair value, net operating results of the
property, capitalization rates and discount rates.
Gains or losses on Issuances of Stock by Equity Method Investees
When one of our equity method investees issues additional shares to third parties, our percentage
ownership interest in the investee may decrease. In the event the issuance price per share is higher or lower than
our average carrying amount per share, we recognize a noncash gain or loss on the issuance, when appropriate.
This noncash gain or loss is recognized in our net income in the period the change of ownership interest occurs.
Use of Estimates
We prepared the accompanying consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States, or GAAP. GAAP requires us to make estimates and assumptions that
affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the
financial statements, and revenues and expenses during the reported period. Our actual results could differ from
these estimates.
Segment and Geographic Locations
Our primary business is the ownership, development, and management of premier shopping, dining,
entertainment and mixed use real estate. We have aggregated our retail operations, including malls, Premium
Outlets, The Mills, and our international investments into one reportable segment because they have similar
economic characteristics and we provide similar products and services to similar types of, and in many cases, the
same, tenants.  As of December 31, 2020, approximately 6.9% of our consolidated long-lived assets and 2.4% of
our consolidated total revenues were derived from assets located outside the United States.  As of December 31,
2019, approximately 6.2% of our consolidated long-lived assets and 2.9% of our consolidated total revenues were
derived from assets located outside the United States.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
103Deferred Costs and Other Assets
Deferred costs and other assets include the following as of December 31:
    2020     2019  
Deferred lease costs, net $169,651 $209,277
In-place lease intangibles, net  3,905  31,417
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net  31,053  44,337
Marketable securities of our captive insurance
companies  40,496  52,760
Goodwill  20,098  20,098
Other marketable and non-marketable securities  351,176  363,554
Prepaids, notes receivable and other assets, net  465,789  492,582
$1,082,168 $1,214,025
Deferred Lease Costs
Our deferred leasing costs consist primarily of initial direct costs and, prior to the adoption of ASC 842,
capitalized salaries and related benefits, in connection with lease originations. We record amortization of deferred
leasing costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. Details of these deferred costs as of
December 31 are as follows:
    2020     2019  
Deferred lease costs $407,288 $443,313
Accumulated amortization  (237,637 ) (234,036 )
Deferred lease costs, net $169,651 $209,277
Amortization of deferred leasing costs is a component of depreciation and amortization expense. The
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include amortization of deferred
leasing costs as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2020    2019    2018 
Amortization of deferred leasing costs $ 51,349 $ 57,201 $ 56,646
Intangibles
The average remaining life of in-place lease intangibles is approximately 2.2 years and is being amortized
on a straight-line basis and is included with depreciation and amortization in the consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income. The fair market value of above and below market leases is amortized into
lease income over the remaining lease life as a component of reported lease income. The weighted average
remaining life of these intangibles is approximately 2.8 years. The unamortized amount of below market leases is
included in accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles and deferred revenues in the consolidated balance
sheets and was $28.7 million and $44.8 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The amount of
amortization of above and below market leases, net, which increased lease income for the years ended December
31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, was $1.3 million, $1.9 million and $1.0 million, respectively. If a lease is terminated prior
to the original lease termination, any remaining unamortized intangible is written off to earnings.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
104Details of intangible assets as of December 31 are as follows:
2020 2019
In-place lease intangibles $173,094 $ 196,007
Accumulated amortization (169,189 ) (164,590 )
In-place lease intangibles, net $ 3,905 $ 31,417
2020 2019
Acquired above market lease intangibles $186,620 $ 252,934
Accumulated amortization (155,567 ) (208,597 )
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net $31,053 $ 44,337
Estimated future amortization and the increasing (decreasing) effect on lease income for our above and
below market leases as of December 31, 2020 are as follows:
Below Above Impact to
Market Market Lease
Leases Leases Income, Net
2021 $8,193 $(11,001 )$ (2,808 ) 
2022  5,565  (8,012 ) (2,447 )
2023  4,224  (5,858 ) (1,634 )
2024  3,265  (3,981 ) (716)
2025  2,322  (1,677 ) 645
Thereafter  5,122  (524) 4,598
$28,691 $(31,053 )$ (2,362 )
Derivative Financial Instruments
We record all derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The accounting for changes in the
fair value of derivatives depends on the intended use of the derivative, whether we have designated a derivative as
a hedge and whether the hedging relationship has satisfied the criteria necessary to apply hedge accounting. We
may use a variety of derivative financial instruments in the normal course of business to selectively manage or
hedge a portion of the risks associated with our indebtedness and interest payments. Our objectives in using
interest rate derivatives are to add stability to interest expense and to manage our exposure to interest rate
movements. To accomplish this objective, we primarily use interest rate swaps and caps. We require that hedging
derivative instruments be highly effective in reducing the risk exposure that they are designated to hedge. We
formally designate any instrument that meets these hedging criteria as a hedge at the inception of the derivative
contract.  We have no credit-risk-related hedging or derivative activities.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had no outstanding interest rate derivatives. We generally do not
apply hedge accounting to interest rate caps, which had an insignificant value as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt
obligations. We manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a
combination of interest rate protection agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of an anticipated debt issuance. Upon completion of the
debt issuance, the fair value of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) and is amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
105The unamortized gain on our treasury locks and terminated hedges recorded in accumulated other
comprehensive income was $8.7 million and $10.6 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. Within
the next year, we expect to reclassify to earnings approximately $1.0 million of gains related to terminated interest
rate swaps from the current balance held in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of certain foreign operations. Our intent is to
offset gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposers, with gains and losses on the derivative contracts
hedging these exposers. We do not enter into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate protection
agreements for speculative purposes.
We are also exposed to fluctuations in foreign exchange rates on financial instruments which are
denominated in foreign currencies, primarily in Yen and Euro.   We use currency forward contracts, cross currency
swap contracts, and foreign currency denominated debt to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange
rates on certain Yen and Euro-denominated receivables and net investments.  Currency forward contracts involve
fixing the Yen:USD or Euro:USD exchange rate for delivery of a specified amount of foreign currency on a specified
date. The currency forward contracts are typically cash settled in U.S. dollars for their fair value at or close to their
settlement date.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
106We had the following Euro:USD forward contracts designated as net investment hedges at December 31,
2020 and 2019 (in millions):
        Asset (Liability) Value as of
December 31,     December 31, 
Notional Value Maturity Date 2020 2019
€50.0 March 20, 2020 —  (0.5)
€50.0 March 20, 2020 —  (0.5)
€50.0 March 20, 2020 —  (0.5)
€50.0 May 15, 2020 —  1.5
€100.0 June 18, 2020 —  (0.6)
€90.0 June 18, 2020 —  (0.5)
€100.0 December 18, 2020 — (0.6)
€100.0 December 18, 2020 — (0.6)
€100.0 March 24, 2021 (3.9) —
€100.0 March 24, 2021 (3.8) —
€50.0 March 24, 2021 (2.3) —
€50.0 March 24, 2021 (2.2) —
€50.0 May 14, 2021 (2.2) —
€50.0 May 14, 2021 (2.2) —
€41.0 May 14, 2021 (1.9) —
€20.0 May 14, 2021 (1.7) —
€50.0 May 14, 2021 (2.1) 1.3
€50.0 May 14, 2021 (6.4) —
€30.0 May 14, 2021 (2.6)  —
€60.0 December 20, 2021 (4.2)  —
€60.0 December 20, 2021 (4.1)  —
€30.0 December 20, 2021 (2.2)  —
€50.0 July 15, 2021 (0.1)  —
€50.0 July 15, 2021 (0.1)  —
€50.0 July 15, 2021 (0.1)  —
€50.0 July 15, 2021 — —
€50.0 July 15, 2021 — —
€61.0 September 17, 2021 (1.3)  —
€61.0 September 17, 2021 (1.2)  —
Asset balances in the above table are included in deferred costs and other assets. Liability balances in the
above table are included in other liabilities.
We used a Euro-denominated cross-currency swap agreement to manage our exposure to changes in
foreign exchange rates by swapping $150.0 million of 4.38% fixed rate U.S. dollar-denominated debt to 1.37% fixed
rate Euro-denominated debt of €121.6 million. The cross-currency swap matured on December 1, 2020. The fair
value of our cross-currency swap agreement on the settlement date was $4.1 million and at December 31, 2019
was $14.7 million, and is included in deferred costs and other assets.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
107We have designated the currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps as net investment hedges.
Accordingly, we report the changes in fair value in other comprehensive income (loss). Changes in the value of
these forward contracts are offset by changes in the underlying hedged Euro or Yen-denominated joint venture
investment.
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to Simon’s derivative activities, including
our share of other comprehensive income (loss) from unconsolidated entities, was ($53.2) million and $41.2 million
as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related
to the Operating Partnership’s derivative activities, including our share of the other comprehensive income from
unconsolidated entities, was ($60.9) million and $47.5 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Noncontrolling Interests
Simon
Details of the carrying amount of our noncontrolling interests are as follows as of December 31:
      
 2020    2019
Limited partners’  interests in the Operating Partnership $431,784 $378,339
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  1,090  6,513
Total noncontrolling interests reflected in equity $432,874 $384,852
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable
noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties, limited partners’ interests in the Operating Partnership, and
preferred distributions payable by the Operating Partnership on its outstanding preferred units) is a component of
consolidated net income. In addition, the individual components of other comprehensive income (loss) are
presented in the aggregate for both controlling and noncontrolling interests, with the portion attributable to
noncontrolling interests deducted from comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders.
The Operating Partnership
Our evaluation of the appropriateness of classifying the Operating Partnership’s common units of
partnership interest, or units, held by Simon and the Operating Partnership's limited partners within permanent
equity considered several significant factors. First, as a limited partnership, all decisions relating to the Operating
Partnership’s operations and distributions are made by Simon, acting as the Operating Partnership’s sole general
partner. The decisions of the general partner are made by Simon's Board of Directors or management. The
Operating Partnership has no other governance structure. Secondly, the sole asset of Simon is its interest in the
Operating Partnership. As a result, a share of common stock of Simon, or common stock, if owned by the Operating
Partnership, is best characterized as being similar to a treasury share and thus not an asset of the Operating
Partnership.
Limited partners of the Operating Partnership have the right under the Operating Partnership’s partnership
agreement to exchange their units for shares of common stock or cash, as selected by Simon as the sole general
partner. Accordingly, we classify units held by limited partners in permanent equity because Simon may elect to
issue shares of common stock to limited partners exercising their exchange rights rather than using cash. Under the
Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement, the Operating Partnership is required to redeem units held by
Simon only when Simon has repurchased shares of common stock. We classify units held by Simon in permanent
equity because the decision to redeem those units would be made by Simon.
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable
noncontrolling interests in consolidated properties) is a component of consolidated net income.$(
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
108Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Simon
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to Simon’s currency translation
adjustment was ($136.2) million, ($160.4) million and ($158.9) million as of December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of
December 31:
2020 2019 2018Affected line item where
net income is presented
Currency translation adjustments $ (1,739)$ — $ — Other income
219 — —Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests
$ (1,520)$ — —
Accumulated derivative gains
(losses), net $ 1,845 $ (2,782) $(7,020) Interest expense
— (10,852) —Loss on extinguishment of
debt
 (232)  1,802  923 Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interests
$ 1,613$ (11,832)$(6,097)
The Operating Partnership
The total accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to the Operating Partnership’s currency
translation adjustment was ($155.8) million, ($184.8) million and ($183.0) million as of December 31, 2020, 2019
and 2018, respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of
December 31:
2020 2019 2018Affected line item where
net income is presented
Currency translation adjustments $ (1,739) $ — $ — Other income
Accumulated derivative gains
(losses), net $ 1,845 $ (2,782) $(7,020)Interest expense
— (10,852) —Loss on extinguishment of
debt
$ 1,845$ (13,634)$(7,020)
Revenue Recognition
We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties
and account for our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over the
terms of the leases when we believe substantially all lease income, including the related straight-line rent
receivable, is probable of collection. Substantially all of our retail tenants are also required to pay overage rents
based on sales over a stated base amount during the lease year. We recognize this variable lease consideration
only when each tenant’s sales exceed the applicable sales threshold. We amortize any tenant inducements as a
reduction of lease income utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the related lease or occupancy term of
the tenant, if shorter.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
109We structure our leases to allow us to recover a significant portion of our property operating, real estate
taxes, repairs and maintenance, and advertising and promotion expenses from our tenants. A substantial portion of
our leases, other than those for anchor stores, require the tenant to reimburse us for a substantial portion of our
operating expenses, including common area maintenance, or CAM, real estate taxes and insurance.  Such property
operating expenses typically include utility, insurance, security, janitorial, landscaping, food court and other
administrative expenses. This significantly reduces our exposure to increases in costs and operating expenses
resulting from inflation or otherwise. For substantially all of our leases in the U.S. mall portfolio, we receive a fixed
payment from the tenant for the CAM component which is recognized as lease income on a straight-line basis over
the term of the lease beginning with the adoption of ASC 842. When not reimbursed by the fixed CAM component,
CAM expense reimbursements are based on the tenant’s proportionate share of the allocable operating expenses
and CAM capital expenditures for the property. We accrue all variable reimbursements from tenants for recoverable
portions of all of these expenses as variable lease consideration in the period the applicable expenditures are
incurred. We recognize differences between estimated recoveries and the final billed amounts in the subsequent
year. These differences were not material in any period presented. Our advertising and promotional costs are
expensed as incurred.  Provisions for credit losses that are not probable of collection are recognized as a reduction
of lease income.  
In April 2020, the FASB staff released guidance focused on treatment of concessions related to the effects of
COVID-19 on the application of lease modification guidance in Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 842,
“Leases.” The guidance provides a practical expedient to forgo the associated reassessments required by ASC 842
when changes to a lease result in similar or lower future consideration.  We have elected to generally account for
rent abatements as negative variable lease consideration in the period granted, or in the period we determine we
expect to grant an abatement. Further abatements granted in the future will reduce lease income in the period we
grant, or determine we expect to grant, an abatement.
We have agreed to deferral or abatement arrangements with a number of our tenants as a result of the
COVID-19 pandemic. Discussions with our tenants are ongoing and may result in further rent deferrals, lease
amendments, abatements and/or lease terminations, as we deem appropriate on a case-by-case basis based on
each tenant's unique financial and operating situation. In addition, uncollected rent due from certain of our tenants
is subject to ongoing litigation, the outcome of which may affect our ability to collect in full the associated
outstanding receivable balances.
In connection with rent deferrals or other accruals of unpaid rent payments, if we determine that rent
payments are probable of collection, we will continue to recognize lease income on a straight-line basis over the
lease term along with associated tenant receivables. However, if we determine that such deferred rent payments or
other accrued but unpaid rent payments are not probable of collection, lease income will be recorded on the cash
basis, with the corresponding tenant receivable and deferred rent receivable balances charged as a direct write-off
against lease income in the period of the change in our collectability determination.  Additionally, our assessment of
collectability incorporates information regarding a tenant’s financial condition that is obtained from available
financial data, the expected outcome of contractual disputes and other matters, and our communications and
negotiations with the tenant.
When a tenant seeks to reorganize its operations through bankruptcy proceedings, we assess the
collectability of receivable balances. Our ongoing assessment incorporates, among other things, the timing of a
tenant’s bankruptcy filing and our expectations of the assumptions by the tenant in bankruptcy proceedings of
leases at the Company’s properties on substantially similar terms.  Refer to note 9 for further disclosure of lease
income.  
Management Fees and Other Revenues
Management fees and other revenues are generally received from our unconsolidated joint venture
properties as well as third parties. Management fee revenue is earned based on a contractual percentage of joint
venture property revenue. Development fee revenue is earned on a contractual percentage of hard costs to develop
a property. Leasing fee revenue is earned on a contractual per square foot charge based on the square footage of
current year leasing activity. We recognize revenue for these services provided when earned based on the
performance criteria.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
110Revenues from insurance premiums charged to unconsolidated properties are recognized on a pro-rata
basis over the terms of the policies. Insurance losses on these policies and our self-insurance for our consolidated
properties are reflected in property operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations
and comprehensive income and include estimates for losses incurred but not reported as well as losses pending
settlement. Estimates for losses are based on evaluations by third-party actuaries and management’s estimates.
Total insurance reserves for our insurance subsidiaries and other self-insurance programs as of December 31,
2020 and 2019 approximated $71.6 million and $74.5 million, respectively, and are included in other liabilities in the
consolidated balance sheets. Information related to the securities included in the investment portfolio of our captive
insurance subsidiary is included within the “Equity Instruments and Debt Securities” section above.
Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs under
Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable Treasury regulations relating to REIT
qualification. In order to maintain this REIT status, the regulations require the entity to distribute at least 90% of
REIT taxable income to its owners and meet certain other asset and income tests as well as other requirements.
We intend to continue to adhere to these requirements and maintain Simon’s REIT status and that of the REIT
subsidiaries. As REITs, these entities will generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as
they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Thus, we made no provision for U.S. federal
income taxes for these entities in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. If Simon or any of the REIT
subsidiaries fail to qualify as a REIT, and if available relief provisions do not apply, Simon or that entity will be
subject to tax at regular corporate rates for the years in which it failed to qualify. If Simon or any of the REIT
subsidiaries loses its REIT status it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following the year
during which qualification was lost unless the failure to qualify was due to reasonable cause and certain other
conditions were satisfied.
We have also elected taxable REIT subsidiary, or TRS, status for some of our subsidiaries. This enables us
to provide services that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REITs and participate in activities that do
not qualify as “rents from real property”. For these entities, deferred tax assets and liabilities are established for
temporary differences between the financial reporting basis and the tax basis of assets and liabilities at the enacted
tax rates expected to be in effect when the temporary differences reverse. A valuation allowance for deferred tax
assets is provided if we believe all or some portion of the deferred tax asset may not be realized. An increase or
decrease in the valuation allowance that results from the change in circumstances that causes a change in our
judgment about the realizability of the related deferred tax asset is included in income.
As a partnership, the allocated share of the Operating Partnership’s income or loss for each year is included
in the income tax returns of the partners; accordingly, no accounting for income taxes is required in the
accompanying consolidated financial statements other than as discussed above for our TRSs.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had net deferred tax liabilities of $251.1 million and $257.7 million,
respectively, which primarily relate to the temporary differences between the carrying value of balance sheet assets
and liabilities and their tax bases. These differences were primarily created through the consolidation of various
European assets in 2016. Additionally, we have deferred tax liabilities related to our TRSs, consisting of operating
losses and other carryforwards for U.S. federal income tax purposes as well as the timing of the deductibility of
losses or reserves from insurance subsidiaries, though these amounts are not material to the financial statements.
The net deferred tax liability is included in other liabilities in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.  
We are also subject to certain other taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, as well as
income-based and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our international investments, which are included
in income and other taxes in the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
Corporate Expenses
Home and regional office costs primarily include compensation and personnel related costs, travel, building
and
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
111office costs, and other expenses for our corporate home office and regional offices.  General and administrative
expense primarily includes executive compensation, benefits and travel expenses as well as costs of being a public
company, including certain legal costs, audit fees, regulatory fees, and certain other professional fees.
New Accounting Pronouncements
In June 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued Accounting Standards Update
(ASU) 2016-13, "Financial Instruments - Credit Losses," which introduced new guidance for an approach based on
expected losses to estimate credit losses on certain types of financial instruments. It also modifies the impairment
model for available-for-sale debt securities and provides for a simplified accounting model for purchased financial
assets with credit deterioration since their origination. Instruments in scope include loans, held-to-maturity debt
securities, and net investments in leases as well as reinsurance and trade receivables. In November 2018, the
FASB issued ASU 2018-19, which clarifies that operating lease receivables are outside the scope of the new
standard. This standard was effective for us as of January 1, 2020. There was no impact on our consolidated
financial statements at adoption.
In March 2020, the FASB issued ASU 2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform,” which provides temporary
optional expedients and exceptions to the US GAAP guidance on contract modifications and hedge accounting to
ease the financial reporting burdens of the expected market transition from LIBOR and other interbank offered rates
to alternative reference rates. The guidance is effective upon issuance and generally can be applied to any contract
modifications or existing and new hedging relationships through December 31, 2022. We are currently evaluating
the impact that the expected market transition from LIBOR to alternative references rates will have on our financial
statements as well as the applicability of the aforementioned expedients and exceptions provided in ASU 2020-04.
4. Real Estate Acquisitions and Dispositions
We acquire interests in properties to generate both current income and long-term appreciation in value. We
acquire interests in individual properties or portfolios of real estate companies that meet our investment criteria and
sell properties which no longer meet our strategic criteria. Unless otherwise noted below, gains and losses on these
transactions are included in gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income. We capitalize asset acquisition costs and expense costs related to business combinations, as well as
disposition related costs as they are incurred. We incurred a minimal amount of transaction expenses during 2020,
2019, and 2018.
Our acquisition and disposition activity for the periods presented are as follows:
2019 Acquisitions
On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties
for cash consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a $21.5 million, 4.02% variable
rate mortgage. We accounted for this transaction as an asset acquisition and substantially all our investment relates
to investment property.
2018 Acquisitions
On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from our joint
venture partner. The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or approximately $84.1 million, as consideration
for the acquisition. The property is subject to a $215.0 million 4.22% fixed rate mortgage loan.  We accounted for
this transaction as an asset acquisition and substantially all of our investment has been determined to relate to
investment property.
2020 Dispositions
On October 1, 2020, we disposed of our interest in one consolidated retail property. A portion of the gross
proceeds on this transaction of $33.4 million was used to partially repay a cross-collateralized mortgage. Our share
of the $12.3
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
112million gain is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposed of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statement of operation and comprehensive income.
2019 Dispositions
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross
proceeds on this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in
the accompanying consolidated statement of operation and comprehensive income. We also recorded net gains of
$62.1 million, primarily related to Klépierre’s disposition of its interests in certain shopping centers, as discussed in
Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements.
2018 Dispositions
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included
the foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and $80.0 million non-
recourse mortgage loans and, as discussed in Note 6, our interest in the German department store properties
owned through our investment in HBS was sold during the fourth quarter of 2018. Also, as discussed further in Note
6, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers during 2018, resulting in a gain of which our share
was $20.2 million.
5. Per Share and Per Unit Data
We determine basic earnings per share and basic earnings per unit based on the weighted average number
of shares of common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding during the period and we consider any participating
securities for purposes of applying the two-class method. We determine diluted earnings per share and diluted
earnings per unit based on the weighted average number of shares of common stock or units, as applicable,
outstanding combined with the incremental weighted average number of shares or units, as applicable, that would
have been outstanding assuming all potentially dilutive securities were converted into shares of common stock or
units, as applicable, at the earliest date possible. The following tables set forth the computation of basic and diluted
earnings per share and basic and diluted earnings per unit.
Simon
For the Year Ended December 31,  
 2020 2019 2018  
Net Income attributable to Common
Stockholders — Basic and Diluted  $1,109,227     $2,098,247     $2,436,721
Weighted Average Shares Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted  308,737,625  307,950,112  309,627,178
For the year ended December 31, 2020, potentially dilutive securities include units that are exchangeable for
common stock and long-term incentive performance units, or LTIP units, granted under our long-term incentive
performance programs that are convertible into units and exchangeable for common stock. No securities had a
material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018. We have not adjusted net income
attributable to common stockholders and weighted average shares outstanding for income allocable to limited
partners or units, respectively, as doing so would have no dilutive impact. We accrue dividends when they are
declared. On December 15, 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend for the fourth
quarter of 2020 of $1.30 per share, payable on January 22, 2021 to shareholders of record on December 24, 2020.
At December 31, 2020, we accrued the fourth quarter dividend of $486.9 million, recorded in dividends payable in
the accompanying consolidated balance sheet, which was paid in cash on January 22, 2021.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
113The Operating Partnership
For the Year Ended December 31, 
 2020 2019 2018
Net Income attributable to Unitholders —
Basic and Diluted  $1,276,450     $2,416,945     $2,805,764
Weighted Average Units Outstanding —
Basic and Diluted  355,281,882  354,724,019  356,520,452
For the year ended December 31, 2020, potentially dilutive securities include LTIP units. No securities had a
material dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018. We accrue distributions when they
are declared. On December 15, 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash distribution for the
fourth quarter of 2020 of $1.30 per unit, payable on January 22, 2021 to unitholders of record on December 24,
2020. At December 31, 2020, we accrued the fourth quarter distribution of $486.9 million, recorded in distributions
payable in the accompanying consolidated balance sheet, which was paid in cash on January 22, 2021.
The taxable nature of the dividends declared and Operating Partnership distributions declared for each of
the years ended as indicated is summarized as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2020    2019    2018 
Total dividends/distributions paid per common
share/unit     $6.00     $8.30     $7.90
Percent taxable as ordinary income  97.40 %   100.00 %   96.20 %
Percent taxable as long-term capital gains  2.60 %   0.00 %   3.80 %
 100.00 %   100.00 %   100.00 %
6. Investments in Unconsolidated Entities and International Investments
Real Estate Joint Ventures and Investments
Joint ventures are common in the real estate industry. We use joint ventures to finance properties, develop
new properties and diversify our risk in a particular property or portfolio of properties.  As discussed in Note 2, we
held joint venture interests in 84 properties as of December 31, 2020 and 82 properties as of December 31, 2019.
Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and
call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real estate joint venture agreements
and the industry. We and our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable
lock up or similar restrictions), which may result in either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or
borrowings, or the use of limited partnership interests in the Operating Partnership, to acquire the joint venture
interest from our partner.
We may provide financing to joint ventures primarily in the form of interest bearing construction loans. As of
December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had construction loans and other advances to these related parties totaling
$88.4 million and $78.4 million, respectively, which are included in deferred costs and other assets in the
accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
Unconsolidated Entity Transactions
On December 29, 2020, we completed the acquisition of an 80% noncontrolling ownership interest in TRG,
which has an interest in 24 regional, super-regional, and outlet malls in the U.S. and Asia. Under the terms of the
transaction, we, through the Operating Partnership, acquired all of Taubman Centers, Inc., or Taubman, common
stock for $43.00 per share
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
114in cash. Total consideration for the acquisition, including the redemption of Taubman’s $192.5 million 6.5% Series J
Cumulative Preferred Shares and its $170.0 million 6.25% Series K Cumulative Preferred Shares, and the issuance
of 955,705 Operating Partnership units, was approximately $3.5 billion.  Our investment includes the 6.38% Series
A Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units for $362.5 million issued to us.  The purchase price allocations are
preliminary and subject to revision within the measurement period, not to exceed one year from the date of
acquisition.  Substantially all of our investment has preliminarily been determined to relate to investment property
based on estimated fair values at the acquisition date.
On December 7, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of J.C. Penney,
a department store retailer, out of bankruptcy. Our non-controlling interest in the venture is 41.67% and was
acquired for cash consideration of $125.0 million. The purchase price allocations are preliminary and subject to
revision within the measurement period, not to exceed one year from the date of acquisition.
In the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary impairment charge of $55.2 million,
representing our equity method investment balance in three joint venture properties, which is included in (loss) gain
on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the
accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On February 19, 2020, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Forever 21, a
retailer of apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy. The interest was acquired through two separate joint
ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture. Our noncontrolling interest in each of the retail operations
venture and in the licensing venture is 37.5%. Our aggregate investment in the ventures was $67.6 million. In
connection with the acquisition of our interest, the Forever 21 joint venture recorded a non-cash bargain purchase
gain in the second quarter of which our share of $35.0 million pre-tax is included in income from unconsolidated
entities in the consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On October 16, 2019, we contributed approximately $276.8 million consisting of cash and the Shop
Premium Outlets, or SPO, assets for a 45% noncontrolling interest in RGG to create a new multi-platform venture
dedicated to digital value shopping.  We attributed substantially all of our investment to goodwill and certain
amortizing and non-amortizing intangibles.
On September 19, 2019, as discussed in note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent
to one of our properties from our joint venture partner. As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of this
property.
During the first quarter of 2019, we disposed of our interests in a multi-family residential investment. Our
share of the gross proceeds was $17.9 million. The gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in the
accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On September 25, 2018, as discussed in Note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at
Orange from our joint venture partner.  The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units at a price of $176.99 to
acquire this remaining interest.  As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of this property.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we had an 11.7%legal noncontrolling equity interest in HBS, a joint
venture we formed with Hudson’s Bay Company. In the third quarter of 2020, we recorded an other-than-temporary
impairment charge of $36.1 million, which is included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net, in the accompanying consolidated statement of
operations and comprehensive income, to reduce our investment in HBS to its estimated fair value. In the fourth
quarter of 2019, we recorded an impairment charge of $47.2 million to reduce our investment in HBS to its
estimated fair value. During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the German department store properties was
sold to Hudson’s Bay Company and SIGNA Retail Holdings resulting in a gain of $91.1 million. These amounts are
included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net in the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.    
On June 7, 2018, Aventura Mall, a property in which we own a noncontrolling 33.3% interest, refinanced its
$1.2 billion mortgage loan and its $200.8 million construction loan with a $1.75 billion mortgage loan at a fixed
interest rate of 4.12% that matures on July 1, 2028.  An early repayment charge of $30.9 million was incurred at the
property, which along with the write-off of deferred debt issuance costs of $6.5 million, is included in interest
expense in the accompanying
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
115combined joint venture statements of operations.  Our $12.5 million share of the charge associated with the
repayment is included in income from unconsolidated entities in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income.  Excess proceeds from the financing were distributed to the venture
partners.
In May 2017, Colorado Mills, a property in which we have a noncontrolling 37.5% interest, sustained
significant hail damage.  During the second quarter of 2017, the property recorded an impairment charge of
approximately $32.5 million based on the net carrying value of the assets damaged, which was fully offset by
anticipated insurance recoveries.  For the year ended December 31, 2020, the property had received business
interruption insurance proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $1.1 million. For the year ended December
31, 2019, the property had received business interruption proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $67.9
million, which resulted in the property recording a $3.0 million gain in 2019. For the year ended December 31, 2018,
the property had received business interruption proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $65.9 million,
which resulted in the property recording a $33.4 million gain in 2018.  For the periods ended December 31, 2019
and 2018, respectively, our $1.1 million and $12.5 million share of the gain is reflected within the (loss) gain on sale
or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
In 2016, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Aéropostale, a retailer of
apparel and accessories, out of bankruptcy and subsequently renamed SPARC Group.  The interests were
acquired through two separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an operating venture.  In April 2018, we
contributed our entire interest in the licensing venture in exchange for additional interests in ABG, a brand
development, marketing, and entertainment company.  As a result, we recognized a $35.6 million non-cash gain
representing the increase in value of our previously held interest in the licensing venture, which is included in other
income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. In January 2020,
we acquired additional interests of 5.05% and 1.37% in SPARC Group and ABG, respectively, for $6.7 million and
$33.5 million, respectively. During the third quarter of 2020, SPARC acquired certain assets and operations of
Brooks Brothers and Lucky Brands out of bankruptcy. At December 31, 2020, our noncontrolling equity method
interests in the operations venture of SPARC Group and in ABG were 50.0% and 6.8%, respectively.
International Investments
We conduct our international operations primarily through joint venture arrangements and account for the
majority of these international joint venture investments using the equity method of accounting.
European Investments  
At December 31, 2020, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.4%, of Klépierre, which had a
quoted market price of $22.55 per share, which is below our carrying value. We have evaluated this investment and
believe that the impairment is not other-than-temporary. Our share of net income, net of amortization of our excess
investment, was $26.5 million, $145.2 million and $98.8 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively. Based on applicable Euro:USD exchange rates and after our conversion of Klépierre’s results to
GAAP, Klépierre’s total assets, total liabilities, and noncontrolling interests were $20.9 billion, $14.4 billion, and
$1.4 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2020 and $19.6 billion, $12.9 billion, and $1.3 billion, respectively, as
of December 31, 2019. Klépierre’s total revenues, operating income before other items and consolidated net
income were approximately $1.3 billion, $327.3 million and $211.2 million, respectively, for the year ended
December 31, 2020, $1.5 billion, $626.3 million and $655.5 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31,
2019, and $1.6 billion, $670.4 million and $693.0 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2018.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recorded a $4.3 million net loss related to the impairment
and disposition of certain assets of Klépierre. During the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, Klépierre
completed the disposal of its interests in certain shopping centers and we recorded gains of $58.6 million and $20.2
million, respectively. These transactions are included in (loss) gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets
and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
116We have an interest in a European investee that had interests in ten Designer Outlet properties as of
December 31, 2020 and nine Designer Outlet properties as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, in each
case, six of which are consolidated by us. As of December 31, 2020, our legal percentage ownership interests in
these properties ranged from 45% to 94%. Due to certain redemption rights held by our venture partner, which will
require us to purchase their interests under certain circumstances, the noncontrolling interest is presented (i) in the
accompanying Simon consolidated balance sheets outside of equity in limited partners’ preferred interest in the
Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties and (ii) in the accompanying Operating
Partnership consolidated balance sheets within preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties.
In addition, we have a 50.0% noncontrolling interest in a European property management and development
company that provides services to the Designer Outlet properties.
We also have minority interests in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own or have interests in and
operate nine luxury outlets located throughout Europe and we also have a direct minority ownership in three of
those outlets. At December 31, 2020 and 2019, the carrying value of these equity instruments without readily
determinable fair values was $140.8 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets.
Asian Joint Ventures  
We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in Japan through a joint venture with Mitsubishi
Estate Co., Ltd. We have a 40%noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our
investment in this joint venture was $216.8 million and $212.1 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019,
respectively, including all related components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). We conduct our
international Premium Outlet operations in South Korea through a joint venture with Shinsegae International Co.
We have a 50% noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our investment in this
joint venture was $184.7 million and $173.9 million as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively, including all
related components of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Summary Financial Information
A summary of the combined balance sheets and statements of operations of our equity method investments
and share of income from such investments, excluding our investments in HBS, Klépierre, and TRG as well as our
retailer investments in ABG, Forever 21, J.C. Penney, RGG and SPARC Group, follows.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
117COMBINED BALANCE SHEETS
    December 31,     December 31,  
2020 2019  
Assets:
Investment properties, at cost $20,079,476 $19,525,665
Less - accumulated depreciation  8,003,863  7,407,627
 12,075,613  12,118,038
Cash and cash equivalents  1,169,422  1,015,864
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  749,231  510,157
Right-of-use assets, net 185,598 185,302
Deferred costs and other assets  380,087  384,663
Total assets $14,559,951 $14,214,024
Liabilities and Partners’  Deficit:
Mortgages $15,569,485 $15,391,781
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenue  969,242  977,112
Lease liabilities 188,863 186,594
Other liabilities  426,321  338,412
Total liabilities  17,153,911  16,893,899
Preferred units  67,450  67,450
Partners’  deficit  (2,661,410 ) (2,747,325 )
Total liabilities and partners’  deficit $14,559,951 $14,214,024
Our Share of:
Partners’  deficit $(1,130,713 )$(1,196,926 )
Add: Excess Investment  1,399,757  1,525,903
Our net Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity $269,044 $328,977
“Excess Investment” represents the unamortized difference of our investment over our share of the equity in
the underlying net assets of the joint ventures or other investments acquired and has been determined to relate to
the fair value of the investment properties, intangible assets, including goodwill, and debt premiums and discounts.
We amortize excess investment over the life of the related depreciable components of assets acquired, typically no
greater than 40 years, the terms of the applicable leases, the estimated useful lives of the finite lived intangibles,
and the applicable debt maturity, respectively. The amortization is included in the reported amount of income from
unconsolidated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
118As of December 31, 2020, scheduled principal repayments on these joint venture properties’ mortgage
indebtedness, assuming the obligations remain outstanding through the initial maturities, are as follows:
2021 $2,435,875
2022  2,039,830
2023  1,393,115
2024  2,407,930
2025  1,771,762
Thereafter  5,551,458
Total principal maturities  15,599,970
Debt issuance costs (30,485 )
Total mortgages $15,569,485
This debt becomes due in installments over various terms extending through 2035 with interest rates ranging
from 0.16% to 9.98% and a weighted average interest rate of 3.79% at December 31, 2020.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
119COMBINED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
 
December 31, 
 2020     2019     2018  
REVENUE:                     
Lease income $2,544,134 $3,088,594 $3,045,668
Other income  300,634  322,398  326,575
Total revenue  2,844,768  3,410,992  3,372,243
OPERA TING EXPENSES:
Property operating  519,979  587,062  590,921
Depreciation and amortization  692,424  681,764  652,968
Real estate taxes  262,351  266,013  259,567
Repairs and maintenance  68,722  85,430  87,408
Advertising and promotion  67,434  89,660  87,349
Other  163,710  196,178  187,292
Total operating expenses  1,774,620  1,906,107  1,865,505
Operating Income Before Other Items  1,070,148  1,504,885  1,506,738
Interest expense  (616,332 ) (636,988 ) (663,693 )
Gain on sale or disposal of assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities, net — 24,609 33,367
Net Income $453,816 $892,506 $876,412
Third-Party Investors’  Share of Net Income $226,364 $460,696 $436,767
Our Share of Net Income $227,452 $431,810 $439,645
Amortization of Excess Investment  (82,097 ) (83,556 ) (85,252 )
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of Assets and
Interests in Other Income in the Consolidated Financial
Statements — (9,156 ) —
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of, or Recovery on,
Assets and Interests in Unconsolidated Entities, net  —  (1,133 ) (12,513 )
Income from Unconsolidated Entities $145,355 $337,965 $341,880
Our share of income from unconsolidated entities in the above table, aggregated with our share of results
from our investments in HBS, Klépierre, and TRG as well as our retailer investments in ABG, Forever 21,  J.C.
Penney, RGG, and SPARC Group, is presented in income from unconsolidated entities in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Unless otherwise noted, our share of the gain
(loss) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities, net is reflected within
gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in
the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1207. Indebtedness
Our mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding the impact of derivative instruments, consist of the
following as of December 31:
    2020     2019  
Fixed-Rate Debt:
Mortgage notes, including $ 3,348  and $ 6,775  of net premiums and $ 15,237
and $ 15,195  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average
interest and maturity of 3.84% and 4.1 years at December 31, 2020. $5,803,718 $6,156,595
Unsecured notes, including $ 22,470  and $ 54,976  of net discounts and
$74,622  and $ 70,297  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted
average interest and maturity of 2.98% and 7.3 years at December 31,
2020.  16,985,990  15,747,267
Commercial Paper (see below) 623,020 1,327,050
Total Fixed-Rate Debt  23,412,728  23,230,912
Variable-Rate Debt:
Mortgages notes, including $ 7,102  and $ 4,721  of debt issuance costs,
respectively . Weighted average interest and maturity of 2.19% and
2.3 years at December 31, 2020.  1,137,034  751,130
Credit Facilities (see below), including $16,171  and $11,067  of debt issuance
costs, respectively , at December 31, 2020.  2,108,829  113,933
Total V ariable-Rate Debt  3,245,863  865,063
Other Debt Obligations  64,770  67,255
Total Mortgages and Unsecured Indebtedness $26,723,361 $24,163,230
General.  Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If
we were to fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity
could be accelerated or other remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable
interest rate. As of December 31, 2020, we were in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2020, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 46 non-recourse mortgage
notes secured by mortgages on 49 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and
cross-collateralized mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a
default under any mortgage included in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within
that pool and may lead to acceleration of the indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our
secured debt instruments contain financial and other non-financial covenants which are specific to the properties
that serve as collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under these non-recourse mortgage notes were to
fail to comply with these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and enforce its rights against their
collateral. At December 31, 2020, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage notes were in
compliance with all covenants where non-compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect to
applicable cross-default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of
operations.
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2020, our unsecured debt consisted of $17.1 billion of senior unsecured notes of the
Operating Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility, $2.0 billion outstanding under the $2.0 billion delayed-draw term loan
facility, or Term Facility, and $623.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured
commercial paper program, or Commercial Paper program.  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
121On March 16, 2020, the Operating Partnership replaced in its entirety its existing $4.0 billion unsecured
revolving credit facility by entering into an unsecured credit facility comprised of (i) an amendment and extension of
the Credit Facility and (ii) the Term Facility, or together with the Credit Facility and the Operating Partnership’s $3.5
billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, the Facilities. The Credit Facility and the Term
Facility can be increased in the form of either additional commitments under the Credit Facility or incremental term
loans under the Term Facility in an aggregate amount for all such increases not to exceed $1.0 billion, for a total
aggregate size of $7.0 billion, in each case, subject to  obtaining additional lender commitments and satisfying
certain customary conditions precedent.  Borrowings may be denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling,
Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. Borrowings in currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of
the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined. The initial maturity date of the Term Facility and Credit Facility
are June 30, 2022 and June 30, 2024, respectively. Each of the Term Facility and Credit Facility can be extended
for two additional six-month periods to June 30, 2023 and June 30, 2025, respectively, at our sole option, subject to
satisfying certain customary conditions precedent. The Term Facility was available via a single draw during the
nine-month period following March 16, 2020, which the Operating Partnership drew on December 15, 2020.
Borrowings under the Credit Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR
plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.65% and 1.40% or (ii)
the base rate (which rate is equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or
LIBOR plus 1.00%) (the “Base Rate”), plus a margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit
rating of between 0.000% and 0.40%. The Credit Facility includes a facility fee determined by the Operating
Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.10% and 0.30% on the aggregate revolving commitments under
the Credit Facility. The Credit Facility contains a money market competitive bid option program that allows the
Operating Partnership to hold auctions to achieve lower pricing for short-term borrowings. Borrowings under the
Term Facility bear interest, at the Operating Partnership’s election, at either (i) LIBOR plus a margin determined
based on the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.725% and 1.60% or (ii) the base rate
(equal to the greatest of the prime rate, the federal funds effective rate plus 0.50% or LIBOR plus 1.00%) plus a
margin determined by the Operating Partnership’s corporate credit rating of between 0.00% and 0.60%.  The Term
Facility includes a ticking fee equal to 0.10% of the unused term loan commitment under the Term Facility, which
ticking fee shall commence accruing on the date that is forty-five days after the closing of the Term Facility.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during
its term and provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and
Australian dollars. The initial maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was extended to June 30, 2022 and can be
extended for an additional year to June 30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the
terms thereof. The base interest rate on the Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an
additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
On December 31, 2020, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.7 billion under the
Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Facilities during the year ended December 31,
2020 was $3.9 billion and the weighted average outstanding balance was $1.8 billion. Letters of credit of
$12.3 million were outstanding under the Facilities as of December 31, 2020.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S.
dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in
U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more
subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. Notes will be sold
under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a
result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior
indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit Facility and the Supplemental Facility, or
together the Credit Facilities, and if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the
Credit Facilities to pay amounts outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December
31, 2020, we had $623.0 million outstanding under the Commercial Paper program, fully comprised of U.S. dollar
denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of 0.29%.  These borrowings have a weighted average
maturity date of February 19, 2021 and reduce amounts otherwise available under the Credit Facilities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
122On July 9, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes:
$500.0 million with a fixed interest rate of 3.50%, $750 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.650%, and $750 million
with a fixed interest rate of 3.80%, with maturity dates of September 2025 (the “2025” Notes”), June 2030, and June
2050, respectively. The 2025 Notes were issued as additional notes under an indenture pursuant to which the
Operating Partnership previously issued $600 million principal amount of 3.50% senior notes due September 2025
on August 17, 2015. Proceeds from the unsecured notes offering funded the optional redemption at par of senior
unsecured notes in July and August 2020, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the indebtedness under the
Facilities.
On July 10, 2020 the Operating Partnership repaid $1.75 billion under the Credit Facility and $750.0 million
under the Supplemental Facility.
On July 22, 2020, the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its $500 million
2.50% notes due September 1, 2020.
On August 6, 2020 the Operating Partnership completed the optional redemption at par of its €375 million
2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.
On January 21, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured
notes: $800 million with a fixed interest rate of 1.750%, and $700 million with a fixed interest rate of 2.20%, with
maturity dates of January 2028 and 2031, respectively.
On January 27, 2021 the Operating Partnership completed the planned optional redemption of its $550
million 2.50% notes due on July 15, 2021, including the make-whole amount. Further, on February 2, 2021 the
Operating Partnership repaid $750 million under the Term Facility.
On October 7, 2019 the Operating Partnership completed the early redemption of its $900 million 4.375%
notes due March 1, 2021, $700 million 4.125% notes due December 1, 2021, $600 million 3.375% notes due March
15, 2022 and €375 million of the €750 million 2.375% notes due October 2, 2020. We recorded a $116.3 million
loss on extinguishment of debt in the fourth quarter of 2019 as a result of the early redemption.
Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $7.0 billion and $6.9 billion at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
123Debt Maturity and Other
Our scheduled principal repayments on indebtedness as of December 31, 2020, assuming the obligations
remain outstanding through the initial maturities, are as follows:
2021 $2,322,729 (1)
2022  2,837,586
2023  3,827,278
2024  2,929,639
2025  3,105,056
Thereafter  11,768,557
Total principal maturities  26,790,845
Net unamortized debt premium  35,077
Net unamortized debt discount (54,199 )
Debt issuance costs, net  (113,132 )
Other Debt Obligations 64,770
Total mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $26,723,361
(1) Includes $623.0 million in Global Commercial Paper.
Our cash paid for interest in each period, net of any amounts capitalized, was as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2020    2019     2018  
Cash paid for interest $754,306 $803,728 $811,971
Debt Issuance Costs
Our debt issuance costs consist primarily of financing fees we incurred in order to obtain long-term financing.
We record amortization of debt issuance costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of the respective loans or
agreements. Details of those debt issuance costs as of December 31 are as follows:
    2020     2019
Debt issuance costs $202,859 $187,514
Accumulated amortization (89,727 ) (86,234 )
Debt issuance costs, net $113,132 $101,280
We report amortization of debt issuance costs, amortization of premiums, and accretion of discounts as part
of interest expense. We amortize debt premiums and discounts, which are included in mortgages and unsecured
indebtedness, over the remaining terms of the related debt instruments. These debt premiums or discounts arise
either at the time of the debt issuance or as part of purchase accounting for the fair value of debt assumed in
acquisitions. The accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include
amortization as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,
    2020    2019    2018
Amortization of debt issuance costs $23,076 $21,499 $21,445
Amortization of debt discounts/(premiums) 174 1,571 1,618
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
124Fair Value of Debt
The carrying value of our variable-rate mortgages and other loans approximates their fair values. We
estimate the fair values of consolidated fixed-rate mortgages using cash flows discounted at current borrowing rates
and other indebtedness using cash flows discounted at current market rates. We estimate the fair values of
consolidated fixed-rate unsecured notes using quoted market prices, or, if no quoted market prices are available,
we use quoted market prices for securities with similar terms and maturities. The book value of our consolidated
fixed-rate mortgages and unsecured indebtedness including commercial paper was $23.4 billion and $23.2 billion
as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively. The fair values of these financial instruments and the related
discount rate assumptions as of December 31 are summarized as follows:
December 31, December 31, 
    2020     2019      
Fair value of consolidated fixed rate mortgages
and unsecured indebtedness (in millions)     $ 25,327 $ 23,231         
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for fixed rate
mortgages  2.41 % 3.75 %
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for unsecured
indebtedness 2.63 % 3.67 %
8. Equity
Simon’s Board of Directors is authorized to reclassify excess common stock into one or more additional
classes and series of capital stock, to establish the number of shares in each class or series and to fix the
preferences, conversion and other rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends, and qualifications
and terms and conditions of redemption of such class or series, without any further vote or action by the
stockholders. The issuance of additional classes or series of capital stock may have the effect of delaying, deferring
or preventing a change in control of us without further action of the stockholders. The ability to issue additional
classes or series of capital stock, while providing flexibility in connection with possible acquisitions and other
corporate purposes, could have the effect of making it more difficult for a third party to acquire, or of discouraging a
third party from acquiring, a majority of Simon’s outstanding voting stock.
Holders of common stock are entitled to one vote for each share held of record on all matters submitted to a
vote of stockholders, other than for the election of directors. The holders of Simon’s Class B common stock have
the right to elect up to four members of Simon’s Board of Directors. All 8,000 outstanding shares of the Class B
common stock are subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares
of Class B common stock convert automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the
occurrence of certain events and can be converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Common Stock and Unit Issuances and Repurchases
In 2020, Simon issued 293,204 shares of common stock to 20 limited partners of the Operating Partnership
in exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership redeemed 116,658 units from four limited
partners for $16.1 million in cash.  In 2019, Simon issued 24,000 shares of common stock to a limited partner of the
Operating Partnership in exchange for an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the
Operating Partnership. During the year ended December 31, 2019, the Operating Partnership redeemed 43,255
units from nine limited partners for $6.8 million in cash.  These transactions increased Simon’s ownership interest in
the Operating Partnership.
On December 29, 2020, the Operating Partnership issued 955,705 units in connection with the acquisition of
an 80% ownership interest in TRG, as discussed in Note 6.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
125On November 18, 2020, we issued 22,137,500 shares of common stock in a public offering at a price of
$72.50 per share, before underwriting discounts and commissions.  A portion of the $1.6 billion proceeds from the
offering, net of issue costs, were used to fund the Operating Partnership’s acquisition of an 80% ownership interest
in TRG.
On September 25, 2018, the Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units in connection with the acquisition
of the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange, as discussed in Note 4.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously
authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's
Board of Directors authorized a new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the program, the Company could
purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the two-year period ending February 11, 2021.  Simon may
repurchase the shares in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions as market conditions warrant.
 During the year ended December 31, 2020, Simon purchased 1,245,654 shares at an average price of $122.50 per
share.  During the year ended December 31, 2019, Simon purchased 2,247,074 shares at an average price of
$160.11 per share, of which 46,377 shares at an average price of $164.49 were purchased as part of the previous
program.  As Simon repurchases shares under this program, the Operating Partnership repurchases an equal
number of units from Simon.
Temporary Equity
Simon
Simon classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that Simon could be
required to redeem the security for cash irrespective of the probability of such a possibility. As a result, Simon
classifies one series of preferred units in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties in temporary equity. Each of these securities is discussed further below.
Limited Partners’ Preferred Interest in the Operating Partnership and Noncontrolling Redeemable
Interests in Properties.  The redemption features of the preferred units in the Operating Partnership contain
provisions which could require the Operating Partnership to settle the redemption in cash. As a result, this series of
preferred units in the Operating Partnership remains classified outside permanent equity.
The remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties which are redeemable at the
option of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside Simon’s control, are accounted for as temporary equity.
The carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the instrument is
redeemable at the balance sheet date. Changes in the redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest
are recorded and presented within accumulated deficit in the consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance
of unit equivalents and other. There were no noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value
as of December 31, 2020 and 2019. The following table summarizes the preferred units in the Operating
Partnership and the amount of the noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.
    2020     2019  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized,
255,373  issued and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties  160,355  193,524
Limited partners’  preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and
noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties $185,892 $219,061
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.  This series of preferred units accrues cumulative
quarterly distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually. The preferred units are redeemable by the Operating Partnership
upon the death of the survivor of the original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity
other than the persons or entities entitled to the benefits of the original holder. The redemption price is the
liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully
registered shares of common stock at our election.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
126In the event of the death of a holder of the preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax triggering events applicable
to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the Operating Partnership to redeem the
preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the option of the Operating Partnership in either cash or
shares of common stock.  These preferred units have a carrying value of $25.5 million and are included in limited
partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership in the consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2020
and 2019.
The Operating Partnership
The Operating Partnership classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility
that the Operating Partnership could be required to redeem the security for cash, irrespective of the probability of
such a possibility.  As a result, the Operating Partnership classifies one series of preferred units and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties in temporary equity.  Each of these securities is discussed further below.
Noncontrolling Redeemable Interests in Properties   Redeemable instruments, which typically
represent the remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties, and which are redeemable
at the option of the holder or in circumstances that may be outside our control, are accounted for as temporary
equity.  The carrying amount of the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the
instrument is redeemable at the balance sheet date.  Changes in the redemption value of the underlying
noncontrolling interest are recorded within equity and are presented in the consolidated statements of equity in the
line issuance of unit equivalents and other.  There are no noncontrolling interests redeemable at amounts in excess
of fair value as of December 31, 2020 and 2019.  The following table summarizes the preferred units and the
amount of the noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.    
    2020     2019  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized,
255,373  issued and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties  160,355  193,524
Total preferred units, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests
in properties $185,892 $219,061
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units   The 7.50% preferred units accrue cumulative quarterly
distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually.  We may redeem the preferred units upon the death of the survivor of the
original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other than the persons or entities
entitled to the benefits of the original holder.  The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred
unit) plus accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully registered shares of common stock of
Simon at our election.  In the event of the death of a holder of the 7.5% preferred units, the occurrence of certain
tax triggering events applicable to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the
Operating Partnership to redeem the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the Operating
Partnership’s option in either cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon.  These preferred units have
a carrying value of $25.5 million and are included in preferred units, at liquidation value in the consolidated balance
sheets at December 31, 2020 and 2019.
Permanent Equity
Simon
Preferred Stock.  Dividends on all series of preferred stock are calculated based upon the preferred stock’s
preferred return multiplied by the preferred stock’s corresponding liquidation value. The Operating Partnership pays
preferred distributions to Simon equal to the dividends Simon pays on the preferred stock issued.
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock.  Dividends accrue quarterly at an annual rate of
83/8% per share. Simon can redeem this series, in whole or in part, on or after October 15, 2027 at a redemption
price of $50.00 per share, plus accumulated and unpaid dividends. This preferred stock was issued at a premium of
$7.5 million. The
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
127unamortized premium included in the carrying value of the preferred stock at December 31, 2020 and 2019 was
$2.2 million and $2.6 million, respectively.
The Operating Partnership
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.     Distributions accrue quarterly at an annual
rate of 83/8% per unit on the Series J 83/8% preferred units, or Series J preferred units.  Simon owns all of the
Series J preferred units which have the same economic rights and preferences of an outstanding series of Simon
preferred stock.  The Operating Partnership can redeem this series, in whole or in part, when Simon can redeem
the related preferred stock, on and after October 15, 2027 at a redemption price of $50.00 per unit, plus
accumulated and unpaid distributions. The Series J preferred units were issued at a premium of $7.5 million.  The
unamortized premium included in the carrying value of the preferred units at December 31, 2020 and 2019 was
$2.2 million and $2.6 million, respectively.  There are 1,000,000 Series J preferred units authorized and 796,948
Series J preferred units issued and outstanding.
Other Equity Activity
The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended.  This plan, or the 1998 plan,
provides for the grant of equity-based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of options to purchase
shares, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock grants and performance-based unit awards. No options have
been granted to executives or other employees since 2001, however options may be granted which are qualified as
“incentive stock options” within the meaning of Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code and options which are not
so qualified. An aggregate of 16,300,000 shares of common stock have been reserved for issuance under the 1998
plan.
The 1998 plan is administered by the Compensation Committee of Simon’s Board of Directors, or the
Compensation Committee. The Compensation Committee determines which eligible individuals may participate and
the type, extent and terms of the awards to be granted to them. In addition, the Compensation Committee interprets
the 1998 plan and makes all other determinations deemed advisable for its administration. Options granted to
employees become exercisable over the period determined by the Compensation Committee. The exercise price of
an employee option may not be less than the fair market value of the shares on the date of grant. Employee options
generally vest over a three-year period and expire ten years from the date of grant.
Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive awards under
the 1998 plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000, and an annual restricted
stock award with a grant date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive annual retainers for the Company’s
Audit, Compensation, and Governance and Nominating Committees of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000,
respectively.  Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service on the Audit, Compensation and Governance and
Nominating Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and $10,000, respectively. The Lead Director receives an annual
retainer of $50,000.  These retainers are paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of restricted stock
(including reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the director
retires, dies or becomes disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The directors may vote and are
entitled to receive dividends on the underlying shares; however, any dividends on the shares of restricted stock
must be reinvested in shares of common stock and held in the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the
shares of restricted stock are delivered to the former director.
In accordance with its terms, the 1998 Plan expired on December 31, 2018.  The shares of common stock
that were available for grant under the 1998 Plan at the time of its expiration are not available for grant under the
2019 Plan.
The Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan.  This plan, or the 2019 Plan, provides for the
grant of equity-based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of incentive and nonqualified stock
options to purchase shares, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock grants and performance-based awards.
 Options may be granted which are qualified as “incentive stock options” within the meaning of Section 422 of the
Internal Revenue Code
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
128and options which are not so qualified.  An aggregate of 8,000,000 shares of common stock have been reserved
under the 2019 plan.
The 2019 Plan is administered by the Compensation Committee.  The Compensation Committee determines
which eligible individuals may participate and the type, extent and terms of the awards to be granted to them.  In
addition, the Compensation Committee interprets the 2019 Plan and makes all other determinations deemed
advisable for its administration.  Options granted to employees become exercisable over the period determined by
the Compensation Committee.  The exercise price of an employee option may not be less than the fair market
value of the shares on the date of grant.  Employee options generally vest over a three-year period and expire ten
years from the date of grant.
Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive awards under
the 2019 plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000, and an annual restricted
stock award with a grant date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive annual retainers for the Company’s
Audit, Compensation, and Governance and Nominating Committees of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000,
respectively.  Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service on the Audit, Compensation and Governance and
Nominating Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and $10,000, respectively. The Lead Director receives an annual
retainer of $50,000.  These retainers are paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of restricted stock
(including reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the director
retires, dies or becomes disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The directors may vote and are
entitled to receive dividends on the underlying shares; however, any dividends on the shares of restricted stock
must be reinvested in shares of common stock and held in the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the
shares of restricted stock are delivered to the former director.
Stock Based Compensation
Awards under our stock based compensation plans primarily take the form of LTIP units and restricted stock
grants. Restricted stock and awards under the LTIP programs are either market or performance-based and are
based on various individual, corporate and business unit performance measures as further described below. The
expense related to these programs, net of amounts capitalized, is included within home and regional office costs
and general and administrative costs in the accompanying statements of operations and comprehensive income.
LTIP Programs.  The Compensation Committee has approved long-term, performance based incentive
compensation programs, or the LTIP programs, for certain senior employees. Awards under the LTIP programs take
the form of LTIP units, a form of limited partnership interest issued by the Operating Partnership, which are subject
to the participant maintaining employment with us through certain dates and other conditions as described in the
applicable award agreements. Awarded LTIP units not earned in accordance with the conditions set forth in the
applicable award agreements are forfeited. Earned and fully vested LTIP units are equivalent to units of the
Operating Partnership. During the performance period, participants are entitled to receive distributions on the LTIP
units awarded to them equal to 10% of the regular quarterly distributions paid on a unit of the Operating
Partnership. As a result, we account for these LTIP units as participating securities under the two-class method of
computing earnings per share.
In 2018, the Compensation Committee established and granted awards under a redesigned LTIP program,
or the 2018 LTIP program.  Awards under the 2018 LTIP program were granted in two tranches, Tranche A LTIP
units and Tranche B LTIP units. Each of the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units will be considered
earned if, and only to the extent to which, the respective goals based on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share
or Relative TSR Goal performance criteria, as defined in the applicable award agreements, are achieved during the
applicable two-year and three-year performance periods of the Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP units,
respectively.  One half of the earned Tranche A LTIP units will vest on January 1, 2021 with the other one-half
vesting on January 1, 2022. All of the earned Tranche B LTIP units will vest on January 1, 2022.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
129The grant date fair value of the portion of the LTIP units based on achieving the target FFO performance
criteria is $6.1 million for the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units, for a total of $12.1 million.  The
2018 LTIP program provides that the value of the FFO-based award may be adjusted up or down based on the
Company’s performance compared to the target FFO performance criteria and has a maximum potential fair value
of $18.2 million.  
In 2019, the Compensation Committee established and granted awards under a redesigned LTIP program,
or the 2019 LTIP program.  Awards under the 2019 LTIP program will be considered earned if, and only to the
extent to which, the respective performance conditions (based on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share, and
Objective Criteria Goals) and market conditions (based on Relative TSR performance), as defined in the applicable
award agreements, are achieved during the applicable three-year measurement period, subject to the recipient’s
continued employment through the vesting date.  All of the earned LTIP units under the 2019 LTIP program will vest
on January 1, 2023.  The 2019 LTIP program provides that the amount earned of the performance-based portion of
the awards is dependent on Simon’s performance compared to certain criteria and has a maximum potential fair
value at issuance of $22.1 million.  
The grant date fair values of any LTIP units for market-based awards are estimated using a Monte Carlo
model, and the resulting fixed expense is recorded regardless of whether the market condition criteria are achieved
if the required service is delivered. The grant date fair values of the market-based awards are being amortized into
expense over the period from the grant date to the date at which the awards, if earned, would become vested.  The
expense of the performance-based award is recorded over the period from the grant date to the date at which the
awards, if earned, would become vested, based on our assessment as to whether it is probable that the
performance criteria will be achieved during the applicable performance periods.
The Compensation Committee approved LTIP unit grants as shown in the table below. The extent to which
LTIP units were earned, and the aggregate grant date fair value, are as follows:
LTIP Program     LTIP Units Earned     Grant Date Fair Value
of TSR Award     Grant Date Target
Value of Performance-
Based Awards
2018 L TIP program - Tranche A 38,148  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2018 L TIP program - Tranche B  To be determined in 2021  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2019 L TIP program To be determined in 2022  $9.5 million  $14.7 million
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization and forfeitures, related to LTIP programs of
approximately $1.9 million, $15.8 million, and $12.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and
2018, respectively.
Restricted Stock and Restricted Stock Units.  The 1998 and 2019 plans also provide for shares of
restricted stock to be granted to certain employees at no cost to those employees, subject to achievement of
individual performance and certain financial and return-based performance measures established by the
Compensation Committee related to the most recent year’s performance. Once granted, the shares of restricted
stock then vest annually over a three-year or a four-year period (as defined in the award). The cost of restricted
stock grants, which is based upon the stock’s fair market value on the grant date, is recognized as expense ratably
over the vesting period. Through December 31, 2020 a total of 5,858,453 shares of restricted stock, net of
forfeitures, have been awarded under the 1998 plan, and 481,837 shares of restricted stock and restricted stock
units have been awarded under the 2019 plan.
During 2020, the Compensation Committee established a one-time grant of 312,263 time-based restricted
stock units under the 2019 Plan at a weighted average fair market value of $84.37 per share.  These awards will
vest, subject to the grantee's continued service on each applicable vesting date, in one-third increments on January
1, 2022, January 1,
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1302023, and January 1, 2024.  The grant date fair value of the awards of $26.3 million is being recognized as expense
over the three-year vesting service period.
Information regarding restricted stock awards is summarized in the following table for each of the years
presented:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
2020 2019 2018 
Shares of restricted stock awarded during the year ,
net of forfeitures  462,966  90,902  51,756
Weighted average fair value of shares granted during
the year $73.28 $181.94 $153.24
Annual amortization $11,660 $12,604 $12,029
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization, related to restricted stock for employees and non-
employee directors of approximately $10.3 million, $11.0 million, and $7.8 million for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Other Compensation Arrangements.  On July 6, 2011, in connection with the execution of an employment
agreement, the Compensation Committee granted David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and
President, a retention award in the form of 1,000,000 LTIP units, or the Award, for his continued service through
July 5, 2019. Effective December 31, 2013, the Award was modified, or the Current Award, and as a result the LTIP
units would become earned and eligible to vest based on the attainment of Company-based performance goals, in
addition to the service-based vesting requirement included in the original Award. The Current Award does not
contain an opportunity for Mr. Simon to receive additional LTIP units above and beyond the original Award should
our performance exceed the higher end of the performance criteria.  The performance criteria of the Current Award
are based on the attainment of specific FFO per share goals. Because the performance criteria has been met, a
maximum of 360,000 LTIP units, or the A units, 360,000 LTIP units, or the B units, and 280,000 LTIP units, or the C
units, became earned on December 31, 2015, December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2017, respectively. If the
relevant performance criteria had not been achieved, all or a portion of the Current Award would have been
forfeited. The earned A units vested on January 1, 2018, earned B units vested on January 1, 2019 and earned C
units vested on June 30, 2019. The grant date fair value of the retention award of $120.3 million was recognized as
expense over the eight-year term of his employment agreement on a straight-line basis based on the applicable
vesting periods of the A units, B units and C units.  
We also maintain a tax-qualified retirement 401(k) savings plan and offer no other post-retirement or post-
employment benefits to our employees.
Exchange Rights
Simon
Limited partners in the Operating Partnership have the right to exchange all or any portion of their units for
shares of common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon’s Board of Directors. The amount
of cash to be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading
price of Simon’s common stock at that time. At December 31, 2020, Simon had reserved 54,751,265 shares of
common stock for possible issuance upon the exchange of units, stock options and Class B common stock.
The Operating Partnership
Limited partners have the right under the partnership agreement to exchange all or any portion of their units
for shares of Simon common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon in its sole discretion. If
Simon selects cash, Simon cannot cause the Operating Partnership to redeem the exchanged units for cash
without contributing cash to the Operating Partnership as partners’ equity sufficient to effect the redemption.  If
sufficient cash is not contributed,
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
131Simon will be deemed to have elected to exchange the units for shares of Simon common stock.  The amount of
cash to be paid if the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading price
of Simon’s common stock at that time. The number of shares of Simon’s common stock issued pursuant to the
exercise of the exchange right will be the same as the number of units exchanged.
9. Lease Income
As discussed in Note 3, fixed lease income under our operating leases includes fixed minimum lease
consideration and fixed CAM reimbursements recorded on a straight-line basis.  Variable lease income includes
consideration based on sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other
items including negative variable lease income as discussed in Note 3.
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
    2020     2019 2018
Fixed lease income $3,871,395 $4,293,401 $4,185,174
Variable lease income 430,972 950,370 973,246
Total lease income $4,302,367 $5,243,771 $5,158,420
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets includes
straight-line receivables of $597.6 million and $618.4 million at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Minimum fixed lease consideration under non-cancelable tenant operating leases for each of the next five
years and thereafter, excluding variable lease consideration and amounts deferred in relation to the COVID-19
pandemic, which with respect to deferrals are expected to be collected primarily in 2021, as of December 31, 2020,
is as follows:
2021     $3,224,624
2022  2,806,916
2023  2,374,565
2024  1,939,967
2025  1,540,214
Thereafter  3,943,703
$15,829,989
10. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary
course of our business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in
connection with transactions such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that current proceedings will not
have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity, or results of operations. We record a liability
when a loss is considered probable and the amount can be reasonably estimated.
During the first quarter of 2019, we settled a lawsuit with our former insurance broker, Aon Risk Services
Central Inc., related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010. In accordance with a
previous agreement with the prior co-investor in Opry Mills, a portion of the settlement was remitted to the co-
investor.  Our share of the settlement was approximately $68.0 million, which was recorded as other income in the
accompanying consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
132Lease Commitments
As of December 31, 2020, a total of 23 of the consolidated properties are subject to ground leases. The
termination dates of these ground leases range from 2021 to 2090, including periods for which exercising an
extension option is reasonably assured. These ground leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental
payments, or a fixed annual rental payment plus a percentage rent component based upon the revenues or total
sales of the property. In addition, we have several regional office locations that are subject to leases with
termination dates ranging from 2021 to 2028. These office leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental
payments plus pay our share of common area, real estate, and utility expenses. Some of our ground and office
leases include escalation clauses. All of our lease arrangements are classified as operating leases. We incurred
ground lease expense and office lease expense, which are included in other expense and home office and regional
expense, respectively, as follows:
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
    2020 2019
Operating Lease Cost
Fixed lease cost $31,404 $31,000
Variable lease cost 13,270 16,833
Sublease income  (746) (694)
Total operating lease cost $43,928 $47,139
For the year ended December 31, 2018, we incurred $47,320 of lease expense.
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
2020 2019
Other Information
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash flows from operating leases $44,570 $48,519
Weighted-average remaining lease term - operating leases 34.4 35.6
Weighted-average discount rate - operating leases 4.86% 4.87%
Future minimum lease payments due under these leases for years ending December 31, excluding
applicable extension options and renewal options unless reasonably certain of exercise and any sublease income,
are as follows:
2021     $32,787
2022  32,812
2023  32,953
2024  33,087
2025  33,098
Thereafter  886,336
$1,051,073
Impact of discounting (535,581 )
Operating lease liabilities $515,492
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
133Insurance
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific
layers of potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss
insurance on all of our properties in the United States. The initial portion of coverage not provided by third-party
carriers may be insured through our wholly-owned captive insurance company, Bridgewood Insurance
Company, Ltd., or other financial arrangements controlled by us. If required, a third-party carrier has, in turn, agreed
to provide evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the terms and conditions of the carrier’s insurance
policy with us. A similar insurance policy written either through our captive insurance company or other financial
arrangements controlled by us also provides initial coverage for property insurance and certain windstorm risks.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United
States on an “all risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any
threatened or actual terrorist attacks where we operate could adversely affect our property values, revenues,
consumer traffic and tenant sales.
Hurricane Impacts
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained
significant property damage and business interruption as a result of Hurricane Maria.  Since the date of the loss, we
have received $81.1 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers related to the two properties located in
Puerto Rico, of which $47.5 million was used for property restoration and remediation and to reduce the insurance
recovery receivable.  During the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, we recorded $5.2 million and $10.5
million, respectively, as business interruption income, which was recorded in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Texas experienced property damage and
business interruption as a result of Hurricane Hanna.  We wrote-off assets of approximately $9.6 million, and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $14.3 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.
During the third quarter of 2020, one of our properties located in Louisiana experienced property damage
and business interruption as a result of Hurricane Laura.   We wrote-off assets of approximately $11.1 million and
recorded an insurance recovery receivable, and have received $20.6 million of insurance proceeds from third-party
carriers.  The proceeds were used for property restoration and remediation and reduced the insurance recovery
receivable.
Guarantees of Indebtedness
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by the joint venture property,
which is non-recourse to us. As of December 31,2020 and 2019, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint
venture related mortgage indebtedness of $219.2 million and $214.8 million, respectively. Mortgages guaranteed by
the Operating Partnership are secured by the property of the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the
outstanding obligation and which have estimated fair values in excess of the guaranteed amount.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Our U.S. Malls, Premium Outlets, and The Mills rely upon anchor tenants to attract customers; however,
anchors do not contribute materially to our financial results as many anchors own their spaces. All material
operations are within the United States and no customer or tenant accounts for 5% or more of our consolidated
revenues.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
134COVID-19
On March 11, 2020, the World Health Organization declared the novel strain of coronavirus, or COVID-19, a
global pandemic and recommended containment and mitigation measures worldwide. The COVID-19 pandemic
has already had a significant negative impact on economic and market conditions around the world in 2020, and,
notwithstanding the fact that vaccines have started to be administered in the United States and elsewhere, the
pandemic continues to adversely impact economic activity in real estate. The impact of the COVID-19 pandemic
continues to evolve and governments and other authorities, including where we own or hold interests in properties,
have imposed measures intended to control its spread, including restrictions on freedom of movement, group
gatherings and business operations such as travel bans, border closings, business closures, quarantines, stay-at-
home, shelter-in-place orders, density limitations and social distancing measures. Governments and other
authorities are in varying stages of lifting or modifying some of these measures, however certain governments and
other authorities have already been forced to, and others may in the future, reinstate these measures or impose
new, more restrictive measures, if the risks, or the tenants’ and consumers’ perception of the risks, related to the
COVID-19 pandemic worsen at any time.  Although tenants and consumers have been adapting to the COVID-19
pandemic, with tenants adding services like curbside pickup, and while consumer risk-tolerance is evolving, such
adaptations and evolution may take time, and there is no guarantee that retail will return to pre-pandemic levels
even once the pandemic subsides.  As a result of the COVID-19 pandemic and these measures, the Company may
experience material impacts including changes in the ability to recognize revenue due to changes in our
assessment of the probability of collection of lease income and asset impairment charges as a result of changing
cash flows generated by our properties.  
As of October 7, 2020, all of our domestic properties and certain of our retailer investments had reopened.    
11. Related Party Transactions
Transactions with Affiliates
Our management company provides office space and legal, human resource administration, property
specific financing and other support services to Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or MSA, a related party, for which
we received a fee of $0.6 million in each of 2020, 2019 and 2018. In addition, pursuant to management agreements
that provide for our receipt of a management fee and reimbursement of our direct and indirect costs, we have
managed since 1993 two shopping centers owned by entities in which David Simon and Herbert Simon have
ownership interests, for which we received a fee of $3.3 million, $3.9 million, and $4.2 million in 2020, 2019, and
2018, respectively.  
Transactions with Unconsolidated Joint Ventures
As described in Note 2, our management company provides management, insurance, and other services to
certain unconsolidated joint ventures.  Amounts received for such services were $92.7 million, $108.2 million, and
$111.5 million in 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively.  During 2020, 2019, and 2018, we recorded development,
royalty, and other fee income, net of elimination, related to our unconsolidated international joint ventures of $13.1
million, $14.8 million, and $16.0 million, respectively.  The fees related to our international investments are included
in other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Neither
MSA, David Simon, or Herb Simon have an ownership interest in any of our unconsolidated joint ventures, except
through their ownership interests in the Company or the Operating Partnership.
 We have investments in retailers including Forever 21, J.C. Penney, and SPARC Group, and these retailers
are lessees at certain of our operating properties. Lease income from the date of our investments in our
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income related to these retailers was $54.1 million,
$20.9 million, and $20.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018, respectively, net of
elimination.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
13512. Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Quarterly 2020 and 2019 data is summarized in the table below. Quarterly amounts may not sum to annual
amounts due to rounding.
    First     Second     Third     Fourth  
Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter  
2020
Total revenue $ 1,353,360 $ 1,062,041 $ 1,060,674 $ 1,131,429
Operating income before other items  654,869  450,868  404,024  462,047
Consolidated net income  505,404  290,548  168,646  312,726
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 437,605 $ 254,213 $ 145,926 $ 271,483
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 1.43 $ 0.83 $ 0.48 $ 0.86
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and
Diluted  306,504,084  305,882,326  305,913,431  316,595,345
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 504,263 $ 292,863 $ 168,086 $ 311,238
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 1.43 $ 0.83 $ 0.48 $ 0.86
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and
Diluted 353,191,960 352,410,392 352,420,845 363,050,401
2019
Total revenue $ 1,452,834 $ 1,397,186 $ 1,416,554 $ 1,488,615
Operating income before other items  745,021  680,631  705,302  776,876
Consolidated net income  631,947  572,102  628,724  590,416
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 548,475 $ 495,324 $ 544,254 $ 510,194
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 1.78 $ 1.60 $ 1.77 $ 1.66
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and
Diluted  308,978,053  308,708,798  307,275,230  306,868,960
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 631,551 $ 570,389 $ 627,074 $ 587,931
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 1.78 $ 1.60 $ 1.77 $ 1.66
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and
Diluted 355,778,250 355,491,396 354,038,110 353,619,579
Table of Contents
136Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Simon
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Simon maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that
information required to be disclosed in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded,
processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such
information is accumulated and communicated to Simon’s management, including its Chief Executive Officer and
Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Because of inherent
limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only
reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of Simon’s disclosure controls and procedures as of
December 31, 2020. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
concluded that, as of December 31, 2020, Simon’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective at a
reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Simon is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting.
Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a process designed
by, or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and effected by Simon’s
Board of Directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S.
generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our
receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management
and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use
or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of Simon’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020.
In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that assessment and
criteria, we believe that, as of December 31, 2020, Simon’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of Simon's internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2020 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in Simon's internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule
13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2020 that have materially
affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, Simon's internal control over financial reporting.
Table of Contents
137The Operating Partnership
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Operating Partnership maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e)
under the Exchange Act) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be
disclosed in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and
reported within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated
and communicated to our management, including Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as
appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures. Because of inherent limitations, disclosure
controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, and not
absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
evaluated the effectiveness of the design and operation of the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and
procedures as of December 31, 2020. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief
Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and
procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Operating Partnership is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over
financial reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a
process designed by, or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and
effected by Simon’s Board of Directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our
transactions and disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our
receipts and expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management
and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use
or disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect
misstatements. Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls
may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or
procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2020. In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring
Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on
that assessment and criteria, we believe that, as of December 31, 2020, the Operating Partnership’s internal control
over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of the Operating Partnership’s internal control
over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting (as
defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2020 that
have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Operating Partnership’s internal control
over financial reporting.
Table of Contents
138Item 9B.    Other Information
During the fourth quarter of the year covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, the Audit Committee of
Simon’s Board of Directors approved certain audit, audit-related and non-audit tax compliance and tax consulting
services to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP, our independent registered public accounting firm. This disclosure is
made pursuant to Section 10A(i)(2) of the Exchange Act as added by Section 202 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of
2002.
Part III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A and the
information included under the caption "Information about our Executive Officers" in Part I hereof.
Item 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder 
Matters
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2021 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for
Simon’s 2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
The Audit Committee of Simon's Board of Directors pre-approves all audit and permissible non-audit
services to be provided by Ernst & Young LLP, or Ernst & Young, Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s
independent registered public accounting firm, prior to commencement of services. The Audit Committee has
delegated to the Chairman of the Audit Committee the authority to pre-approve specific services up to specified
individual and aggregate fee amounts. These pre-approval decisions are presented to the full Audit Committee at
the next scheduled meeting after such approvals are made.  We have incurred fees as shown below for services
from Ernst & Young as Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s independent registered public accounting firm and
for services provided to our managed consolidated and joint venture properties and our consolidated non-managed
properties. Ernst & Young has advised us that it has billed or will bill these indicated amounts for the following
categories of services for the years ended December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively:
2020    2019
Audit Fees (1) $ 
4,707,000$ 
4,230,000
Audit Related Fees (2)   
5,068,000  
4,835,000
Tax Fees (3)   359,000  266,000
All Other Fees   —   —
(1)Audit Fees include fees for the audits of the financial statements and the effectiveness of internal control over
financial reporting and quarterly reviews for Simon and the Operating Partnership and services associated with
the related SEC registration statements, periodic reports, and other documents issued in connection with
securities offerings.
Table of Contents
139(2)Audit-Related Fees include audits of individual or portfolios of properties and schedules to comply with lender,
joint venture partner or contract requirements and due diligence services for our managed consolidated and
joint venture entities and our consolidated non-managed entities.  Our share of these Audit-Related Fees was
approximately 60% and 59% for the years ended 2020 and 2019, respectively.
(3)Tax Fees include fees for international and other tax consulting services, tax due dilligence and tax return
compliance services associated with the tax returns for certain managed joint ventures as well as other
miscellaneous tax compliance services.  Our share of these Tax Fees was approximately 81% and 65% for
2020 and 2019, respectively.
Table of Contents
140Part IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Page No.
(a) (1) Financial Statements
The following consolidated financial statements of Simon Property Group, Inc. and
Simon Property Group, L.P . are set forth in Part II, item 8.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 79
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 87
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the
years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 88
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 89
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018 90
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, L.P .
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2020 and 2019 92
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the
years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018 93
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31,
2020, 2019 and 2018 94
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018 95
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 97
(2) Financial Statement Schedule
Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P . Schedule III —
Schedule of Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 148
Notes to Schedule III 152
Other financial statement schedules are omitted because they are not applicable or
the required information is shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.
(3) Exhibits
The Exhibit Index attached hereto is hereby incorporated by reference to this Item. 141
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
None.
Table of Contents
141EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits
2.1Separation and Distribution Agreement by and among Simon Property Group, Inc., Simon Property
Group, L.P., Washington Prime Group Inc. and Washington Prime Group, L.P., dated as of May 27, 2014
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 2.1 of the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 29, 2014).
2.2Amended and Restated Agreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of November 14, 2020, by and among the
Taubman Parties and the Simon Parties (incorporated by reference to exhibit 2.1 of Simon Property Group
Inc.’s and Simon Property Group L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 16, 2020).
3.1Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Simon Property Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Appendix A
of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed March 27, 2009).
3.2Amended and Restated By-Laws of Simon Property Group, Inc. as adopted on March 20, 2017 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 24, 2017).
3.3Certificate of Powers, Designations, Preferences and Rights of the 83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 Par Value (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 20, 2004).
3.4Certificate of Designation of Series A Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Stock (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2014).
3.5Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Limited Partnership (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
3.6Eighth Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Simon Property Group, L.P. dated as of
May 8, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed May 9, 2008).
3.7Certificate of Designation of Series B Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Units of Simon Property
Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed August 8, 2014).
3.8Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated March 7, 2007, but
effective as of August 27, 1999, regarding a prior agreement filed under an exhibit 99.1 to Form S-3/A of
Simon Property Group, L.P. on November 20, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 of Simon
Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 16, 2007).
3.9Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated April 29, 2009, but
effective as of October 14, 2004, regarding redemption of the Registrant's Series I Preferred Units
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
May 8, 2009).
4.1(a)Indenture, dated as of November 26, 1996, by and among Simon Property Group, L.P. and The Chase
Manhattan Bank, as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s
Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed October 21, 1996 (Reg. No. 333-11491)).
4.2Description of Each Registrant’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934.
9.1Second Amended and Restated Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1,
2004 between Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., on the one hand and Melvin Simon, Herbert Simon and David
Simon on the other hand (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2004).
9.2Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004 between David Simon,
Melvin Simon and Herbert Simon (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2004).
Table of Contents
142Exhibits
10.1Form of the Indemnity Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and its directors and officers
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.7 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Form S-4 filed August 13, 1998
(Reg. No. 333-61399)).
10.2Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of September 24, 1998, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc.
and the persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed October 9, 1998).
10.3Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of August 27, 1999, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and
the persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Registration Statement on Form S-
3 filed March 24, 2004 (Reg. No. 333-113884)).
10.4Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of November 14, 1997, by and between O’Connor Retail
Partners, L.P. and Simon DeBartolo Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 of the Registration
Statement on Form S-3 filed December 7, 2001 (Reg. No. 333-74722)).
10.5*Simon Property Group, L.P. Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 10, 2014).
10.6*Form of Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on
Form 10-K filed March 16, 2005).
10.7*Form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998
Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report
on Form 10-K filed February 28, 2007).
10.8*Form of Non-Employee Director Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed March 16, 2005).
10.9*Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon effective as of July 6, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
July 7, 2011).
10.10*First Amendment to Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon, dated as
of March 29, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.11*Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan dated as of December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed November 5, 2009).
10.12*Amendment — 2008 Performance Based-Restricted Stock Agreement dated as of March 6, 2009
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed November 5, 2009).
10.13*Certificate of Designation of Series 2010 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.14*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Three Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.15*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Two Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.16*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (One Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P.
1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
Table of Contents
143Exhibits
10.17*Certificate of Designation of Series CEO LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.18*Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.19*First Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement dated as of
December 22, 2011 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.24 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual
Report on Form 10-K filed February 28, 2012).
10.20*Second Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of March 29,
2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed April 4, 2013).
10.21*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of
December 31, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed January 2, 2014).
10.22*Certificate of Designation of Series 2011 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.23*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2011 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.6 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.24*Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 11, 2012).
10.25*Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed May 7, 2014).
10.26*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2012).
10.27*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.28*Certificate of Designation of Series 2013 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2013).
10.29*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2013 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.30*Form of Simon Property Group Executive Officer LTIP Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.31*Simon Property Group CEO LTIP Unit Adjustment Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.32*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2014 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.33*Certificate of Designation of Series 2014 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.34Amended and Restated $2,750,000,000 Credit Agreement dated as of March 2, 2015 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 3, 2015).
Table of Contents
144Exhibits
10.35*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2015 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended
March 31, 2015 filed on January 13, 2016).
10.36*Certificate of Designation of Series 2015 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended
March 31, 2015 filed on January 13, 2016).
10.37*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2016 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.38*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2016 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.39Amendment No. 1 to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 6, 2016 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 7, 2016).
10.40Amended and Restated $4,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 17, 2017 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 20, 2017).
10.41Amended and Restated $3,500,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of February 15, 2018 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 15,
2018).
10.42*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2018 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.43*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2018 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.44*Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon
Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2019).
10.45*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2019 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
10.46*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2019 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report
on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
10.47Second Amended and Restated $6,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 16, 2020 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed March 16, 2020).
10.48*Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement under Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan.
21.1List of Subsidiaries of Simon Property Group Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P.
23.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
23.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
31.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Table of Contents
145Exhibits
31.2Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.3Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.4Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101.INSXBRL Instance Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its
XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
104Cover Page Interactive File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
(a)    Does not include supplemental indentures that authorize the issuance of debt securities series, none of which
exceeds 10% of the total assets of Simon Property Group, L.P. on a consolidated basis. Simon Property
Group, L.P. agrees to file copies of any such supplemental indentures upon the request of the Commission.
*        Represents a management contract, or compensatory plan, contract or arrangement required to be filed
pursuant to Regulation S-K.
Table of Contents
146SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each Registrant
has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
By/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Officer and President
Date: February 25, 2021
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief Executive
Officer and President of Simon Property Group, Inc.,
General Partner
Date: February 25, 2021
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by
the following persons on behalf of Simon Property Group, Inc., for itself and in its capacity as General Partner of
Simon Property Group, L.P., and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Capacity Date
/s/ DAVID SIMONChairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Of ficer (Principal Executive
Officer) and PresidentFebruary 25, 2021
David Simon
/s/ HERBER T SIMONChairman Emeritus and Director February 25, 2021Herbert Simon
/s/ RICHARD S. SOKOLOVVice Chairman and Director February 25, 2021Richard S. Sokolov
/s/ LARR Y C. GLASSCOCKDirector February 25, 2021Larry C. Glasscock
/s/ REUBEN S. LEIBOWITZDirector February 25, 2021Reuben S. Leibowitz
/s/ J. ALBER T SMITH, JR.Director February 25, 2021J. Albert Smith, Jr .
/s/ KAREN N. HORNDirector February 25, 2021Karen N. Horn
/s/ ALLAN HUBBARDDirector February 25, 2021Allan Hubbard
/s/ DANIEL  C. SMITHDirector February 25, 2021Daniel C. Smith
Table of Contents
147Signature Capacity Date
/s/ GAR Y M. RODKINDirector February 25, 2021Gary M. Rodkin
/s/ GLYN F . AEPPELDirector February 25, 2021Glyn F . Aeppel
/s/ STEF AN M. SELIGDirector February 25, 2021Stefan M. Selig
/s/ MAR TA R. STEW ARTDirector February 25, 2021Marta R. Stewart
/s/ BRIAN J. MCDADE Executive V ice President, Chief
Financial Of ficer (Principal Financial
Officer) and TreasurerFebruary 25, 2021
Brian J. McDade
/s/ ADAM J. REUILLESenior V ice President and Chief
Accounting Of ficer (Principal
Accounting Of ficer)February 25, 2021
Adam J. Reuille
Table of Contents
148SCHEDULE III
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location  Encumbrances (6) Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Malls
Barton Creek
SquareAustin, TX
$ -$2,903 $ 20,929 $7,983 $ 92,532 $10,886 $ 113,461 $124,347 $ 65,021  1981
Battlefield
MallSpringfield, MO
 112,707  3,919  27,231  3,000  73,128  6,919  100,359  107,278  73,594  1970
Bay Park
SquareGreen Bay , WI
 - 6,278  25,623  4,106  33,597  10,384  59,220  69,604  35,332  1980
Brea Mall Brea (Los
Angeles), CA  - 39,500  209,202  2,993  77,892  42,493  287,094  329,587  158,412  1998 (4)
Broadway
SquareTyler, TX
 - 11,306  32,431  - 51,429  11,306  83,860  95,166  40,639  1994 (4)
Burlington
MallBurlington
(Boston), MA  - 46,600  303,618  27,458  235,501  74,058  539,119  613,177  248,794  1998 (4)
Castleton
SquareIndianapolis, IN
 - 26,250  98,287  7,434  78,590  33,684  176,877  210,561  119,878  1972
Cielo V ista
MallEl Paso, TX
 - 1,005  15,262  608  55,058  1,613  70,320  71,933  49,573  1974
College Mall Bloomington, IN  - 1,003  16,245  720  70,441  1,723  86,686  88,409  47,678  1965
Columbia
CenterKennewick, W A
 - 17,441  66,580  - 40,993  17,441  107,573  125,014  64,134  1987
Copley Place Boston, MA  - - 378,045  - 206,205  - 584,250  584,250  252,514  2002 (4)
Coral Square Coral Springs
(Miami), FL  - 13,556  93,630  - 19,097  13,556  112,727  126,283  89,651  1984
Cordova Mall Pensacola, FL  - 18,626  73,091  7,321  70,048  25,947  143,139  169,086  80,553  1998 (4)
Domain, The Austin, TX  176,533  40,436  197,010  - 144,511  40,436  341,521  381,957  174,735  2005
Empire Mall Sioux Falls, SD  183,782  35,998  192,186  - 30,083  35,998  222,269  258,267  68,901  1998 (5)
Fashion Mall
at Keystone,
TheIndianapolis, IN
 - - 120,579  29,145  103,435  29,145  224,014  253,159  132,731  1997 (4)
Firewheel
Town CenterGarland
(Dallas), TX  - 8,438  82,716  - 28,830  8,438  111,546  119,984  64,895  2004
Forum
Shops at
Caesars,
TheLas V egas, NV
 - - 276,567  - 282,321  - 558,888  558,888  293,579  1992
Greenwood
Park MallGreenwood
(Indianapolis),
IN  - 2,423  23,445  5,253  124,303  7,676  147,748  155,424  91,542  1979
Haywood
MallGreenville, SC
 - 11,585  133,893  6 41,813  11,591  175,706  187,297  113,400  1998 (4)
Ingram Park
MallSan Antonio, TX
 122,251  733  16,972  37  43,246  770  60,218  60,988  33,614  1979
King of
PrussiaKing of Prussia
(Philadelphia),
PA  - 175,063  1,128,200  - 380,289  175,063  1,508,489  1,683,552  463,073  2003 (5)
La Plaza
Mall (13)McAllen, TX
 - 87,912  9,828  6,569  177,319  94,481  187,147  281,628  50,135  1976
Lakeline Mall Cedar Park
(Austin), TX  - 10,088  81,568  14  24,747  10,102  106,315  116,417  64,612  1995
Lenox
SquareAtlanta, GA
 - 37,447  492,411  - 139,068  37,447  631,479  668,925  373,965  1998 (4)
Livingston
MallLivingston (New
York), NJ - 22,214 105,250 - 47,841 22,214 153,091 175,305 94,316 1998 (4)
Mall of
GeorgiaBuford (Atlanta),
GA - 47,492 326,633 - 13,340 47,492 339,973 387,465 195,629 1999 (5)
McCain Mall N. Little Rock,
AR - - 9,515 10,530 28,504 10,530 38,019 48,549 17,298 1973
Menlo Park
MallEdison (New
York), NJ  - 65,684  223,252  - 83,263  65,684  306,515  372,199  190,029  1997 (4)
Midland Park
MallMidland, TX
 71,822  687 9,213  1,196  42,102  1,883  51,315  53,198  22,616 1980
Miller Hill
MallDuluth, MN
 -  2,965  18,092   1,811   44,203   4,776   62,295   67,071   46,348  1973
North East
MallHurst (Dallas),
TX  -  128 12,966   19,010   145,677   19,138   158,643   177,781   118,006  1971
Northgate
MallSeattle, W A
 -  23,610  115,992   -  67,602   23,610   183,594   207,204   57,897  1987
Ocean
County MallToms River
(New York), NJ  -  20,404  124,945   3,277   84,547   23,681   209,492   233,173   102,081  1998 (4)
Orland
SquareOrland Park
(Chicago), IL  -  35,439  129,906   -  78,864   35,439   208,770   244,209   117,910  1997 (4)
Oxford
Valley MallLanghorne
(Philadelphia),
PA  32,779   20,872  100,287   -  20,914   20,872   121,201   142,073   84,968  2003 (4)
Penn Square
MallOklahoma City ,
OK  310,000   2,043  155,958   -  60,144   2,043   216,102   218,145   136,840  2002 (4)
Pheasant
Lane MallNashua, NH
 -  3,902  155,068   550  49,404   4,452   204,472   208,924   116,717  2004 (5)
Phipps Plaza Atlanta, GA  -  15,005  210,610   -  243,085   15,005   453,695   468,700   171,188  1998 (4)
Plaza
CarolinaCarolina (San
Juan), PR  225,000   15,493  279,560   -  77,319   15,493   356,879   372,372   173,238  2004 (4)
Prien Lake
MallLake Charles,
LA  -  1,842  2,813   3,053   47,133   4,895   49,946   54,841   28,706  1972
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location  Encumbrances (6) Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Rockaway
TownsquareRockaway
(New York),
NJ $ - $41,918  $ 212,257  $ - $ 69,145  $41,918  $ 281,402  $323,320  $ 160,468  1998 (4)
Roosevelt
FieldGarden City
(New York),
NY  -  163,160  702,008   1,246   368,834   164,406   1,070,842   1,235,248   533,147  1998 (4)
Ross Park
MallPittsburgh, P A
 -  23,541  90,203   5,815   122,197   29,356   212,400   241,756   132,274  1986
Santa Rosa
PlazaSanta Rosa,
CA  -  10,400  87,864   -  27,384   10,400   115,248   125,648   67,970  1998 (4)
Shops at
Chestnut
Hill, TheChestnut Hill
(Boston), MA
 120,000   449 25,102   38,864   105,673   39,313   130,776   170,089   42,473  2002 (5)
Shops at
Nanuet, TheNanuet, NY
 -  28,125  142,860   -  14,285   28,125   157,145   185,270   47,459  2013
Shops at
Riverside,
TheHackensack
(New York),
NJ  130,000   13,521  238,746   -  263,289   13,521   502,035   515,556   98,686  2007 (4) (5)
South Hills
VillagePittsburgh, P A
 -  23,445  125,840   1,472   84,612   24,917   210,452   235,369   109,844  1997 (4)
South
Shore PlazaBraintree
(Boston), MA - 101,200 301,495  - 166,650  101,200  468,145  569,345  269,676 1998 (4)
Southdale
MallEdina
(Minneapolis),
MN  138,131   41,430  184,967   -  112,713   41,430   297,680   339,110   95,003  2007 (4) (5)
SouthPark Charlotte, NC  -  42,092  188,055   100  204,680   42,192   392,735   434,927   225,268  2002 (4)
St. Charles
Towne
CenterWaldorf
(Washington,
DC), MD - 7,710 52,934 1,180 29,314 8,890 82,248 91,138 61,874 1990
Stanford
Shopping
CenterPalo Alto (San
Jose), CA
- - 339,537  - 188,382  - 527,919  527,919  214,147  2003 (4)
Summit
MallAkron, OH
85,000  15,374  51,137  - 55,804  15,374  106,941  122,315  66,518  1965
Tacoma
MallTacoma
(Seattle), W A -  37,113   125,826   -  162,616   37,113   288,442   325,555   145,776  1987
Tippecanoe
MallLafayette, IN
 -  2,897   8,439   5,517   47,136   8,414   55,575   63,989   44,233  1973
Town
Center at
Boca RatonBoca Raton
(Miami), FL
 -  64,200   307,317   -  241,889   64,200   549,206   613,406   309,065  1998 (4)
Towne East
SquareWichita, KS
 -  8,525   18,479   4,108   49,059   12,633   67,538   80,171   45,990  1975
Treasure
Coast
SquareJensen
Beach, FL
 -  11,124   72,990   3,067   39,945   14,191   112,935   127,126   76,712  1987
Tyrone
SquareSt. Petersburg
(Tampa), FL  -  15,638   120,962   1,459   50,690   17,097   171,652   188,749   112,049  1972
University
Park MallMishawaka,
IN  -  10,762   118,164   7,000   58,654   17,762   176,818   194,580   147,955  1996 (4)
Walt
Whitman
ShopsHuntington
Station (New
York), NY  -  51,700   111,258   3,789   127,664   55,489   238,922   294,411   130,914  1998 (4)
White Oaks
MallSpringfield, IL
 46,915   2,907   35,692   2,468   65,642   5,375   101,334   106,709   59,098  1977
Wolfchase
GalleriaMemphis, TN
 155,152   16,407   128,276   -  17,049   16,407   145,325   161,732   97,753  2002 (4)
Woodland
Hills MallTulsa, OK
 -  34,211   187,123   -  35,414   34,211   222,537   256,748   144,965  2004 (5)
Premium
Outlets   
Albertville
Premium
OutletsAlbertville
(Minneapolis),
MN  -  3,900   97,059   -  11,094   3,900   108,153   112,053   54,308  2004 (4)
Allen
Premium
OutletsAllen (Dallas),
TX
 - 20,932  69,788  - 44,436  20,932  114,224  135,156  36,968 2004 (4)
Aurora
Farms
Premium
OutletsAurora
(Cleveland),
OH
 - 2,370  24,326  - 8,442  2,370  32,768  35,138  24,396 2004 (4)
Birch Run
Premium
OutletsBirch Run
(Detroit), MI
 123,000   11,477   77,856   -  8,978   11,477   86,834   98,311   37,026  2010 (4)
Camarillo
Premium
OutletsCamarillo (Los
Angeles), CA
 -  16,670   224,721   395  75,097   17,065   299,818   316,883   149,400  2004 (4)
Carlsbad
Premium
OutletsCarlsbad (San
Diego), CA
 -  12,890   184,990   96  10,492   12,986   195,482   208,468   88,965  2004 (4)
Carolina
Premium
OutletsSmithfield
(Raleigh), NC
 41,757   3,175   59,863   5,311   7,902   8,486   67,765   76,251   37,961  2004 (4)
Chicago
Premium
OutletsAurora
(Chicago), IL
 -  659  118,005   13,050   99,046   13,709   217,051   230,760   84,558  2004 (4)
Cincinnati
Premium
OutletsMonroe
(Cincinnati),
OH  -  14,117   71,520   -  4,687   14,117   76,207   90,324   38,483  2008
149Clinton
Crossing
Premium
OutletsClinton, CT
 -  2,060   107,556   1,532   6,027   3,592   113,583   117,175   61,401  2004 (4)
Denver
Premium
OutletsThornton
(Denver), CO
- 11,375  45,335  10 72,949  11,385  118,284  129,669  12,902  2018
Desert Hills
Premium
OutletsCabazon
(Palm
Springs), CA - 3,440 338,679 - 117,032 3,440 455,711 459,151 187,479 2004 (4)
Ellenton
Premium
OutletsEllenton
(Tampa), FL
- 2,857  47,309  - 20,582  2,857  67,891  70,748 36,332 2010 (4)
Folsom
Premium
OutletsFolsom
(Sacramento),
CA  178,000  15,807  182,412  - 7,726  15,807  190,138  205,945 106,430 2004 (4)
Gilroy
Premium
OutletsGilroy (San
Jose), CA
 -  9,060   50,281   -  5,940   9,060   56,221   65,281  32,576 2004 (4)
Grand
Prairie
Premium
OutletsGrand Prairie
(Dallas), TX
 -  9,630   194,122   -  16,192   9,630   210,314   219,944  104,299 2012
Grove City
Premium
OutletsGrove City
(Pittsburgh),
PA  109,122   9,497   194,245   -  2,058   9,497   196,303   205,800  54,525 2010 (4)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location  Encumbrances (6) Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Gulfport
Premium
OutletsGulfport, MS
$ 140,000  $6,421  $ 121,880  $ - $ 7,763  $6,421  $ 129,643  $136,064 $ 72,537 2010 (4)
Hagerstown
Premium
OutletsHagerstown
(Baltimore/W ashington,
DC), MD  50,000   -  27,949   -  7,444   -  35,393   35,393  17,250 2010 (4)
Houston
Premium
OutletsCypress (Houston), TX
 73,314   3,576   85,883   -  2,383   3,576   88,266   91,842  39,565 2007
Indiana
Premium
OutletsEdinburgh
(Indianapolis), IN
- 8,695 69,350 - 46,533 8,695 115,883 124,578 54,669 2004 (4)
Jackson
Premium
OutletsJackson (New York),
NJ
 -  6,413   104,013   3  8,300   6,416   112,313   118,729  52,477 2004 (4)
Jersey
Shore
Premium
OutletsTinton Falls (New
York), NJ
 -  15,390   50,979   -  78,255   15,390   129,234   144,624  65,300 2007
Johnson
Creek
Premium
OutletsJohnson Creek, WI
 -  2,800   39,546   -  6,936   2,800   46,482   49,282  23,364 2004 (4)
Kittery
Premium
OutletsKittery , ME
 -  11,832   94,994   -  11,008   11,832   106,002   117,834  47,052 2004 (4)
Las
Americas
Premium
OutletsSan Diego, CA
 -  45,168   251,878   -  11,380   45,168   263,258   308,426  102,723 2007 (4)
Las V egas
North
Premium
OutletsLas V egas, NV
 -  25,435   134,973   16,536   152,117   41,971   287,090   329,061  134,037 2004 (4)
Las V egas
South
Premium
OutletsLas V egas, NV
 -  13,085   160,777   -  32,957   13,085   193,734   206,819  87,419 2004 (4)
Lee
Premium
OutletsLee, MA
 49,504   9,167   52,212   -  4,302   9,167   56,514   65,681  30,446 2010 (4)
Leesburg
Corner
Premium
OutletsLeesburg (W ashington,
DC), V A
 -  7,190   162,023   -  21,105   7,190   183,128   190,318  87,734 2004 (4)
Lighthouse
Place
Premium
OutletsMichigan City
(Chicago, IL), IN
 -  6,630   94,138   -  13,206   6,630   107,344   113,974  58,943 2004 (4)
Merrimack
Premium
OutletsMerrimack, NH
 116,398   14,975   118,428   -  2,911   14,975   121,339   136,314  43,453 2012
Napa
Premium
OutletsNapa, CA
 - 11,400  45,023  - 7,513  11,400  52,536  63,936  27,674 2004 (4)
North Bend
Premium
OutletsNorth Bend (Seattle),
WA
 -  2,143   36,197   -  5,978   2,143   42,175   44,318  20,310 2004 (4)
North
Georgia
Premium
OutletsDawsonville (Atlanta),
GA
 -  4,300   137,020   -  3,158   4,300   140,178   144,478  67,220 2004 (4)
Orlando
International
Premium
OutletsOrlando, FL
 -  31,998   472,815   -  17,515   31,998   490,330   522,328  182,297 2010 (4)
Orlando
Vineland
Premium
OutletsOrlando, FL
 -  14,040   382,949   36,023   19,688   50,063   402,637   452,700  178,209 2004 (4)
Petaluma
Village
Premium
OutletsPetaluma (San
Francisco), CA
 -  13,322   13,710   -  4,394   13,322   18,104   31,426  11,599 2004 (4)
Philadelphia
Premium
OutletsLimerick
(Philadelphia), P A
 -  16,676   105,249   -  25,391   16,676   130,640   147,316  72,961 2006
Phoenix
Premium
OutletsChandler (Phoenix),
AZ
 - - 63,082  - 681 - 63,763  63,763 24,082 2013
Pismo
Beach
Premium
OutletsPismo Beach, CA
 34,329  4,317  19,044  - 2,812  4,317  21,856  26,173 13,228 2010 (4)
Pleasant
Prairie
Premium
OutletsPleasant Prairie
(Chicago,
IL/Milwaukee), WI
145,000  16,823  126,686  - 7,408  16,823  134,094  150,917  55,534  2010 (4)
Puerto Rico
PremiumBarceloneta, PR  160,000   20,586   114,021   -  9,286   20,586   123,307   143,893   51,856  2010 (4)
150Outlets
Queenstown
Premium
OutletsQueenstown
(Baltimore), MD
 60,308   8,129   61,950   -  5,109   8,129   67,059   75,188   29,293  2010 (4)
Rio Grande
Valley
Premium
OutletsMercedes (McAllen),
TX
 -  12,229   41,547   -  28,623   12,229   70,170   82,399   41,040  2005
Round Rock
Premium
OutletsRound Rock (Austin),
TX
 -  14,706   82,252   -  5,336   14,706   87,588   102,294   53,430  2005
San
Francisco
Premium
OutletsLivermore (San
Francisco), CA
 -  21,925   308,694   46,177   73,617   68,102   382,311   450,413   97,460  2012
San Marcos
Premium
OutletsSan Marcos
(Austin/San Antonio),
TX  -  13,180   287,179   -  12,724   13,180   299,903   313,083   115,472  2010 (4)
Seattle
Premium
OutletsTulalip (Seattle), W A
- - 103,722 - 54,623 - 158,345 158,345 77,078 2004 (4)
St.
Augustine
Premium
OutletsSt. Augustine
(Jacksonville), FL
- 6,090  57,670  2 12,534  6,092  70,204  76,296  37,830 2004 (4)
Tampa
Premium
OutletsLutz (T ampa), FL
 -  14,298   97,188   121  4,942   14,419   102,130   116,549   23,556  2015
The
Crossings
Premium
OutletsTannersville, P A
 103,304   7,720   172,931   -  18,694   7,720   191,625   199,345   89,095  2004 (4)
Tucson
Premium
OutletsMarana (T ucson), AZ
- 12,508  69,677  - 7,508  12,508  77,185  89,693  18,160 2015
Vacaville
Premium
OutletsVacaville, CA
 -  9,420   84,850   -  18,500   9,420   103,350   112,770   56,351  2004 (4)
Waikele
Premium
OutletsWaipahu (Honolulu), HI
 -  22,630   77,316   -  19,378   22,630   96,694   119,324   47,598  2004 (4)
Waterloo
Premium
OutletsWaterloo, NY
 -  3,230   75,277   -  15,032   3,230   90,309   93,539   48,025  2004 (4)
Williamsburg
Premium
OutletsWilliamsburg, V A
185,000  10,323  223,789  - 8,262  10,323  232,051  242,374  87,577 2010 (4)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location  Encumbrances (6) Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Woodburn
Premium
OutletsWoodburn (Portland),
OR
 $ - $ 9,414  $ 150,414  $ - $ 2,963  $ 9,414  $ 153,377  $162,791  $ 46,326  2013 (4)
Woodbury
Common
Premium
OutletsCentral V alley (New
York), NY
- 11,010  862,559  1,771  265,878  12,781  1,128,437  1,141,218  448,819 2004 (4)
Wrentham
Village
Premium
OutletsWrentham (Boston),
MA
- 4,900  282,031  - 48,605  4,900  330,636  335,536  146,606 2004 (4)
The Mills
Arizona Mills Tempe (Phoenix), AZ 145,874  41,936  297,289  —  15,389  41,936  312,678  354,614  75,594 2007 (4) (5)
Great Mall Milpitas (San Jose),
CA - 69,853  463,101  —  59,127  69,853  522,228  592,081  156,327 2007 (4) (5)
Gurnee Mills Gurnee (Chicago), IL 253,708  41,133  297,911  —  29,991  41,133  327,902  369,035  102,054 2007 (4) (5)
Mills at
Jersey
Gardens,
TheElizabeth, NJ
355,000  120,417  865,605  —  17,920  120,417  883,525  1,003,942  198,695 2015 (4)
Opry Mills Nashville, TN 375,000  51,000  327,503  —  18,561  51,000  346,064  397,064  103,485 2007 (4) (5)
Outlets at
Orange, TheOrange (Los
Angeles), CA 215,000 64,973 211,322 — 2,965 64,973 214,287 279,260 17,869 2007 (4) (5)
Potomac
MillsWoodbridge
(Washington, DC), V A 416,000 61,755 425,370 — 42,020 61,755 467,390 529,145 151,327 2007 (4) (5)
Sawgrass
MillsSunrise (Miami), FL
- 192,981 1,641,153 5,395 218,581 198,376 1,859,734 2,058,109 530,570 2007 (4) (5)
Designer
Outlets
La Reggia
Designer
OutletMarcianise (Naples),
Italy
159,432  37,220  233,179  - 22,684  37,220  255,864  293,084  47,616  2013 (4) (5) (7
Noventa Di
Piave
Designer
OutletVenice, Italy
343,042 38,793 309,283 - 71,352 38,793 380,635 419,428 62,130  2013 (4) (5) (7
Parndorf
Designer
OutletVienna, Austria
226,896 14,903 223,156 - 2,330 14,903 225,486 240,389 49,071 2013 (4) (5) (7
Provence
Designer
OutletProvence, France
100,445 40,754 77,827 6,169 - 46,923 77,827 124,749 23,376 2017 (4) (5) (7
Roermond
Designer
OutletRoermond,
Netherlands
282,085 15,035 400,094 - 14,554 15,035 414,648 429,683 91,007 2013 (4) (5) (7
Roosendaal
Designer
OutletRoosendaal,
Netherlands
72,342 22,191 108,069 - 5,789 22,191 113,858 136,049 22,321 2017 (4) (5) (7
Community
Centers
ABQ
UptownAlbuquerque, NM
- 6,374 75,333 4,054 7,184 10,428 82,517 92,945 29,967 2011 (4)
University
Park V illageFort W orth, TX
54,425   18,031  100,523  - 4,710  18,031  105,233  123,264  22,240  2015 (4)
 
Other
Properties
Calhoun
MarketplaceCalhoun, GA
17,941   1,745  12,529  - 2,180  1,745  14,709  16,454  10,195 2010 (4)
Florida Keys
Outlet
CenterFlorida City , FL
17,001 1,112 1,748 - 4,474 1,112 6,222 7,334 3,792 2010 (4)
Gaffney
MarketplaceGaffney
(Greenville/Charlotte),
SC 28,981   4,056  32,371  - 6,097  4,056  38,468  42,524  21,273 2010 (4)
Orlando
Outlet
MarketplaceOrlando, FL
- 3,367 1,557 - 3,658 3,367 5,215 8,582 2,888 2010 (4)
Osage
Beach
MarketplaceOsage Beach, MO
- 1,397 9,471 - — 1,397 9,471 10,869 852 2004 (4)
Southridge
MallGreendale
(Milwaukee), WI 112,087 12,359 130,111 1,939 13,029 14,298 143,140 157,438 53,156 2007 (4) (5)
Town Center
at CobbKennesaw (Atlanta),
GA 180,376 32,355 158,225 - 24,583 32,355 182,808 215,163 131,692 1998 (5)
Other pre-
development
costs 107,403 156,542 959 - 108,362 156,542 264,903 78
Other 25,000 3,537 51,972 - - 3,537 51,972 55,509 15,503
Currency
Translation
Adjustment - 22,388 88,022 - 89,445 22,388 177,466 199,854 (2,464 )
$ 6,959,743 $3,342,322 $25,071,253 $357,702 $8,837,360 $3,700,024 $33,908,614 $37,608,638 $ 14,592,867
151
Table of Contents
152Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Schedule III as of December 31, 2020
(Dollars in thousands)
(1) Reconciliation of Real Estate Properties:
The changes in real estate assets for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 are as follows:
    2020     2019     2018  
Balance, beginning of year $37,356,739 $36,667,960 $36,014,506
Acquisitions and consolidations (7)  —  40,990  328,265
Improvements  401,202  899,728  758,135
Disposals and deconsolidations  (320,328 ) (219,268 ) (357,622 )
Currency Translation Adjustment 171,025 (32,671 ) (75,324 )
Balance, close of year $37,608,638 $37,356,739 $36,667,960
The unaudited aggregate cost of domestic consolidated real estate assets for U.S. federal income tax
purposes as of December 31, 2020 was $21,756,450.
(2) Reconciliation of Accumulated Depreciation:
The changes in accumulated depreciation for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019, and 2018 are as
follows:
    2020     2019     2018  
Balance, beginning of year $13,622,433 $12,632,690 $11,704,223
Depreciation expense (7)  1,226,611  1,176,815  1,106,053
Disposals and deconsolidations  (236,123 ) (194,664 ) (190,241 )
Currency Translation Adjustment (20,054 ) 7,592 12,655
Balance, close of year $14,592,867 $13,622,433 $12,632,690
Depreciation of our investment in buildings and improvements reflected in the consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income is calculated over the estimated original lives of the assets as noted below.
●Buildings and Improvements — typically 10-35 years for the structure, 15 years for landscaping and
parking lot, and 10 years for HVAC equipment.
●Tenant Allowances and Improvements — shorter of lease term or useful life.
(3) Initial cost generally represents net book value at December 20, 1993, except for acquired properties and
new developments after December 20, 1993. Initial cost also includes any new developments that are
opened during the current year. Costs of disposals and impairments of property are first reflected as a
reduction to cost capitalized subsequent to acquisition.
(4) Not developed/constructed by us or our predecessors. The date of construction represents the initial
acquisition date for assets in which we have acquired multiple interests.
(5) Initial cost for these properties is the cost at the date of consolidation for properties previously accounted for
under the equity method of accounting.
(6) Encumbrances represent face amount of mortgage debt and exclude any premiums or discounts and
deferred financing costs.
(7) Represents the original cost and does not include subsequent currency translation adjustments.
